Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 




70 






X 



C 



T ' 



LIFE 



E MORAL LIFE 



.M WUXDT 






:-ORD T:7',;:i.,'i 



I 



z.;5.:/:.5 



ETHICS: 



AN INVESTIGATION 



FACTS AND LAWS OF THE MORAL LIFE 



WILHELM WUNDT 



Cntiflbitet) Icnn tbe Second ocmun £Mtldn {1892) 

EDWARD BRADFORD TITCHENER 
(AOs nroFmoK or rarcHOLOor ih tmi coihili. umivck 

JULIA HENRIETTA GULLIVER 



MARGARET FLOY WASHBURN, 



Vol. I. 

IlfTSODVCTlONi THE FACTS Or THE MORAL UFB 



LONDON 

SWAN SONNENSCHEIN & CO., Lm 

NSW YORK: THE MACMILLAN CO. 



THE 

FACTS OF THE MORAL LIFE 

WILHELM WUNDT 



Ctaiulatet) bs 
JULIA GULLIVER 



EDWARD BRADFORD TITCHENER 




LONDON 

SWAN SOiNNENSCHEIN & CO., LIM. 

NBIV YORK: THE MACMILLAN CO. 

1897 



V 









f\.%y(cii- 




WUNDT'S ETHICS. 



!♦» 



Vol. I. Introduction: The Facts of the Moral Life. 

Vol. II. Ethical Systems. 

Vol. III. The Principles of Morality, and the Sphere of 
THEIR Validity. 



MAR 4 1898 



TRANSLATORS' PREFACE 



THE text upon which this translation is based is that of 
the first 269 pages of Professor Wundt's Ethik, as 
published in revised form in 1892. The translators have 
made no changes in the body of the work. They have 
added an index of names and subjects, and for the con- 
venience of readers who may wish to compare the translation 
with the original have printed the German pagination in the 
headlines of the English version. They desire gratefully to 
acknowledge assistance rendered in various ways by Professor 
J. Royce and Dr. H. C. Bierwirth, of Harvard University, and 
by Dr. H. P. Jones, of Cornell University. Responsibility 
for the translation rests, however, with themselves alone. 
The latter portion of the Author's Preface (marked off by 
square brackets) has been translated by Professor Titchener 
with the co-operation of Professor Margaret Washburn, to 
whom the translation of the second volume has been 
entrusted. 

The translators are fully conscious of the boldness of their 
attempt to English a book so difficult, and moreover so 
Grerman in its difficulty, as is this first part of Professor 
Wundt's Ethik. They have, however, taken the task seriously, 
and diligently endeavoured to avoid either Germanised 
English or perfunctory translation-English in this their final 
version. They hope that the result of their labour is a read- 
able literalness, which may open what has hitherto been a 
sealed book to many English-speaking students of philosophy. 

fum ittf 1897. 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE 



IT has been my object in the present work to investigate 
the problems of ethics in the light of an examination 
of the facts of the moral life. One reason for this procedure 
is my desire to conduct the reader by the same path that 
I myself have followed in approaching ethical questions. 
But that apart, I believe it to be the sole method by which 
we can hope to establish ethics upon an empirical founda- 
tion. There has been no lack either of speculative or of 
psychological essays in the moral sphere, and I am more 
than ready to give both their due. But I think that we 
must look to ethics to supply the comer stones of meta- 
physics, of our final and comprehensive view of the universe ; 
and so it seems to me inadvisable to reverse the relation of 
the two disciplines and base moral philosophy upon meta- 
physics. As to psychology, I have personally found it to 
be so necessary a propaedeutic and so indispensable an aid 
to ethical investigations, that I do not understand how any 
one can do without it. But the psychology of the moralists 
belongs for the most part to the days of the older empiricism. 
It is, to my thinking, altogether too individualistic in its point 
of view; besides which, it has not advanced beyond that 
stage of popular thought at which subjective interpretations 
of facts are naively intermingled with the facts themselves. 
The straight road to ethics lies, I believe, through ethnic 
psychology, whose especial business it is to consider the 
history of custom and of ethical ideas from the psycho- 
logical standpoint 



Author^s Preface vii 

[The conclusions to which I have been led by these 
anthropological studies are in the main independent of the 
results of my criticism of previous ethical systems. That 
criticism, however, has served so largely to confirm and 
round out my views, that I may perhaps hope that the 
discussions of Part II. will do for the reader of the 
present work what the study of the history of ethics has 
done for myself. English moral philosophy, in particular, 
which was formerly little known in Germany, and has only 
recently b^^n to arouse a more active interest, has been 
exceedingly valuable to me, though I must confess rather 
in a negative than in a positive way. I am thoroughly 
opposed to its individualistic and utilitarian tendencies ; 
but I must acknowledge that I am chiefly indebted to 
the Utilitarians themselves for an understanding of the 
untenableness of their position. The reader who knows 
how great a part of the history of scientific development 
is the history of error will recognise that this judgment of 
mine means praise as well as blame, — praise which does not 
fall far short of that accorded to the discovery of new truths. 

It should now be plain that the first two parts of the 
book are merely introductory and preparatory, and that I 
have had no intention of writing a complete history either 
of religion and custom or of ethics. In Part I. my task 
was simply to discuss so much of the history of civilisation 
as seemed necessary for the establishment of certain ethical 
conclusions. Hence the quotations are not intended to be 
a complete index to the literature of the subject, but simply 
to direct the reader to supplementary sources at points 
where I have been obliged to forego a full discussion 
of the facts at issue. In Part II., in the historical sur- 
vey of ethics, I thought it best to describe the principal 
tendencies in the persons of their most distinguished 
representatives. Theory has been kept in the foreground 
throughout; so that I have left out of account much of 
the literature of philosophical and theological ethics, ancient 



viii Author s Preface 

and modem, the value of which in other, and especially in 
practical connections I fully recognise. 

Some of my readers will, perhaps, be surprised to find that 
the views stated in Part III., while they differ, and differ 
widely, from the moral theories and philosophy of law set 
forth by Fichte and Hegel, and from the systems of men 
like Schleiermacher and Krause, still have certain funda- 
mental thoughts in common with the ethics of the speculative 
idealism which came after Kant But even at the risk of 
increasing their astonishment, I must confess that, in my 
opinion, what I have tried to do in ethics will in the near 
future be attempted in other departments of philosophical 
enquiry. There is, certainly, one province of thought which 
may be regarded as sufficiently well explored at the present 
time to afford a means of comparison between the philo- 
sophical work of our own day and the speculation which 
prevailed at the beginning of the century. The idea of 
development^ which permeates the whole of modern biological 
science, was first applied in any comprehensive manner by 
the nature-philosophy of Schelling and his school. Consider 
what it was then and what it is now: then, a tissue of fantastic 
ideas, held together by a method which contradicted every 
rule of exact thinking ; now, a theory which though it cannot 
do without a number of secondary hypotheses, themselves not 
always adequate, still has its foundation upon the rock of 
experience. And it seems to me to be just the same in 
other departments of science. We have forgotten what 
the Romanticists believed about language and myth and 
history ; their fanciful pictures of ancient civilisation, drawn 
upon so slight a background of fact, have given place to the 
results of a more sober method. Nevertheless, it is to their 
efforts that we owe the impetus to a more sympathetic 
research into strange worlds and distant periods, such as was 
hardly felt at all in the century of the Enlightenment. And 
from this widening of the horizon came that more universal 
conception of mental life, which, to-day the common property 



V 



Author's Preface ix 

of all the mental sciences, found its full expression for the 
first time in the philosophical idealism that came after 
Kant 

Similarly, when one comes to ask the value of philo- 
sophical theories, one must learn to distinguish enduring 
contents from perishable form. Systems which once exerted 
a profound influence on men's minds, but which, bom in a 
time of change and transition, are now matters of history, 
must neither be thrown aside as mere fictions of the brain 
nor revered as eternal verities. If the thinkers of that day 
were much in error, still they prepared the way for the 
development of the ideas of modem science. The useless 
framework of their systems is falling into decay; but the 
living ideas which it contained — however completely their 
source may be forgotten — ^have taken root everywhere in the 
special sciences. This has been the course of progress, and 
philosophy cannot but be influenced by it. She may have 
to change many of her general hypotheses, and all of her 
detailed expositions ; but still her task will be, enjoying as 
never before the guidance of the special sciences and in her 
turn directing their advance, to complete the work begun 
at an earlier time with insuflicient means and faulty methods. 

Lbipzig, July^ 1886. 

In this second edition the statement of my general views 
remains unchanged, but many amplifications and corrections 
of detail have been introduced. By abbreviating other 
passages^ however, I have been able to keep the volume 
approximately to its original size. Parts II. and IV. have 
suflered most change : in the former the history of Christian 
and of quite recent ethics, and in the latter the discussion of 
the moral problems of the state and of society have been 
partially recast] 

WILHELM WUNDT. 

Leipzig, Aprils 1892. 



CONTENTS 



Introduction. pagb 

1. Ethics as Science of Norms . . . . i 

2. The Methods of Ethics . . lo 

3. The Problems of Ethics ... 18 

Part I. 

XCbe facts ot tbe Aoral Xtte 

CHAPTER I. 
Language and Ethical Ideas. 



I. The General idea df Morality 

(a) History of the Words 'efhisch,' 'moralisck,' ^sittlich' 

(^) 'Good' and * Bad' . ... 

3. The Development of Special Moral Ideas 

(a) The Separation of Ethical Ideas from their Substrate 

{p) The Deepening of Moral Conceptions 

{€) The Universal Validity of Moral Ideas 

CHAPTER II. 

Religion and Morality. 
I. Myth and Religion ..... 

(a) Religion ..... 

(jf) The Religious Constituents of the Myth . 

(r) The Relation of the Religious to the Ethical Elements 
in the Myth .... 

(i) The Inmioral Elements in the Myth 

{e) The Psychological Development of the Myth 
3. The Gods as Moral Ideals . . 

(a) The Worship of Ancestors 



23 
23 
27 
32 
32 
37 
45 



48 
48 

55 

61 

65 
71 
78 
78 



Contents 



XI 



rAOB 



{b) The Anthropomorphic Nature-Myth 
(c) Hero Worship 

{d) The Ideal of the Ethical Religions 
3. Religion and the Moral Order of the Universe . 
(a) Ideas of the Life after Death 

{Jb) The Development of the Ideas of Reward and 
ment in the Nature-Religions . 

{c) The Influence of Philosophy on the Ideas of 
and Punishment 

{d) The Idea of the Moral Order of the Universe 

{e) The Moral Laws as Religious Commands 



• • 


84 


• • 


90 


• • 


97 


• • 


100 


• • 


100 


Punish- 




• • 


105 


Reward 




• • 


112 


• • 


117 


• • 


121 



CHAPTER IIL 
Custom and the Moral Life. 

1. The Universal Characteristics of Custom 

(a) Instinct and Custom 

{b) The Religious Origin of Custom 

{c) The Changes oC Purpose in Custom 

{d) The Relation of Custom to Law and Morality 

{e) The Relation of Custom to Habit and Usage 

(/) The Systematisation of Custom . 

2. The Individual Forms of Life 

{a) Food 
{b) The DweUing 
(c) Clothing 
{d) Work 

3. The Forms of Intercourse 

{a) The Labour Contract 

{b) Play 

{c) Polite Manners : Personal Deportment 

{d) The Forms of Social Intercourse : Salutation 

{e) The Ethical Significance of the Forms of Social Inter- 
course . 

4. The Forms of Society 

(a) The Family and the Tribal Union 

{b) Mother-right and Father-right 

{c) The Moral Aspect of Family Life 

{d) The Development of the Feelings of Sympathy and 
of Filial Affection . . . . . 



127 
127 

134 

139 

151 
156 

165 
169 
169 

177 
182 

193 
198 

198 

208 

214 

216 

221 
227 
227 
232 

237 
242 



xii Contents 

PAGB 

{e) The State and the Tribal Union . . . 247 

(/) The Development of the Forms of the State . 253 

(g) The Feeling of Conmiunity in Nation and State . . 257 

(^) The Origination of the Legal System . . 265 

(0 The Punitive Power of the State . 269 

(^) The Origination of New Departments of Law . 273 

(/) The Ethical Significance of the Legal System . 276 

5. The Humanistic Forms of Life . . . . 281 

{a) The General Development of the Humanistic Feelings 281 



{ff) Friendship 
(^) Hospitality 
(1/) Charity 



283 
286 
290 



CHAPTER IV. 



The Conditions of Moral Evolution in Savagery 

AND Civilisation. 

I. Man and Nature . . . 

(a) The Natural Conditions of Life . 

{p) The Development of the Feeling for Nature 
ji. Civilisation and Morality . . . . 

(a) The Idea of ' Civilisation ' . 

{p) The Regulation of Property . . 

[c) The Invention of Tools 

{(£) The Improvement of the Means of Communication 

{e) Mental Cultivation .... 



(/) The Moral Advantages and Disadvantages of Civilisation 322 



3. General Results .... 

(j) The Psychological Elements in Morality . 
ip) The Psychological Laws of Moral Development 

4. The Moral Life and Ethical Theories of the Universe 



294 
295 
298 
308 
308 
310 

313 
316 

319 



325 
325 
329 
331 



Index. 
Index of Names and Subjects ... 33s 



INTRODUCTION 



I. ETHICS AS SCIENCE OF NORMS. 

IN the treatment of scientific problems two different 
points of view have long been current: the explicative 
and the fwrmative. The explicative point of view treats its 
subject-matter as a body of facts^ which it seeks to make 
more comprehensible by bringing out some inner relation- 
ship or a community of certain external characteristics. 
The normative point of view considers objects with reference 
to definite rules, which find expression in them, and to which 
they are at the same time in every case required to conform. 
From the explicative point of view, therefore, all facts are 
in themselves of equal value ; from the normative point of 
view, it is the purpose of the inquirer to estimate the relative 
values of facts. Facts which contradict established rules 
are either thrown aside, or else explicitly contrasted, as 
abnormal, with other facts that confirm the rule. 

The division of labour in scientific investigations has 
resulted in the assignment of these different points of view 
to different sciences. Thus all the natural sciences, as well 
as psychology and history ,« arc assigned to the explicative 
mode of treatment ; while logic, grammar, aesthetics, ethics 
and, in part, politics and the science of law are regarded 
as normative disciplines. Nevertheless, as the questioa 
here is not one of a difference in subject-matter, but simply 
one of different points of view which can be applied, if need 
I. B 



2 Introduction [2 

arises, to the same object, it is easy to see that this line 
of division cannot be drawn in any hard and fast manner. 
Thus the idea of the norm has been introduced into natural 
science, under the form of 'natural law/ The concept of 
natural law is a sub-form of the normative idea, differing 
from the original in that it allows the irregular facts of ex- 
perience to be set aside only with the proviso that they too 
be conceived as conforming in some way to definite norms. It 
is evident that this proviso does away at once with the scale 
of values which was originally involved in the introduction 
of the idea of the norm ; so that, in assimilating the idea 
of the norm, natural science has, on the one hand, given 
it greater exactness by attributing to it the characteristic 
of universality, but, on the other hand, entirely removed 
the element of appreciation originally contained in it. This 
process of adoption has, however, taken place very gradually. 
Where the subjects of investigation were simple, the norma- 
tive point of view naturally attained supremacy over mere 
description sooner than it did where they were more complex 
and difficult. Hence we have the distinction between explan- 
atory and descriptive natural sciences : a distinction which 
cannot, in the nature of things, be more than transitory. 

Psychology and history have followed natural science in ' 
the assimilation of the idea of the norm. Granted that the 
proof of laws of mental phenomena is more difficult, and 
the character of these laws different from that of natural 
laws, still, the universal validity to which the causal principle 
lays claim in the various departments of human knowledge 
furnishes us with a constant incentive to subject the realm of 
mental facts also to the dominion of law. If the attempt 
meets with no little opposition, even at the present day, this 
is for the most part because of the wrong idea that the 
point here in question is that of a direct transference of 
the idea of natural causation, or perhaps even of individual 



2-3] Ethics as Science of Norms 3 

natural laws, to the psychical realm; whereas, as a matter 
of fact, psychology has developed the concept of the norm 
quite independently, and must therefore be guided, in her 
application of it, simply and solely by her own needs. But 
here again, while the concept gains in exactness, extensively, 
by its change into a law of actual occurrence,, it loses, 
intensively, that moment of valuation which is involved in 
a choice between various facts that present themselves for 
consideration. An originally normative science, like logic, 
is exact in its limitation : it excludes everything that 
contradicts the norm. A science that was originally one 
of observation, and is now working with the transferred 
normative idea, is exact in its generalisation : it demands 
that, in principle, every item of fact shall be reconciled 
with determinate norms. A science like logic can, there- 
fore, possess an exact character from the very first ; a 
science of observation can acquire it only through a gradual 
development. 

As the idea of the norm is thus transferred to the ex- 
plicative sciences, so conversely is the standpoint of pure 
observation gradually extended to problems that were at 
first assigned to certain normative disciplines. All the rules 
formulated by logic, grammar, ethics, aesthetics, etc., are 
founded on facts; they can be established only by previous 
study and observation of the facts. And as the norms them- 
selves possess the character of generalisations from facts, the 
notion of 'value,' which belongs to them all, can be most 
correctly understood if we subject them to objective examina- 
tion in connection with the facts to which they are related. 
Here too, therefore, the explicative standpoint is naturally 
the earlier, — or, at all events, the more* obvious. It is true 
that in many departments this explicative standpoint has 
had a long struggle for victory over the normative mode of 
treatment But the latter, in such cases, rests for the most 



4 Introduction [3-4 

part upon no surer foundation than some over-hasty exami- 
nation of the facts, which, primitive and inadequate as its 
abstractions are, has been held to be sufficient for all time. 
It has been forgotten that empirical science, whose progress 
knows no halt, is constantly supplying the normative dis- 
ciplines with new material for the understanding of the nature 
and significance, and even of the contents of their rules. 

But although the line of division between the explicative 
and normative sciences must be regarded, in virtue of the inter- 
relations just indicated, as extremely fluctuating, yet the sub- 
ject-matter of the normative sciences retains this one marked 
characteristic, that certain facts within it are distinguished 
from others as being of especial value ; so that facts which 
deviate from them either do not come into consideration at 
all, or do so only negatively, as contradicting the norm. The 
antithesis thus obtained between what is normal and what 
is abnormal leads to the discrimination of an ought and an 
is. The norm stands over against every fact in the guise of 
a command. If the fact agrees with it, it becomes a com- 
mand that has been followed ; if the fact disagrees, the same 
norm becomes a command that ought to have been followed. 
The explicative standpoint knows only an * is.' If in accept- 
ing the normative idea it accepts also the idea of an ' ought,' 
this is always under circumstances where the 'is' and the 
'ought' are absolutely identical. Thus natural science 
considers every fact both as something which is, and also, 
so far as it is dependent on a natural law, as something 
which ought to be. But as no permanent contradiction is 
possible here between the * is ' and the * ought,* the * ought,' 
in natural science, is always transformed at once into a 
must. When the judgment that some facts are more 
valuable than others is set aside, the difference between 
facts that follow the norm and facts that contradict it is 
also abolished. 



4-5] Ethics as Science of Norms 5 

Although, then, the universal applicability of the purely 
descriptive standpoint to all departments of hunnan knowledge 
is unquestionable, we should still take it into consideration 
that the estimate of the value of facts is also itself a fact, and 
a fact which must not be overlooked when it is there to see. 
A necessary condition of any such estimate is the existence 
of human free will. By free will we mean here not a meta- 
physical faculty, but merely the empirically given capacity of 
choice between various possible actions. Only where this 
capacity exists can there be a discrimination between obedi- 
ence and non-obedience to definite laws, and consequently 
between the ideas of ' ought ' and * is.' As choice precedes 
the actions that originate from it, it is only with reference to 
choice that the norm can possess the character of a real 
command. It thus becomes a rule that is concerned, not 
with the estimation of facts already given, but with the 
production of future facts. Every norm is originally a rule of 
volition. As such, its primary office is to lay down the law 
for the act which is to be performed, which still awaits choice; 
though at the same time it also furnishes, secondarily, a 
standard whereby to estimate actions already past 

It follows, from this connection of the norm with human 
volition, that the idea of law made use of by the explicative 
sciences becomes more and more estranged from the normative 
idea out of which it sprang, the less the facts themselves have 
the character of voluntary actions, or the fewer the voluntary 
actions comprised among them. Hence it is in natural law 
that the normative idea has come to be farthest removed from 
its true source, while in psychological and historical laws the 
co-ordinate influences of free will and of the determination of 
mind by nature are plainly observable. In their case, there- 
fore, it is often only the point of view which distinguishes the 
psychologist from the logician and the student of ethics, or the 
historian from the practical moralist and man of affairs. 



6 Introduction [5-6 

For the same reason, the normative character does not 
by any means attach to all the special normative sciences 
in the same degree. Thus grammar unites certain regular 
phenomena of language under grammatical rules or linguistic 
laws. Originating under definite physiological and psycho- 
logical conditions, these rules, when met by other conditions 
of similar origin, may cease to apply, without the exceptions 
which thus arise being regarded as wrong or ungrammatical.^ 
There is only one set of laws which stand, as norms, above 
all grammatical rules : the logical laws of thought, which are 
common to all languages, and which can find expression in 
the most diverse forms of speech. Strictly speaking, there- 
fore, only the logical elements of grammar are normative, — 
elements that in grammar itself, of course, shrink almost to 
the vanishing point, as compared with the consideration of 
the structure of language, which is mainly the result of 
varying psychological conditions. 

The same thing is true of the subject-matter of the science 
of law, the legal norms. Here, indeed, we retain the expres- 
sion 'norms,' because these, whatever their origin, are 
maintained in practice as binding commands. Nevertheless, 
they too are readily divisible into two classes: the one 
consisting of those legal ordinances that are of a more 
changeable nature, and have their origin in the peculiar his- 
torical conditions of a community organised under a given 
legal system ; and the other of laws to which we attribute 
an obligatory power independently of such special causes, 
because they have originated from the general moral con- 
sciousness of mankind. Whatever may be the relation 
between these two kinds of legal norms, it is true, at all 
events, that we ascribe universal validity only to laws of 
the second class, those that rest on definite ethical norms. 

^ Cf, my essay on the idea of law and the question whether phonetic laws are 
open to exception. Phiios, Sludien^ iiL p. 195. 



6] Ethics as Science of Norms 7 

^Esthetics exhibits like conditions, only that the multi- 
plicity of relations in which the science stands renders them 
far more complicated. Here, again, as in the science of law, 
we may first of all separate a more transient element, 
dependent on historical influences of fashion and custom, 
from a more permanent, to which we should be inclined 
to attribute an absolute value. But aesthetic feeling springs 
from many different sources ; so that we find rules of the 
second kind, those that alone possess the significance of 
true norms, again dividing into two sub-classes. Both may 
be traced, though closely interwoven, in any particular in- 
stance of the aesthetic judgment. On the one side, aesthetic 
pleasure is connected with certain principles of purposive- 
ness, in the discovery and application of which our logical 
thinking is set to work. On the other side — and this is the 
great reason for the influence of aesthetics on the emotional 
life — the beautiful object awakens the most varied forms of 
ethiccU sentiment, and upon the excitation and satisfaction 
of these all the higher forms of aesthetic effect depend. 

1\iM^ logic and ethics finally prove to be the only true 
normative sciences. All the others have borrowed their nor- 
mative character from one or other, or from both of these 
disciplines. And it may easily happen that in the process 
of assimilation the idea of the norm is transferred to rules 
which do not in themselves possess any normative value, 
but merely derive it from genuine logical and ethical norms 
with which they are connected in the act of judgment. All 
the other departments of knowledge are therefore, in this 
sense also, subordinate to the two great normative sciences ; 
the value and universality of the special norms which they 
employ are always dependent upon the agreement of these 
norms with logical and ethical principles. 

In their significance as regulative sciences, logic and ethics 
embrace the whole realm of human knowledge. Logic 



8 Introduction [6-7 

forms the normative basis of the theoretical sciences; ethics, 
that of the practical. A scientific inquiry is said to be 
theoretical when it investigates the interconnection of given 
facts ; it is practical when it is occupied with human volitions 
and the mental creations which proceed from them. It is 
clear that this distinction has something in common with that 
of the explicative and normative points of view, although 
the correspondence is not perfect. The theoretical way of 
looking at things is concerned exclusively with what is, and 
is therefore the wider of the two, including the practical 
standpoint within it. The practical point of view is con- 
cerned only with that is which can be viewed also from the 
standpoint of what ought to be. But aside from this, the 
practical sciences cover both a wider and a narrower territory 
than the normative. They cover a wider territory, since they 
have to give their attention to those conditions and effects of 
the activity of the free will which lie beyond the norms and 
their applications, not less than to the norms themselves. 
On the other hand, they cover a narrower territory, because 
the practical point of view is confined to external voluntary 
acts, and their causes and effects. This explains why it 
is that one especially of the two fundamental normative 
sciences, logic, has become preeminently a theoretical science. 
In the same connection we may note that the idea of the 
norm is very differently applied in logic and ethics. The 
norms of logic are applicable to all that can be given to us in 
perception or in the ideas that we develope from perception. 
In the application of these norms no judgment at all is 
passed upon the value of the objects of logical thought; 
although logical thinking itself, or the thinking subject^ con- 
sidered with reference to its thought-activities, can be sub- 
jected to such a judgment. The norms of ethics, on the 
contrary, are directly applicable to the free voluntary actions 
of thinking subjects, and to objects only indirectly, in so far 



7-8] Ethics as Science of Norms 9 

as they owe their origin to these voluntary actions. Here, 
therefore, the acting subject is, at the same time, the object 
that furnishes the material for our judgment of value. Hence 
it is plain that if the subject of logical thinking can be made 
the matter for a judgment of value, this is simply because it is 
at the same time an ethical object, — because logical thinking, 
regarded as a free activity of the will, can also be brought 
under the rubric of moral action. So far as logic includes 
among its problems the function of developing the criteria 
of correct thinking, and bringing to light the value of such 
thinking, it can, therefore, be termed an ethics of thinking. 
But the idea of ought has not the same significance for logic 
and ethics. In ethics the incentives to its formation exist in 
the objects under consideration ; in logic obligation originates 
only when logical inquiry is looked upon as a procedure which 
is subject to a judgment of value, i,e., as a form of moral 
conduct It follows that morality is the original source of 
the normative idea; that ethics is the original science of norms. 
From it the normative idea has travelled by two roads to all 
the departments of human knowledge. In one direction, 
more closely connected with its original sphere, the nor- 
mative idea has become dominant in those departments 
which, because of their subjective origin in voluntary actions, 
are related, as logic is preeminently, to ethical facts. In 
another, further removed from its original sphere, the norma- 
tive idea has been transformed into the conception of a 
universal reign of law, a conception which our thought applies 
to all the objects presented to it in external or internal 
experience. It is easy to see that the first of these transfor- 
mations had, necessarily, to prepare the way for the second. 
For in its demand that everything which *is* shall be subject 
to law, our logical thought is transferring its own normative 
character to its objects. It is true that this normative 
character of logical thinking could never have been developed 



lO Introduction [8-9 

without a corresponding constancy and conformity to law 
on the part of its objects. But since such conformity to 
law does not exist for us until it is apprehended by our 
thought, it is clear that, in the sequence of conditions, 
the precedence remains with logical thinking, — which, in 
its turn, is subordinate to the concept of the norm as 
understood in ethics. 

2. THE METHODS OF ETHICS. 

The early recognition of the normative character of ethics 
has exercised an unfavourable influence on the development 
of its methods. For it was natural to suppose that ethics, 
being normative in character, derived its principles from the 
same source, and must apply them in the same way as the 
normative science of knowledge, logic. And although this 
supposition is free from error in itself, the views held about 
the nature of logical norms have led to errors whose con- 
sequences are incomparably more far-reaching in the ethical 
than in the logical realm. 

We must admit, of course, if we look at the matter without 
prejudice, that the conditions of logical laws are the same 
with those of ethical. In neither domain can there be a 
form without contents; so that in both cases the abstract 
norms are merely products of thought, developed as the 
result of the interaction between thought and a manifold 
of experience. It is equally true, therefore, for logic and 
for ethics, that the laws which govern our apprehension of 
objects are always, at the same time, laws of the objects 
themselves; and that the real relations of things must, 
necessarily, be conceived of as in agreement with the prin- 
ciples whereby we systematise and connect them. But this 
agreement cannot possibly be held to precede the inter- 
action of thought and experience; it can manifest itself 
only in that interaction. Just as there are no objects of 



9-io] The Methods of Ethics 1 1 

experience without a thinking subject, so there can be no 
thinking subject without objects of experience. 

If, however, we abstract from this general relationship, 
we find that the conditions under which logic and ethics 
have developed are very different The objects which the 
laws of thought require for their most universal exemplifica- 
tion are of an extremely simple nature ; the laws have refer- 
ence to the simplest perceptual relations, those which present 
themselves at once in every item of perceptual experience. 
Ethical laws, on the contrary, plunge us into the midst of 
external voluntary actions, with all their complex intercon- 
nections. The logical laws of identity and contradiction, 
or the particular relations of perfect and partial coincidence 
of ideas, of subordination and dependence, which correspond 
to them, are evidently fulfilled in all cases where thought 
encounters objects. But even the most primitive moral 
judgments presuppose complex motives of the will, related 
quite as much to individual mental peculiarities as to the 
conditions arising from the common life of humanity. Very 
natural for logic, under the circumstances, was the assump- 
tion that the laws of thought are an original possession of 
the mind, antedating all experience, and subject to external 
influence only in their more complicated manifestations and 
developments: to ethics, uninfluenced by logic, no such 
assumption could have presented itself But the idea of 
the norm, dominant in ethics as in logic, brought the 
moralist to the logician's point of view : all the more easily 
as the obligatory character which attaches to the norm in 
r^ard to future actions belongs especially to the ethical 
norms, owing to their reference to practical volitional 
activity. Since in practice the command must precede 
the action that is done in accordance with it, it is natural 
to conclude that, in theory also, the norm is necessarily 
prior to its application. Hence it is that for many centuries 



1 2 Introduction [lo- 1 1 

the moral as well as the logical laws have commonly been 
regarded as an original possession of the mind, perfect in 
themselves, and capable of development merely in their 
applications ; or that — on the idea that every mental con- 
tents, like mind itself, must have some sort of beginning 
— a supersensible origin has been ascribed to ethical laws, 
and they themselves regarded as the bond that unites 
empirical existence with its eternal and ultimate source. 

Plainly, however, such a view as this had less hope of 
escaping contradiction here than in the logical domain. 
The dependence of the moral life on empirical conditions 
was too clearly manifest. Hence from the very first the 
attempt at an empirical deduction of ethical principles has 
been opposed to the a priori theory of their origin. In 
ancient ethics the two views are generally found together, 
reconciled by the notion of Plato and Aristotle that experi- 
ence is always an external means for bringing the ideas 
already existent in our minds to their full development 
In modern ethics, they tend more and more to diverge 
and to divide moralists into two hostile schools. There 
thus arises a radical disagreement as to the methods of 
ethics. For if the ethical norms are considered to be a 
permanent possession of the mind, independent of the 
changing conditions set up by external influences, the 
problem which they present to scientific inquiry can only be 
that of some reflective process, which shall raise the originally 
obscure ideas into clear consciousness. Such a reflective 
process necessarily involves definite hypotheses and methods. 
The hypotheses are derived from one's general view of the 
universe, of which the facts of morality form an integral 
part ; and the character of this general view determines, 
again, the logical or dialectical procedure which developes 
the idea of morality, and analyses it into its constituents. 
If, on the other hand, ethical laws are regarded as the effects 



ii] The Methods of Ethics 13 

of the empirical conditions under which human conduct is 
placed, it is clear that they themselves can be derived only 
from experience. In this event observation comes to be the 
most important instrument of ethical investigation, — whether 
in the sense of introspection of moral motives, or of objec- 
tive determination of the moral ends that have attained 
supremacy in the state and in society. 

The speculative method^ which pursues the first of these 
paths, has the very deceptive advantage of producing, so to 
speak, at one blow, a piece of work which takes its place 
harmoniously in the architecture of an universal system. It 
does not need to wait for observations, which may be possible 
only in an uncertain future ; it does not need to hesitate 
in face of ambiguous experiences. Guided by a definite and 
universal idea, it hastens without let or hindrance to its goal. 
Nevertheless, it attains this goal only by means of a self- 
deception, the results of which become obvious enough 
whenever it attempts to apply its principles. No one can 
escape the power of experience. If we try to avoid her 
on the high road, we cannot escape her on the by-ways ; 
all that we do is, instead of directing our attention so far 
as possible impartially to all parts of experience, to turn to 
some single fact, which for one reason or another lies right in 
our line of vision. In no department is the harm wrought 
by the speculative method so evident as in ethics, — plainly 
because of the enormous wealth of empirical facts which 
ethics has at its disposal. There is no ethical system of the 
speculative persuasion which does not lay stress upon some 
true and important fact of ethical experience; but it can 
be said also that there is no such system which does not 
exclude a multitude of other facts just as true, and, in part 
at least, just as important, and which is not for that reason 
inadequate as a system to many aspects of the moral life. 
The circumstance that speculative ethics defines its problem 



14 Introduction [11-12 

as the illumination of the entire domain of ethical facts by 
universal principles cannot compensate for this neglect. For 
it is one thing to make a survey from a standpoint already 
chosen ; it is another to choose one's standpoint after a 
previous examination of the whole field. 

It is this latter task that the empirical metltod regards 
as the task of ethics. Nevertheless, that same wealth of 
ethical facts, which proved the stumbling block of the 
speculative method, presents no less difficulty to the 
empirical. In its case, too, there is generally one definite 
group of experiences which is exclusively, or at least pre- 
dominantly, considered, because of a presupposition exist- 
ing in the mind of the inquirer that in these particular 
experiences morality finds its most complete realisation. 
Hence it happens that the empirical method branches, in 
its turn, in two different directions : as subjective it empha- 
sises those conditions of voluntary actions which present 
themselves to introspection ; while as objective it sets out 
from social and historical phenomena. Then, as if these 
were not enough, various conflicting standpoints appear 
within each of the two principal schools. The subjective 
method suffers from the current one-sidedness of psycho- 
logical inquiries, laying the main stress in one case upon 
reflection, in another upon the feelings, as motives of action. 
The objective method, to avoid being swamped by the 
multiplicity of ethical facts, either turns to the history and 
natural history of custom, or the general history of civilisa- 
tion, or else attempts to utilise for ethical purposes the norms 
that have obtained expression in the objective forms of law, 
or the incentives to action which have crystallised in the 
phenomena of economic life. Thus we have originating from 
the subjective method an ethics of reflection and an ethics 
of feeling, — which are at open feud with each other, — while 
the objective standpoint gives us an anthropological, an 



12-13] The Methods of Ethics 15 

historical, a juridical and an economic ethics. On this side, 
however, efforts to unite the special tendencies have not 
been altogether lacking. 

Now it is much easier, in face of this differentiation, to 
emphasise the essential unity and interconnection of the 
various kinds of ethical experience, than it is honestly to 
devote a like amount of attention to them all. But, granted 
that the unavoidable limitation of the individual horizon 
must always render the attempt of an individual inadequate, 
still we are at least bound to raise the question how far the 
conclusions drawn from a special department of experience 
require justification or amplification by the experiences 
gathered in other departments. The more experiences of 
this latter sort are utilised in the interest of ethics, the easier 
will it be for moralists of various persuasions to cease 
from mutual opposition, and to reap the fruits of united 
labour. 

What is true here of the separate branches of empirical 
investigation holds also, in a certain sense, of the relation 
between empirical and speculative ethics in general. For 
even supposing that all the facts furnished us by subjective 
and objective experience have been exhaustively investi- 
gated, still the scientific problem of ethics is not yet solved. 
That problem consists in the establishment of principles 
to which the facts of morality can be referred, or of which 
they may be considered as special applications, determined 
by the concurrence of principle with certain external condi- 
tions. Now it is true that the representatives of the empirical 
method are apt to believe that they can find these principles 
by means of that method, — taking it for granted that the 
principles must be of a psychological order, and therefore 
discoverable by direct introspection. Hence it comes about 
that the subjective empirical method has always asserted its 
supremacy over the objective, on the ground that it and 



1 6 IntrodMCtion [13-14 

it alone has the final voice in the solution of the funda- 
mental problems of ethics. 

Nevertheless, while it is evident enough that the objective 
facts of the moral life should be subjected, first of all, to 
a psychological test and, so far as possible, explained upon 
a psychological basis, yet to assume at the outset that all 
ethical phenomena are to be interpreted from the conditions 
of the subjective consciousness is to look at the entire moral 
world in a very one-sided way. It is conceivable that such 
an assumption may be justified by the result of investigation; 
but it is inadmissible to take a possible result as an axiom, 
and to bring this to bear from the very first in considering 
any and every body of ethical facts. Moreover, the objection 
that the invalidity of the assumption must be indicated by 
its contradiction with facts ofTers no reason for its precipi- 
tate adoption. It is always difficult to combat preconceived 
opinions by • experience ; and the empirical disproof of an 
axiom assumed at the beginning of an enquiry is almost 
impossible. If ever an insoluble contradiction does appear, 
experience yields to the axiom, not the axiom to experience. 
And this is especially true where, as in the present instance, 
the facts at issue are of a complex nature, and can be 
brought face to face with the axiom only after they have 
gone through all the possible stages of abstraction and 
interpretation. Abstraction in particular, valuable as it is, 
is unfortunately a procedure which occasionally furnishes 
a handy instrument for the elimination of inconvenient facts. 

If, then, a particular investigation, lying within the special 
domain of the empirical method, is inadequate of itself to 
furnish us with principles by whose aid we can gain an 
understanding of the facts of the moral world, the only 
thing to do is to make the whole range of these facts them- 
selves the basis of our inquiry. As may easily be foreseen, 
empirical observation, in ethical as in natural science, will 



14-15] The Methods of Ethics 1 7 

lead to postulates which are not themselves immediate facts 
of experience, but which must be added to these in order 
to make their interconnection intelligible. But principles 
that possess this character of postulates cannot ever be 
really discovered, but only the way paved for their discovery, 
by the empirical method. Their actual discovery is the task 
of speculation ; and speculation, in its turn, can look for a 
permanent result of its efforts only when it has full and 
complete possession of the gathered store of critically-tested 
scientific experience. 

In this way the speculative method receives its dues along 
with the empirical. The valid objection against the pre- 
vailing tendencies of speculative ethics is urged not against 
the method itself, but against the way in which it is applied. 
Ethics is neither a purely speculative nor a purely empirical 
discipline; like every general science, it is empirical and 
speculative at the same time. But in ethics as elsewhere 
it follows from the natural course of our thinking about 
things that the empirical procedure must come before the 
speculative. Observation must furnish the materials with 
which speculation erects its structure. 

In so far as ethics avails itself of speculation, it is a meta- 
physical discipline. For any investigation is metaphysical 
which is concerned with those assumptions as to the ultimate 
nature of things that are not immediately accessible to 
experience. Ethics is here especially valuable as supple- 
menting the metaphysical portion of natural science, which 
stands in an entirely analogous relation to the empirical 
study of natural phenomena. Our total conception of the 
cosmos includes the conceptions of a natural and of a moral 
order of things. Metaphysics presupposes both ethics and 
natural science ; and it thus becomes her task to bring these 
two forms of the conception of the cosmos into internal 
agreement, and so to establish a philosophy which does 
I. c 



1 8 Introduction [15-16 

equal justice to the needs of our theoretical knowledge and 
the requirements of our ethical consciousness. 

But although the empirical and speculative methods must 
be separated for the treatment of ethical problems, they are 
not to be regarded as two entirely different forms of thought 
It is rather true that they are complementary constituents of 
one and the same mode of procedure. There are no other 
methods than those which set out from an examination of 
experience; there are none which do not make exclusive 
use of the universally valid logical principles. The difference 
of methods is not rooted, therefore, in the logical pro<:edure 
itself, but simply in the ideas with which thought is operating. 
The empirical method maintains its supremacy so long as 
these ideas are direct abstractions and inductions from 
experience. Speculation begins, on the other hand, when- 
ever hypothetical elements enter into the formation of our 
ideas, — elements not derived from experience, but introduced 
into it under the influence of the logical requirement of unity 
of thought. Looked at in this way, the speculative method is 
no more specifically philosophical than any other ; it finds its 
first application in the special sciences, and is then employed 
again in the cardinal branches of philosophy, and more 
particularly in ethics. Philosophy does not employ it in 
any new or peculiar way, but only more comprehensively, 
with more regard to the complexity of that experience upon 
which our knowledge is based. 

3. THE PROBLEMS OF ETHICS. 

Although ethics, as a normative science, is not only related 
to logic but in a certain sense may be said to stand above it, 
the logical method of investigating and presenting facts is ill 
adapted to ethical inquiry. The perceptions upon which 
logical principles are founded are of so simple a nature that 
the logician can take his rules for granted without proof. 



i6] The Problems of Ethics 19 

In ethics the process is reversed ; the discovery of the ethical 
norms must precede their establishment And the facts with 
which ethics has to do are of so complicated a nature, that 
this search for norms proves to be one of the most difficult 
and extensive of ethical problems. The inquiry can, once 
more, be pursued by two different methods. The original 
source of ethical knowledge is the moral consciousness of 
man, as it finds objective expression in the universal percep- 
tions of right and wrong, and, further, in religious ideas and 
in custom. The most direct method for the discovery of 
ethical principles is, therefore, the anthropological method. 
We use this term in a wider sense than is customary, to 
include ethnic psychology, the history of primitive man 
and the history of civilisation, as well as the natural history 
of mankind. 

A second method open to us is that of scientific reflection 
upon ethical concepts. It too, of course, draws its materials 
from the moral consciousness. But it goes beyond the bare 
data, the ethical facts, introducing reflection upon the facts, 
and attempting their analysis and classification under general 
points of view. And granted that the attempt, as we remarked 
just now, is generally characterised by a one-sided treatment 
of some special aspects of the subject-matter, still, such 
one-sidedness is in a measure compensated by the fact that 
the different ethical tendencies supplement each other. For 
this reason it is indispensable that a criticism of the various 
ethical systems should go along with any consideration of 
the historical development of ethical ideas. 

After this twofold inductive preparation, — an investigation 
of the original moral consciousness and scientific reflection 
on ethical ideas, — we reach the peculiar problem of systematic 
ethics. This is again twofold. Ethics has first of all to 
evolve, from the facts furnished to it, the principles on which 
all judgments of moral value rest; to show how they 



20 Introduction 



[16-17 



originate, and to determine their interrelations. It has then 
further to consider the applications of these principles to the 
great provinces of the moral life : to the family, to govern- 
ment, to the state and to society. Only the first of these 
two problems falls within the sphere of a general ethics. 
The second takes us at once into the special ethical 
sciences: pedagogy, the philosophy of law, the philosophy 
of society and of history. All these require separate 
treatment, adapted to the importance and magnitude of 
their problems. 



Part I. 

THE FACTS OF THE MORAL LIFE. 



i8] 



CHAPTER I. 

LANGUAGE AND ETHICAL IDEAS. 
I. THE GENERAL IDEA OF MORALITY. 

(a) History of the words ' ethisch' (ethical)^ 'tnoralisch * (moral) 

and ' sittlickJ 

LANGUAGE is the oldest witness to the course of 
-^ development of all human ideas. Before any other 
form of tradition grows up, language has given definite names 
to the dominant conceptions of the popular consciousness ; 
and the word, with its many changes and refinements of 
meaning, is a mirror of the gradual development and 
mutation of ideas. Hence it is to language that we must 
put our first questions in investigating the origin of ethical 
ideas. 

At the same time, this capacity of language for develop- 
ment, a capacity which seems inexhaustible, more especially 
as it affects the meaning of words, obliges us to use its 
testimony with caution in our attempt to draw conclusions 
as to the conceptions which it originally expressed. On 
the one side there is no small danger that meanings of 
late origin be referred back to the earliest stages of 
language, and that ideas which arose under stress of indi- 
vidual or specifically scientific requirements be regarded as 
primitive deliverances of the popular consciousness; while, 
on the other, the absence of sharply separated linguistic 
symbols cannot be interpreted, without further evidence, as 

23 



24 Language and Ethical Ideas [19 

indicating a defective discrimination of ideas. It is probable 
that homonyms played a very large part in primitive 
language. Hence only such usage as is preserved in 
literary monuments can enable us to determine with perfect 
certainty whether given ideas exist or not ; and only when 
we are thus in a position to trace the history of a word 
through all its changes of meaning, is it possible for us to 
draw conclusions from them, with any degree of certainty 
as to the development of consciousness. 

The need of this caution is shown in the very first problem 
that meets us in the investigation of ethical ideas on linguistic 
ground, — the question of the origin and significance of the 
general ethical terms that have come into use. It is usually 
regarded as profoundly significant that language brings the 
'moral* and the 'customary' (the Sittlk/ie and Sitte) into 
such close connection. The fact that this reference to 
'custom' {mos, eQoi) is found in at least three different 
languages, Greek, Latin and German, is supposed to be a 
proof that the connection is not accidental, but rather 
points to a way of looking at things which is natural and 
necessary to the human consciousness. It has even been 
regarded as a special merit of the German language, as 
compared with Greek, Latin and the ancient oriental tongues, 
that the words by which it expresses the two concepts have 
gradually become differentiated, and the idea of the ethical 
thereby more clearly distinguished from that of the customary 
and the legal. ^ But we find no confirmation of these con- 
jectures in the actual history of the word Sittlichkeit The 
connection between the * moral ' and the 'customary' is not of 
native growth either in German or in Latin ; it is due to 
the influence of Greek usage. And even in Greek it had no 
root in any ultimate tendency of the popular consciousness,- 
but was effected by one man, no less a personage than the 

* Rudolph von Jhering, Der Zweck im Rcchi, ii. pp. 50, 59. 



i9-«o] The General Idea of Morality 25 

great realistic moralist of the Hellenic world. Aristotle drew 
a distinction between ethical and intellectual (dianoetic) 
virtues : the word ' ethics ' (rfiiKo) was adopted later by his 
school to cover the subjects treated under both headings. 
In making it, he used jyfloy primarily in the sense of character 
and disposition. But his inquiry into the origination and 
confirmation of moral character led him to emphasise 
instruction and practice as the principal incentives to in- 
tellectual and ethical virtue respectively; and the close re- 
lationship of the words ^©09 and tQoq seemed to him to be 
in itself an argument for the connection between virtue and 
custom.^ Modern philology also considers the words to have 
been originally identical, and thus decides in favour of the 
etymological essay of the ancient philosopher. But there 
can be no doubt that in the linguistic usage of his time their 
significance was felt to be different. "'E^oy, like the allied 
Latin term consuetude^ laid the chief emphasis upon external 
custom. In the case of §©09, the earlier and narrower signifi- 
cance, still retained in Homer, of the abiding-place of men 
or animals had been changed to that of the disposition 
resulting from the familiar environment, — a change of mean- 
ing which is typical of the origin of a large number of terms 
denoting psychical states and mental characteristics. There 
can be no question that Aristotle, when he called the virtues 
which are rooted in disposition and character ' ethical,' was 
thinking principally of this secondary significance, which 
even at the present day marks off 'ethos' as specifically 
different from custom. The thought of an etymological 
connection with the like-sounding edo?, a word familiar to 
him in the sense of *use and wont,' was first suggested to 
the philosopher by his own ethical theory; the theory can 
hardly owe its origin to a fact of linguistic relationship which 

^ Nicom, Ethics ^ D. I. Cf, the very similar passage in the Magn, MoraL^ 
A. 6 : r6 Tdp ^m awb tov iOovs (x^^ '''^^ irwvfiUuf, 



26 Language and Ethical Ideas [20-21 

had long since disappeared from the general linguistic con- 
sciousness. 

The Romans borrowed all their philosophical terminology 
from the Greeks, and that of ethics is no exception to the 
rule. Thus the term moralis^ which gave rise to the expres- 
sion philosophia moralis, was a direct translation of Aristotle. 
Cicero remarks expressly, in the passage where he introduces 
the word, that he has formed it on the analogy of the Greek 
nQiKo^ *in order to enrich the Latin language,*^ The Latin 
word mos is, as a matter of fact, by no means synonymous 
with fjdoq in the Aristotelian sense; the Roman originally 
meant by mosy mores merely the externals of custom, or 
the characteristic of ordering one's conduct in accordance 
with current standards: but this Cicero overlooked. The 
term moralitaSy from the adjective moralis^ does not occur 
in classical Latin.^ It passed into the modem Romance 
languages and into English from ecclesiastical Latin, in 
which it had a great vogue. In German, it is highly probable 
that the word sittlich = moralis is simply a rough trans- 
lation of the Latin term, and that its adoption led to the 
formation of Sittlichkeit as the equivalent of the substantive 
moralitas. This view is borne out by the fact that in Middle 
High German the word sittlich {sitelich) is used exclusively 
in the sense of the modem sittig, to mean * modest,' * seemly,' 
* according to custom,' while the word Sittlichkeit is not found.^ 

Such is the result of an inquiry into the linguistic usage 
of the civilised peoples with whom we are most nearly 

' DefatOf I. {Opera^ ed. Orelli, iv. p. 567.) 

' The lexicons name Macrobius as the writer who first used the substantive 
mortUitas, In the only passage where the word occurs in Macrobius (ScU, , Lib. y. , 
c I, 16), however, it does not mean morality; the author is speaking of the 
'moralitas stili/ the character of a style. According to Ducange's Glossarium 
nov, ad script, med, aev,^ Ambrosius, a Church father, living about the same time 
(the end of the fourth century), is the first who uses moralitas in the sense of 
morum probitas. 

' M. Lexer, Mittelhochdcutsches Taschenworterbuch^ 2 Aufl., Leipzig, 1881. 



21-22] The General Idea of Morality 27 

concerned. When we remember, further, that in every other^ 
instance where we can interrogate the natui^ linguistic 
consciousness we find only names for individual virtues andj / 
special moral excellences, it seems fair to conclude that the f 
concept of the ethical in general does not arise except by way ) 
of scientific reflection. This does not mean that the primitive^ 
consciousness was entirely lacking in anticipations of itV 
Praise and blame are such natural expressions of the way \ 
in which we regard the actions of our fellow-men, that they 
could not have been wanting even while the capacity for 
ethical discrimination was in its crudest stage; and as soon as 
there was praise and blame, all the acts that were ' praise- 
worthy/ different as they might be in details, would necessarily 
be felt to belong together. But between this instinctive] 
grouping and the conscious union of the various ethical; 
phenomena under a single concept, there lies a long labour 
of abstract thought, such as always requires science for its 
accomplishment. On the other hand, as science, in forming | 
its concepts, has invariably followed the natural lines of 
connection and division, it follows, of course, that scientific 
ideas have in turn had a strong reactive influence on the 
general consciousness and its ideational contents as coined 
into language. / 

(b) 'Good' and 'Bad: 

The marks of this influence are seen most clearly in certain 
ideas which had so far developed, before the general idea of 
morality took shape, as practically to cover the antithesis of 
' praiseworthy ' and ' blameworthy': the ideas of good and bad. 
No languages seem to be without them; but in none is their 
original significance precisely the same. Thus the Hindoo 
identities the good with the true, the bad with the untrue. 
The Greek uses ayaOo^ to indicate personal bravery and other 
commendable characteristics; a sense which reminds us of 



28 Language and Ethical Ideas [22-23 

the peculiar connection of the *good' and the 'beautiful' in 
the Greek mind. In the Latin bonus, on the other hand, the 
original stress is upon the material gifts of fortune, and 
the superiority of birth which goes with them. Lastly, the 
English good and German gut are etymologically connected 
with the German Gatte, and so mean 'fitting/ — a fact which 
seems to indicate a high esteem for any generally useful 
aptitude.^ Similar varieties of meaning have become stereo- 
typed in the words which group the total sum of praiseworthy 
characteristics under an abstract objective idea. The Greek 
apcTT/, for examplej points us to the outward circumstance of 
personal courage and the other moral attributes; the Latin 
virtus lays emphasis upon manliness and steadfastness of 
character ; while in German the reference to what is suitable 
and fitting is even more explicit to the modern linguistic 
consciousness in the substantive Tugend than it is in the 
adjective^/. 

So the familiar statement that it is never really possible 
to translate the words of one language into another receives 
what is, perhaps, its very strongest confirmation in the case 
of ethical terminology. At the same time, we should not 
hastily infer from this that there was originally no agreement 
at all as regards the morally praiseworthy and blameworthy. 
Steadfastness was as certainly esteemed a virtue by the 
Hindoo as truthfulness by the Romans or ancient Germans. It 
is only the relative estimation of the different moral attributes 
that varies. And even this difference has grown gradually 
less, in the natural course of development of the popular 
consciousness, under the influence of an universal tendency 
in the formation of concepts : the tendency to the continual 
enlargement of the meanings of words. The most striking 

' For the Hindoo usage cf, Abel Bergaignb, Religion vidique cTapris Us 
hymnes du Rig- Veda, p. 179. For the Greek, cf, Leop. Schmidt, Die Etkik 
der alien Griecken, i. p. 289. For German, cf, ScHADB, AUdeutsches Worler- 
buck, 3 Aufl., p. 358. 



23-24] ^^ General Idea of Morality 29 

praiseworthy attribute comes to serve more and more as a 
designation for the praiseworthy in general. The unity of 
the moral personality, in which different virtues are always 
manifested together, was a great incentive to this extension 
of meaning, suggesting as it must the use of the term 
* good ' to denote the union of a whole number of personal 
traits. But here too the final step remained for philosophical 
ethics. Just as it had created a general designation for 
morality, so it gave the ideas of * good,' * bad ' and * virtue ' 
a more widely-reaching value and significance, in which the 
old national and local shading of ethical appreciation dis- 
appeared, leaving only those last indelible traces which even 
philosophy cannot completely do away with. So the gradual 
levelling out of specific ethical preferences goes hand in 
hand with the formation of the general concept of morality, 
both processes alike finding their completion only in scientific 
ethical reflection. 

Now it is an universal characteristic of change of meaning 
in words that external, sensible properties furnish designations 
for the facts of the inner, mental life. In the terms 'good' 
and ' bad,' the traces of this sensible origin are exceedingly 
clear. Indeed, they are perhaps more obvious here than any- 
where else, since both meanings, the sensible and the ethical, 
have remained side by side in ordinary use. We speak to- 
day of a ' good dinner ' as naturally as we speak of a ' good 
action,' and of a 'bad tooth' as naturally as of a 'bad 
conscience ' : and the same phenomenon recurs in the corre- 
sponding words of all languages. But wherever we can 
procure evidence of the original significance of a word, we 
find that it comes closer to the sensible than to the ethical 
meaning : and we have consequently every right to suppose 
that the ethical application grew out of the sensible, how- 
ever early in the history of language the transference may 
have taken place. Possibly, the very fact that it did take place 



30 Language and Ethical Ideas [24-25 

at an early period has assured the continuance of the sensible 
meaning of ' good ' and * bad/ For in this respect the words 
stand in marked contrast with other comparatively recent 
terms of the ethical vocabulary, in which an original non- 
ethical significance has been entirely displaced by ethical 
usage.^ 

It is also possible that the very early transference of 
meaning from sensible to ethical, in the words for ' good ' 
and 'bad,' accounts for a peculiarity which appears to 
attach to these adjectives in language, almost without 
exception : I mean the fact that all the words for ' good,' 
and the great majority of those for * bad,' originally possess 
no degrees of comparison, and that language has therefore 
been compelled to have recourse for their formation to 
other word-stems. The reader will think at once of the 
English good and better^ of the Latin bonus and melior, 
of the Greek ay 0609 and jSeXrlcop or ajj^elvonv, etc In 
the case of * bad ' or ' evil,' the phenomenon is not 
quite so constant. It is true that the Latin malus 
has the comparative form pejor ; but Greek very soon 
renounced the borrowing process, — we find kokIcov and 
KaKi(rT09 even in Homer. In English we have bad and 
worse; and in German there is a certain tendency to 
avoid the direct comparative: the forms boser^ boseste 
do not appear till Middle High German, and in modern 
usage are preferably replaced by other derivatives, eg,^ 
schlechter (in Luther's German, drger). These linguistic 
phenomena have been regarded as evidence that the popular 
consciousness is inclined to give the term ' good ' an absolute 

^ One of the most striking examples of this kind is the word ' egoism,' which 
originated about the year 1700 in the French Cartesian school. It was used 
at first in the sense of subjectivism or scepticism, and did not acquire the ethical 
meaning now generally current till toward the close of the eighteenth century. 
Cf. my article Das Sittliche in dcr Sprctche^ in the Deutsche Rundschau^ 1886, 
xiL p. 7a 



25-26] The General Idea of Morality 31 

value, which excludes any idea of more or less.^ But it is 
to be noted as against such an interpretation, that besides 
the word for ' bad/ those for * great ' and * small ' show some- 
thing of the same character; and that, generally speaking, 
the formation of derivatives from different word-stems to 
express related ideas is not by any means unusual : cf., e^.^ 
the forms of the auxiliary verb. On the other hand, the 
phenomena seem to be confined to very old linguistic 
formations, dating from a time when language could still 
derive ideas of similar meaning from different modes of 
sense perception. Here, then, is another fact, which, like 
the continuance of a secondary sensible meaning alongside 
of the ethical, noticed just now, bears valuable testimony 
to the early origination of moral ideas. It is further charac- 
teristic that the change of form in degrees of comparison 
is limited to a group of adjectives which can be employed 
directly, for the description of an individual man, in cases 
where there is no intention of comparing him with other 
objects possessed of similar attributes. In this sense, there- 
fore, we may very well say that language attaches an absolute 
value to the terms, ' good,' ' bad,' ' great ' and ' small.' But 
the absolute significance is nothing more than that, ^^., 
which belongs to the proper name. The adjectives have 
been employed like proper names, — often, perhaps, in place 
of them, — as constant designations of particular persons. 
In such cases the idea of quantitative comparison is alto- 
gether absent. Hence in the quite different cases where 
comparison does come in question, it is natural that recourse 
should be had to different word-formations. Even so, how- 
ever, the uniform lack of normal degrees of comparison for 
the term 'good' marks that word off from the remaining 
three, and may be regarded as a sign of constant and especial 
attention to the praiseworthy features of human personality. 

* Schmidt, Die Etkik der alten Griechen^ i. p. 289. 



32 Language and Ethical Ideas [26 

The influence of the moral personality^ which shows so 
clearly in these facts, is seen quite as plainly in the pheno- 
mena of the development and diff*erentiation of particular 
ethical ideas. There, too, the study of language leads 
inevitably to the conclusion that the idea of morality is at 
first intimately connected with the person and with personal 
conduct, and that its severance from this substrate is a very 
slow and gradual process. Only in course of time do ethical 
ideas acquire an objective significance of their own, so that 
they can be made topics of thought without any direct 
reference to the concrete contents of an actual moral life. 

2. THE DEVELOPMENT OF SPECIAL MORAL IDEAS. 

(a) The Separation of Ethical Ideas from their Substrate. 

The gradual severance of individual ethical ideas from the 
substrate of moral personality and conduct upon which they 
were originally based is a process that stands in the most 
intimate connection with the formation of general ethical 
concepts. No general idea of morality is possible, indeed, 
until the process of separation has run its full course in the 
individual case. Hence the antithesis of good and bad, 
which contains the germ of the general idea of morality, 
was at first inextricably bound up with the sensible idea 
of a person whose actions call forth the admiration or dis- 
approval of his fellow-men. 

In the present instance, however, the use of good and bad 
to denote personal characteristics seems to have passed over 
into an impersonal and objective use at a relatively early 
period. A connecting link between the two uses was 
furnished by the application of the words to desirable and 
undesirable objects ; and when the impersonal meaning had 
established itself, the step to a still more abstract ethical 
significance could be taken without much difficulty. Thus 



26-27] Development of Special Moral Ideas 33 

' goods/ bona^ to, ayaOa, in the sense of material possessions, 
t^., as referred to sensible objects, undoubtedly come earlier 
in the history of language than ' good/ etc., as applied to 
ethical actions and intentions. And it may well be that 
' good/ in this latter meaning, originally carried with it the 
consciousness of a metaphorical transference of the kind that 
we still feel to-day when, e.£^,, we call virtue a 'good/ 

But variety of usage and significance is not the only thing 
that puts the stamp of primitiveness and originality upon the 
terms * good ' and * bad/ Nowhere do these attributes appear 
more clearly than in the technical, ethical employment of the 
words to denote abstract objective ideas: their adjectival 
character is writ large upon them. In many other cases 
all traces of this origin in the adjective have been obliterated, 
the derivation of the word belonging to a remote period in 
the history of language for which we have lost all linguistic 
feeling. Nevertheless, the derivation is always a reality. 
Wherever an abstract ethical idea can be traced back to 
its first beginnings, the adjectival starting-point .becomes 
clearly discernible. Thus Tugeiid (virtue) comes from das 
Taugeftde (Old High German tugan^taugen, *to be worth' 
or ' fit '), Laster (vice) means ' what is blameworthy ' (Ja/ian = 
tade/u, * to blame ') and virtus is ' manliness ' (z^/r). But the 
dependence of ethical ideas upon the concrete moral per- 
sonality and moral conduct is shown most plainly in the 
compound words which belong to a comparatively late 
period of linguistic development. In Greek we have, eg,, 
ca^payaOia from ayado?, Soucaioa-vvri from SUaio^, evg-i^eia 
from ei/o'€j8>/9, acotppoavvri from o'dtppayv, etc. German, like 
Greek, has an almost unlimited capacity for the formation 
of such compounds. The Greek terms, however, are derived 
immediately from an idea of a personal attribute; the 
Grerman, probably on account of the relatively later differ- 
entiation of moral ideas, are more often taken from already 
I. D 



34 Language and Ethical Ideas [27-28 

existing substantive forms, which in most instances get their 
specific ethical character by the fact of composition. Thus, 
besides Sittlichkeit (morality) itself, there are Edelmuth 
(generosity), Mitkid (sympathy), Schadenfreude (malicious- 
ness), Eigennutz (selfishness), Selbstliebe (self-love), SelbsU 
sucht (egoism), and many others. It often happens, further, 
that these late-formed concepts give rise, as it were by a 
reaction of the formative process, to new adjectives : der 
Edeltnuthige, Mitleidige^ Eigennutzige, etc But we are 
manifestly dealing in all these cases with a vocabulary 
that has been strongly influenced by scientific reflection, 
so that only the constituents from which the moral ideas 
were formed, and not the ideas themselves, can be claimed 
as a possession of the primitive race-consciousness. 

It has been considered a significant ethical tendency in 
language that negative expressions should be chosen for 
the designation of the various forms of immorality, and that, 
while virtue may always be changed into vice by a negative 
prefix, the process cannot be reversed. Injustice (Unrechi) 
stands opposed to justice (Recht\ immorality (Unsitte) to 
morality {Sitte), discord {Unfriede) to concord {Friede): 
Untngettd (vice) is the antithesis of Tugend (virtue), 
dishonour {Ehriosigkeit) of honour (Ehre\ unfaithfulness 
( Untreue) of faithfulness ( Treue), and so on. But we have 
no negative forms from crime, avarice, hate, pride and the 
like. These facts are thought to furnish a proof that, on 
the one hand, the idea of the morally praiseworthy took 
shape in many instances at an earlier period than its opposite, 
and that, on the other, vice presents itself to the linguistic 
consciousness as a mere negation of virtue, but not virtue 
as a mere negation of vice.^ 

Now it would in any event be dangerous to draw such 
wide - reaching conclusions from phenomena that are, in 

* Rudolph von Jhbring, Zweck im Recht^ il pp. 78 ff. 



28-29] Development of Special Moral Ideas 35 

lai^e proportion, peculiar to the linguistic usage of modern 
German. But that apart, we cannot grant that the facts 
themselves are as they are represented to be. In the first 
place, the most fundamental antitheses of all — good and 
bad, virtue and vice — have been expressed in positive form ; 
and, secondly, the cases in which a morally praiseworthy 
attribute is changed into its opposite by negation can be 
paralleled by numerous examples where the reverse is true. 
Thus innocence {Unschuld) is the correlate of guilt {Schuld\ 
sinlessness {Siindlosigkeit) of sin (Sunde), ungrudgingness 
{Neidlosigkeit) of envy (Neid)y unselfishness (Selbstlosigkeit) 
of selfishness {Selbststicht), We also have the terms guile- 
less (arglos)y fearless {furchtlos\ harmless {unschddltch)^ 
irreproachable {unbesckolten), incorruptible {unbestecklick)^ 
immaculate {unbefleckt)^ inoffensive (Jiarmlos^ unanstdssig)^ 
etc., — all of them expressions which designate a praise- 
worthy moral attribute by the negation of its opposite. 
And if there does prove to be a slight preponderance of 
negative forms on the immoral side,^ still we cannot see in 
the fact a characteristic of ethical ideas as such. It is simply 
an illustration of a general law which governs the choice 
of names for everything that can occasion human pleasure 
or displeasure. Where there are not special and, as a rule, 
obvious reasons to the contrary, it is usual to designate what 
is pleasurable by positive, and what is unpleasurable by 
negative terms. We should not, of course, be justified in 
arguing from this that pleasure arises earlier than pain. It 
is a familiar psychological observation that the two qualities 
are necessarily interdependent ; and in any case we must 

^ With the help of some dictionaries, I have made a small essay in statistics 
to discover what proportion of German words for moral ideas begins with un, 
I fiiid that the negative designations of blameworthy stand to the negative 
designations of praiseworthy attributes approximately ill the relation of 3:2. 
If we turn to Latin, and make the words formed by the privative in the basis 
of our calculation, we get a still greater difference : the proportion is very 
nearly 3 : i. 



36 Language and Ethical Ideas [29-30 

assume that they are both as old as, if not older than, man 
himself, since there is unmistakable evidence of their presence 
in the animal mind. Long before language had developed, 
therefore, the affective opposites which language was some 
day to name were already in existence. Now the more 
sharply two contrasting ideas were felt to be opposed, 
when the time for naming came, the more natural was it 
to express one of them by the negation of the other. This 
does not mean that it is a matter of sheer accident that 
unpleasurable things are ofteilest designated by negative 
forms. But the reason is most certainly not to be found 
in the fact that only a positively named idea has a positive 
contents, and that the negative idea is apprehended merely 
as the negation of the positive. In the sphere of the 
sense feelings, where we also have the antitheses of 'agree- 
able * and ' disagreeable,' ' happy ' and * unhappy,* the 
diametrically opposite position has frequently been taken, 
that the essence of pleasure lies simply in the absence 
of displeasure and pain. This is an exaggeration in the 
other direction ; but so much at least is true, that in general 
both feelings alike possess a positive contents, while in the 
individual case sometimes one and sometimes the other is 
the more positive. Virtue is more than a mere negation 
of vice, but vice in its turn is just as little a mere negation 
of virtue as pain is a mere negation of pleasure. 

There is, moreover, another reason which seems amply 
sufficient to explain the attraction for negative expressions 
possessed by what is disagreeable and blameworthy : I 
mean the relationship that obtains psychologically between 
disagreeable feelings and the logical function of negation. 
As in negation we reject a proposition that has been 
conceived of as possible, so the unpleasurable emotion 
turns away from the painful object. In both instances the 
direction of volition is away from something presented; 



30-31] Development of Special Moral Ideas 37 

and consequently logical negation is attended by a feeling 
— in cases where the judgment is at all strenuous, by a 
very pronounced feeling — which has all the characteristics 
of the psychological feeling of unpleasantness. Under such 
circumstances it is readily intelligible that moral disapproval 
should connect more easily than moral approbation with a 
negative expression. But if any inference at all is to be 
drawn from this fact to the development of ethical ideas, 
it is simply that moral ideas, as their formulation in pairs 
of opposites still shows, are very closely connected with 
the activity of consciousness in pleasurable and unpleasur- 
able emotions. 

As a matter of fact, there are many other linguistic 
phenomena which indicate that this relation of moral 
approbation and disapprobation to the sense feelings does 
not depend upon a merely external analogy, but upon an 
original identity. The moral feelings have, we may assume, 
been developed from the feelings of sense by a specific 
process of differentiation. The first beginnings of this 
process are, of course, beyond the reach of proof But 
that the differentiation is still in progress is evidenced by 
what we may call an inwardising of moral ideas, along 
with which goes a continuous and, for the most part, 
parallel change of meaning in the ethical vocabulary. 

{b) The Deepening of Moral Conceptions. 

As compared with the transference of sensible meanings to 
the ethical sphere in the case of the general ideas of * good ' 
and * bad,* the change of significance now to be discussed 
might be termed a latent change. The character of the ideas 
remains on the whole what it always was; but their deeper 
reference and emotional value alter. The change takes place 
so slowly that we arc usually obliged to compare civilisations 
separated by relatively long periods of time in order to 



38 Language and Ethical Ideas [31 

discover its presence at all. And yet in the course of cen- 
turies there appear differences so great that almost the only 
points which ethical conceptions of the same name have 
in common may consist in continuity of development and 
the general sense of moral approbation and disapprobation. 
A striking example of this continuous change in ethical 
conceptions is afforded by the general term Tugend (virtue) 
itself. It is clear that from the first the word has been used 
principally to denote that which is morally approved ; but its 
particular shade of meaning differs in the different civilised 
peoples, varying with the national character. The German 
word, as we saw above (p. 33), emphasises the idea of fitness, 
probably in the sense of fitness for service in matters of peace 
and war ; the Greek arete and the Latin virtus point to other 
root meanings, which again differ from each other. The Greek 
stands nearest to the German. But the verb aperaio com- 
bines the two meanings of fitness and success ; and arete is 
similarly distinguished from Tugend^ in that it unites the idea 
of ability with that of the respect which ability commands.^ 
The worth of the person or of the act does not in itself 
satisfy the Greek : he requires that both take their due place 
in the eyes of the world. Fitness of character, ability, can 
hope for recognition only when connected with physical 
beauty. Hence we have in arete a blending of the three 
elements of ability, beauty and outward respect. There can 
be no doubt that originally the most external of these, the 
element of respect, was predominant. But it yields more 
and more, especially in the poets and orators of the Attic 
period, to the personal characteristics that call it forth ; until 
finally, in philosophical ethics, arete comes chiefly to mean 
those special personal characteristics that are necessary for 
the discharge of the great human and social duties, reverence 
of parents, the exercise of hospitality, the conduct of private 

^ L. Schmidt, DU Eihik der <ilUn Griechen^ i. 295 ff. 



32] Development of Special Moral Ideas 39 

and public affairs, — whereas the outward advantages of 
beauty, strength, intrepidity, etc, upon which so much stress 
had once been laid, become of subordinate importance. 

In Latin the idea of virtus has passed through a similar 
development Originally, its meaning was, as Cicero remarks, 
almost identical with that of fortitude, manly steadfastness. 
Gradually, and again under the influence of poetry and 
philosophy, themselves in large measure determined, of 
course, by their Greek prototypes, it took on a deeper signi- 
ficance, and came to be used principally to denote moral 
excellence. But we have, perhaps, an indication that the 
influence did not extend very far, at any rate not far enough 
to affect the real popular consciousness, in the curious fact that 
virtus retained its older and less inward significance, along 
with the new, much more fully than Tugend, or even than 
arete. Thus not only courage in war, but also oratorical 
skill and bodily health are, on occasion, called virtus. The 
first step toward a deeper conception has here been taken : 
an inner meaning has been superadded to the originally 
external significance, and has by slow degrees obtained the 
upper hand. But . the second step, the complete stripping 
away of the external significance, has not yet been accom- 
plished. Nevertheless, we see plainly enough, despite the 
differences in the course of development of the three ideas, 
that the goal in each case — a goal, it is true, never quite 
attained — is the abolition of original national distinctions; 
and that philosophical reflection has played no small part 
in the process of equalisation (cf. p. 25). 

All the words which express particular phases of the 
ethical character or of ethical valuation have followed a 
like course of development, so far as they are of ancient 
origin at all. Thus in German (and we shall confine our- 
selves here to German terms), aside from the antithetic 
ideas of good and bad discussed above, we may mention 



40 Language and Ethical Ideas [32-33 

words like gerecht (just), fromm (gentle, devout), stolz 
(proud), tUckisch (malicious), schlecht (evil), Achtung 
(esteem), Wurde (dignity), Ehre (honour), etc. Gerecht 
originally had the same meaning as the Latin rectus^ 'he 
who goes the straight way.' It is used in the older language 
in the sense of * clever * or ' fit,* and comes from the root reg^ 
the primitive significance of which is retained most purely in 
the Latin regere, * to guide.' From the same root we have 
further the substantive Recht (law), in the sense of externally 
established social order. This idea of law has probably 
reacted, in turn, upon the conception of ^h€\\\^ gerecht' \ so 
that now the just man is the man who acts in accordance 
with the law, who is free from guilt Not till this reaction 
has taken place is the ethical contents of the idea assured. 

The original meaning of fromm is still kept in some 
measure in the v^vh frommen, * to be of use,' * to further.' Der 
Fromme is the useful man, the excellent man ; at an earlier 
stage of the language perhaps the 'chief man (the Gothic 
fruma corresponds exactly with the Latin primus). In fromm, 
therefore, a general idea of precedence has been narrowed 
down first of all to the idea of preeminence by personal 
characteristics, and then further to that of the preeminence 
of a God-fearing, religious disposition.^ The word edet has 
undergone a very similar change in meaning. The only 
difference is that the idea of nobility of birth (Adel, with 
which edet is etymologically connected) has held its place 
alongside of the predominant ethical significance of the term, 
although of less frequent occurrence in ordinary usage. 

The same inwardising process can be traced in the history 
of the words that express moral disapproval. The adjective 
stots was formerly applied exclusively to a vain, ostentatious 
character ; so that it has been derived, though in all pro- 
bability wrongly, from the Latin stuttus, * foolish.' A better 

* Grimm's Worierbiuk^ iv. i, p. 239. 



33-34] Development of Special Moral Ideas 41 

derivation connects it with the old German word Stelze, 
* stilts/ Tiicke, knavery, is a misunderstood plural of the 
older word Tuck^ which means a quick and unexpected 
blow. The Tiuk was perfectly fair in battle or tourney ; 
and the word, like so many others, had no bad secondary 
meaning till it was transferred to the inner attributes of 
character. Lastly, we have a very remarkable pair of 
similar ethical adjectives in sc/Uimm and scldeclU. At the 
present day they mean pretty much the same thing; but, 
originally, they were opposites. Schlimm (Middle High 
German slimp) is 'crooked,' and schlecht {sleht) is 'straight' 
It is supposed that schlecht got its bad meaning by way of 
tlie intermediate stages of 'simple,' 'plain,' 'poor,' 'mean.' 
In the phrase scJdecht und rechty which has come down to us 
from Luther's German, schlecht is still used in the old sense : 
the adjectives are synonymous and reinforce each other. 
That two words of practically the same original significance 
should develope in diametrically opposite directions can 
have happened only through that transference of meaning 
from without inwards, in course of which one and the same 
sensible image may come to have entirely different emotional 
and intellectual value, according to the light in which it is 
regarded. In one case, straightness becomes symbolic of the 
good character, which contemns deceit and subterfuge. In 
the other, it stands for the narrow disposition, that pursues 
only low and selfish aims. 

In all the instances that we have taken so far, the deepening 
of ethical significance takes place by a shift of emphasis from 
external to internal attributes. The same result can be pro- 
duced in another way, by a change of meaning in expressions 
that refer to the estimate put upon moral attributes by the out- 
side observer. The whole ethical vocabulary falls into two 
great divisions : words that denote ethical characteristics, like 
'good' and 'bad/ and words that indicate the estimate put 



42 Langtiage and Ethical Ideas [34-35 

upon ethical characteristics, like 'esteem* and 'contempt* 
Words of the second class show the same shift of emphasis 
as words of the first. They may also undergo the further 
change of transformation into ideas of the other class : that 
is to say, they may exchange their objective meaning for a 
subjective. This change, too, can be brought in general 
under the head of the inwardising of ethical conceptions. 
The moral attribute has always and everywhere a higher 
value for the moral feelings than has the corresponding 
expression of praise or blame or any other outward con- 
sequence of disposition and action. A more intensive feeling 
is associated with nobility of character than with praise and 
approbation ; and sin and guilt are more potent than the 
ideas of expiation and punishment. The idea of virtue is 
subjective from the first; but it grows deeper with the 
inwardising of the attributes to which it is referred. In 
the case of crime there is another factor in the deepening 
process; the word originally means merely the blame 
expressed by others, and only gradually passes over to 
the blameworthy characteristics themselves. 

The ethical idea may, however, retain its objective mean- 
ing, and change simply so far as to signify estimation of the 
inward rather than of the outward. Thus Achtung (esteem) 
originally meant the attention that one man shows to another 
who is his superior (cf. the present meaning of words like 
beachten^ 'to observe,* achigeben^ ' to look out,' etc.). Hand in 
hand with the limitation of the word to moral attributes has 
gone an intensification of its significance. Wiirde (dignity) 
is connected with Werth (value) : that is wurdig which 
possesses Werth. Werth^ like the corresponding Greek word 
TiyLti^ refers primarily to the purchasing price or other external 
means by which a valuable object can be procured. Here 
again, therefore, we see a transference from external valuation 
to valuation of character and its attributes. The material 



35-36] Development of Special Moral Ideas 43 

basis of these ideas is shown most plainly in the Latin word 
aestitnare, where the aes (metal, money) points directly to 
a money valuation. A like change has probably taken place 
in the German Ehre (honour). Here it would seem that the 
characteristic transfer of meaning includes several distinct 
steps. Ehre originally signified a gift proportionate to the 
value of that which was to be attained or purchased by it. 
Then it was used also to denote this value itself; i.e,^ it ex- 
perienced the change from objective to subjective, although 
the objective meaning still remained. We speak to-day of a 
man of honour as well as of a man to whom honour comes. 
Lastly, while both uses have continued side by side, the 
ethical significance of the word has been visibly deepened. 
The emphasis has gradually changed from the external 
splendour with which a man surrounds himself, or by which 
his fellow-men distinguish him, to the inward attributes of 
character and their valuation. Nevertheless, there are many 
current phrases — Ehrengeschenk (complimentary present), 
Ehrentag (day of honour), Ehrenzeic/ien (mark of distinction), 
etc — in which we can trace indications of the external 
splendour once associated with the word. 

This word Ehre is used in still another reference, which 
we must mention here, since it has left a deep imprint on 
the ethical vocabulary at large. One of its most important 
meanings at the time when its application was predominantly 
objective was that of Gottesehre (worship).^ The same thing 
holds of the Latin hones and the Greek rlikvi : their principal 
meaning, especially in earlier times, was that of honour 
paid the gods. In fact, the religious reference occurs very 
generally in all the terms expressing moral approbation and 
disapprobation, while it not seldom extends to 'good' and 
* bad/ and to other moral attributes. Such reference to the 
worship of gods is especially frequent in the Indo-European 

1 Grimm's Wdrterbuch, iii. p. 54. 



44 Language and Ethical Ideas [36 

languages. It has shown the greatest vitality in India, — 
a fact which is readily intelligible when we remember the 
immense significance for ethical valuation there possessed 
by sacrifice and other forms of ceremonial.^ In these earliest 
traces of the development of ethical and religious ideas 
language calls our attention to an influence whose effects 
we shall find more clearly marked in the ethical contents 
of religious ideas themselves and in the original forms 
of custom. But the reduction of moral ideas to a religious 
root brings us, like all the phenomena that we have con- 
sidered hitherto, to the same general result : that ethical 
conceptions have gained their specific contents little by 
little, and only gradually freed themselves from the inter- 
mixture of foreign elements. 

Language thus leads us by various paths to the conviction 
that moral ideas, as we know them to-day, are the products 
of a long course of development, which has taken the form 
of a continuous deepening and inwardising of ethical con- 
ceptions. Numerous facts go to show, further, that poetry 
and philosophy have exercised a very considerable influence 
on this process. It is true that the phenomena of language 
do not admit of direct translation back again into ethical 
processes : the ideas themselves are different from their 
vehicles of expression, and here as everywhere the external 
mark is later than the internal, act for which it stands. But 
on the other hand no change of moment can occur in the world 
of conscious ideas without having its effect upon the vehicle 
whereby thought is expressed ; so that we may at any rate 
assume that the development of moral ideas has followed 

' Cf, A. PiCTET, Origines tftdo-europ^fUSf 2 edit., iii. pp. 298, 461 ff. 
Among the words for good and bdd, the Latin malus^ Sanskr. malas, seems to 
have preserved the reference to religious worship in its purest form. It is 
connected with the Greek fUkat (black), Sanskr. nialam (dirt), and traced to 
a root tnalf meaning originally to 'defile* or *spot.* Cf. CuRTius, Gr. Etym.^ 
5 Aufl., p. 370. 



36-37] Development of Special Moral Ideas 45 

the same general lines as the change of significance in the 
constituents of the ethical vocabulary. This change shows 
usy in particular, two general facts, which may be regarded as 
the most significant in the whole process. The first is that 
value comes to be placed less and less upon the external 
advantages of physical gifts and training, and external com- 
pliance with the injunctions of ceremonial and custom, and 
more and more upon the inner attributes of character and 
disposition ; the second, that the original standard of value 
— practical ability, estimated with regard to the usefulness of 
the performance of the individual to his friends or to society 
— gradually loses its preeminence, and has to accept as 
its compeers certain individual characteristics, from which 
society and friends cannot expect any immediate advantage. 
The latter fact exhibits the emancipation of moral ideas 
from selfish motives ; both alike evince a deepening of the 
ethical judgment 

(c) The Universal Validity of Moral Ideas. 

The conclusions at which we have now arrived suggest 
a further and final question, to which the history of the 
ethical vocabulary cannot return a direct answer. It is the 
question whether the first rude stages of moral development 
are at all comparable with the developed moral consciousness ; 
whether the beginnings of the later morality are included 
in the earlier, or whether primitive ethical conceptions might 
not, perhaps, have given rise to quite different, even to 
diametrically opposite, views of right and wrong. 

Important as the fact is that mankind everywhere approve 
of certain qualities and actions and disapprove of others, 
still, the existence of these opposite judgments does not 
necessitate any kind of agreement in the motives which 
prompt them. Nor does the circumstance that certain 
sensible characteristics, like health and physical strength. 



46 Language and Ethical Ideas [37-38 

are valued, and their opposites despised, prove anything for 
our present purpose, since these characteristics are them- 
selves morally indifTerent. If the moral is, in its primitive 
stage, entirely identified with the sensible, then it does not 
seem to be at all inconceivable that morality might have 
developed in a precisely opposite direction. 

There are, however, two phenomena to be taken account 
of here : phenomena which go to prove, not that there was 
an original identity of moral ideas, but at least that man 
has always had the same kind of moral endowment (i) The 
first is that the sensible qualities which the savage finds 
admirable are related both in emotional character and in 
causal connections to the moral attributes approved by 
civilised man. Bodily health and physical strength have 
always constituted the normal sensible basis of spirit and 
courage and skill. This is far truer, of course, in the 
primitive stages of moral culture than in a more advanced 
civilisation ; but the sensible elements in human nature will 
always assure it a certain degree of truth. And we may there- 
fore confidently assume that, from the very first, the prizing 
of physical strength has been accompanied by a prizing of 
the moral qualities associated with it. (2) The second fact 
to notice is that from this similarity in the sensible endow- 
ment of the human consciousness there has finally arisen, as 
a matter of history, a similarity of moral conceptions. Those 
who assert the contrary either draw an exaggerated picture of 
the primitive sensible stages of the moral consciousness, or 
overemphasise the specific toning and shading of the moral 
life that follow from the varying conditions of civilisation 
and national character. No unprejudiced observer can avoid 
the conviction that, in the last resort, the differences here are 
no greater than they are in the intellectual realm, where, in 
spite of all the multiplicity of views and schools, the universal 
validity of the laws of thought remains unquestioned. 



38-39] Development of Special Moral Ideas 47 

An objective interpretation of the testimony of language 
is, therefore, unfavourable both to the anthropologists who 
regard moral ideas as a late discovery, confined to certain 
civilised peoples, and to the philosophers who explain them 
as an original possession of the human consciousness. Like 
all our conceptions and ideas, those of morality pass through 
a course of development ; but the germs of this development 
are of like character from the outset, and the development 
itself, while exhibiting great differences of detail, follows 
uniform laws. 

But the witness of language, as embodied in the vocabulary 
of ethical ideas and its changes, gives us only the outward 
tokens of the immense development which the moral con- 
sciousness itself has undergone. The great value of these 
tokens consists in the complete objectivity of linguistic 
evidence, a quality in which no other form of tradition 
can even approach it. But if we wish to discover the con- 
ditions of the development thus revealed by language, we 
must look about us for other lines of evidence, referring not 
to the outward signs of moral ideas, but to morality itself. 
There are two principal sources of such evidence. The one 
consists in religious conceptions, the other in the social 
phenomena that are governed by custom and legal norms. 
In religious views it is the inner motives, in social phenomena 
the external aims of ethical endeavour that are chiefly 
manifested. Both alike are further influenced by natural 
environment and the conditions of civilisation. 



[39-40 



CHAPTER II. 

RELIGION AND MORALITY. 
I. MYTH AND RELIGION. 

(a) Religion, 

THE question of the connection between religious and 
ethical conceptions is, as everyone knows, still in 
dispute ; and there seems to be but small prospect of a 
reconciliation of the opposing views. An investigation of 
the relations obtaining between the two, as a matter of fact, 
in national life and consciousness, must steer its course as far 
as possible from controversial quicksands. The chief concern 
of the disputing schools is not with an objective examination 
of tlie phenomena, but with argument and counter-argument 
as between divergent theological and philosophical theories; 
so that facts, if they come into consideration at all, are treated 
simply as things to be explained from the particular stand- 
point assumed, and oftentimes become so changed in the 
process of explanation that it is difficult to recognise them 
for the facts they were. 

There is, however, one point in which no investigation can 
keep wholly clear of controversy: the definition — absolutely 
indispensable to any further discussion — of what we mean in 
general by the word religion. Here there are no less than 
three fundamentally different hypotheses in the field. For- 
tunately, if we take into account the various gradations in 



4o] Mjtk mmd RiI^zcm 49 

wfakli eadi of tliem may cmjit, these tikrce views are repre- 
sentative for an practical pcirpases of every pcssEtiLe shade 
of opinioo upon die snbpect. We may tetm them the 
autamamous, the muia^kjsiad azxi the itUioI theories of 
reUgion. 

(i) The aotooomoos theory, plainly foreshadowed in the 
views of Hamann and Jacobi, became explidt in the work 
of Schleiermacher. It maintains that religion is an indepen- 
dent domain, above and bejrood those of metaphysics and 
ethics. WhOe the subject of metajAysics is theoretical 
knowledge of finite things^ and that of ethics the relations 
of empirical conduct, religion is an * immediate consciousness 
of the universal existence of all finitude in infinit}% of all 
temporal things in things eternal/ or, as Schleiermacher 
expressed it later, *a feeling of absolute dependence.*^ 

(2) The metaphysical theory identifies religion with 
speculative knowledge of the universe. This may either be 
regarded as a knowledge to which human thought attains 
by the mediation of ideas ^the older rationalism), or made 
a phase of the dialectical development of the absolute mind 
(modem speculative idealism). Hegel's definition of religion 
fits both conceptions equally well. It runs as follows: 
* Religion is the knowledge possessed by the finite mind of 
its nature as absolute mind.'^ Here there is an express 
intention to abolish the difierence between religion and 
philosophy, or at least to make it appear unessential and 
merely external. It is curious to find that in this particular 
point the extreme anti-metaphysical school is in complete 
accord with the most daring of metaphysical theorists. 
Auguste Comte, for example, in the introduction to his 
Positive Philosophy, declares, like Hegel, that religion aiul 
metaphysics are one and the same thing, and makes a 

' Schleiermacher, Reden iiberdie Religion^ 4 Aufl., p. 43. 

• Hegel, Vorlesungen iibcr die Philosophic dcr Reii^^\m^ i. pp. 37 IT. 



50 Religion and Morality [40-41 

theological, /.^., a religious stage, precede the metaphysical, 
just as Hegel in his Encyklopddie treats of religion as a 
preliminary stage to philosophy. The valuation of religion 
by the two men is, however, entirely different. To Comte, 
religion and myth, myth and superstition, are at bottom 
identical ; and metaphysics is a mythology of ideas. The 
' positive stage ' with which he closes the course of evolution, 
a stage in which things are apprehended as bare facts, 
without any hypothesis or speculation, would not be acknow- 
ledged by Hegel even as the first step in human develop- 
ment. Modern anthropology inclines for the most part to 
Comte's view, but restricts the idea of religion to a narrower 
territory. It defines religion as a ' belief in spiritual beings 
in general.' Sometimes, going further into detail, it finds the 
special source of religious conceptions in the ideas of a 
separate soul or spirit that have taken shape under the 
impression produced by death and dreams, and in the related 
phenomena of ancestor-worship. As on all these views the 
essence of religion is a kind of primitive metaphysics, they 
may all be classed under the metaphysical theory. Indeed, 
the original belief in spirits is, now and again, expressly 
termed the forerunner of the later spiritualistic systems of 
philosophy.^ 

(3) Finally, the ethical theory sees in religion the realisa- 
tion of moral postulates. This mode of thinking had its 
roots in the 'illuminated' deism of the eighteenth century; 
but its most influential representative was Kant, whose 
doctrines are still widely current in philosophical and theo- 
logical circles. Kant calls religion *a knowledge of all our 
duties as divine commands,' and so makes it the sum-total of 
all the hypotheses that we are compelled to set up, whether 

' E. B. Tylor, Primitive Culture^ 3rd. ed., 1891, i. pp. 497 ff. Cf. also 
Hbrbert Spencer, Sociology^ 3rd ed., 1885, i. p. 299; and Julius Lippbrt, 
Dcr SeelencuU^ Berlin, 188 1. 



41-42] Myth and Religion 51 

to explain the existence of the moral law or to assure its 
realisation.^ As these presuppositions lead to transcendental 
ideas, empty of experiential contents, they are objects of 
faith and not of knowledge; and as it is possible that 
different presuppositions may fulfil the same moral purpose, 
there is a justification for different forms of belief. Neverthe- 
less Kant, and most of his successors with him, are of the 
opinion that one particular religion — Christianity — is most 
adequate to the moral requirements, and at the same time 
best able to meet the demand for a union of faith and know- 
ledge. In this latter idea of a rational religion Kant is at 
one with the deism of his time. In it, too, the ethical theory 
comes into contact with the metaphysical, the only difference 
being that the metaphysical demand iox ^ proof oi the verities 
of faith is moderated to the requirement that they shall 
be found conceivable. On the other hand, in the separation 
of faith from knowledge, the ethical theory accords with the 
autonomous. And as the autonomists on their side are 
by no means concerned to deny that religion possesses an 
ethical significance, the two views so far approach each 
other; only that the ethical theory makes religion un- 
conditionally subordinate to morals, while the autonomous 
theory subordinates ethics to religion, at any rate in the 
matter of origins. 

Even these brief remarks must have suggested to the 
reader that it is difficult for any one of the three schools to 
draw a hard and fast line of distinction between its own 
standpoint and that of the other two. While the autonomous 
theory, eg,^ tries to maintain its independence by emphasising 
the unique character of the inner religious experience, it is 
compelled to speak of this experience as an intuitive source 
of knowledge that claims consideration along with other 

* Kant, Religion inturhalb der Grtnun der blossen Vemunfi, 4. Stuck. 
fVerJke (Rosenkranz ed.), vol. x. pp. 184 ff. 



52 Religion and Morality [42-43 

forms of knowledge in the construction of a general 
metaphysical system.- The sole difference, again, between 
the autonomous and the ethical theories consists, as we saw 
just now, in the relation (superiority or subordination) which 
they assume to exist between religion and morality. And 
this difference disappears when we abstract from the mode 
of origin of religious ideas and look exclusively to their 
absolute value. For both alike are at bottom agreed that 
the ultimate and eternal aims of morality are infinitely 
superior to its narrow exemplifications in the realm of sense ; 
and even on the ethical theory, these ultimate aims are given 
to consciousness only in the form of religious ideas. 

It is evident that the deeper reasons for these differences 
of opinion are to be sought, in part at least, in ethical and 
religious needs. But they are also so closely connected with 
divergences of theory as to the purpose and contents of meta- 
physics, that any attempt to reconcile them must begin with 
their examination from the metaphysical point of view. The 
autonomous and ethical theories assign to metaphysics a 
very limited task. They give it — to put the matter in 
general terms — an aprioristically valid contents, but an 
empirical purpose ; its duty is to render an account of the 
general principles of reason that are valid for all experience. 
To the metaphysical theory, on the other hand, metaphysics 
is synonymous with theory of the universe. It includes not 
only the world of sense, but also the ideas that refer to a 
world above sense. And the adherents of the theory either 
follow the Platonic example, and attribute an unconditional 
superiority to the transcendent elements in virtue of the 
sublimity of their objects, or else relegate them with Auguste 
Comte to the limbo of chimera and superstition, as worthless 
parts of a worthless whole. 

Now we need not here consider the question of values. It 
is a question which has nothing to do with our present 



43-441 Myth and Religion 53 

purpose of a general definition of metaphysical problems. 
Nor need we consider the oftentimes very dubious methods 
by which metaphysical theory has sought to attain its goal. 
But, these matters apart, we are bound to admit that the end 
of metaphysics is the sole end that can satisfy the craving 
for unification so deeply rooted in human reason. Thought 
must ultimately bring the whole contents of consciousness 
into intelligible connection; and religious conceptions are 
just as certainly a part of this contents as sensible experience. 
The investigation of religious conceptions, whether it lead to 
positive or negative results, will then naturally fall to that 
philosophical doctrine to which we assign the discussion of 
fundamental questions in general, and which aims to 
establish a consistent theory of the universe upon their 
discussion. Those who assert the contrary are unable, in 
practice, to keep religion separate from metaphysics, unless, 
of course, they can bring themselves to believe with Herbart 
that religion must be banished from philosophy altogether : 
in which case ethics, and still more aesthetics, necessarily 
follow religion with the best part of their contents. On the 
other hand, those who side with the most prominent repre- 
sentatives of the autonomous and ethical theories in declaring 
that the religious elements are original, or at any rate a 
necessary product of original moral motives, cannot refuse 
to recognise them as something which in a certain sense is as 
truly a datum, a fact of experience, as are our ideas of the 
external world. If we entrust to metaphysics the final and 
most comprehensive explanation of the world, the explana- 
tion that covers all the facts of all the special sciences, we 
have no reason for excluding the facts of religion from the 
metaphysical domain. At the same time, we must be careful 
not to confuse the facts of religion, as has been and is so 
often done, with the contents of a particular tradition or a 
particular dogmatic system. The facts of religion are, for 



54 Religion and Morality [44-45 

our purpose, simply those general psychological experiences 
to which the character of religious elements attaches in 
consciousness. 

What, now, are the religious elements in consciousness, 
and what are the criteria by which we can discriminate 
them from its remaining contents? This question brings 
us to a point where the metaphysical theory has only too 
often abused the advantage that it has of right over the 
opposing standpoints. Instead of basing its answer, as it 
should do, upon psychological analysis, it has imposed upon 
the facts a ready-made metaphysical and religious con- 
struction of the universe. That this is the sole way in 
which it could happen that specifically ecclesiastical dogmas 
should every now and again assume the rdlt of metaphysical 
principles, must be clear to every unprejudiced mind. But 
the error goes even deeper. Not infrequently the position 
of religion is defined a priori in such a way that it is 
indistinguishably confused with the other departments of 
metaphysical knowledge. Spinoza's * God or Nature ' is 
characteristic of this intermixture of religion and meta- 
physics. The confusion is, however, not by any means 
confined to that pantheistic speculation of which Spinoza's 
phrase is typical, but is an organic defect of all philosophical 
thinking that is in any way inspired by theological interests. 

If any of my readers still cling to the belief that meta- 
physics has lost nothing of its ancient sovereignty, I cannot 
hope to convince them by the present argument But those 
who refuse to admit the claims of metaphysics in any case 
where it does not frankly take its stand upon the established 
facts of empirical investigation will agree that the question 
of the characteristics of religious ideas and feelings, and 
their differences from other internal experiences, must be 
brought first of all before the tribunal of psychology, and 
only after it has been psychologically examined and disposed 



45] Myth and Religion 55 

of, referred to the judgment of metaphysics. Now the 
natural place of origin of religious ideas is the popular 
consciousness. It is to this, therefore, that psychology will 
first address itself for information. 

ip) The Religions Constituents of the Myth. 

The lower the stage of development at which we can 
observe the ethnic consciousness, the more complete is the 
confusion of the religious elements in the mental life with 
all its other constituents. We find, that is, a prevalence 
of ideas which, except for their lack of clear conceptual 
formulation, resemble those of speculative metaphysics at 
the stage of scientific reflection. The myth^ in which the 
unity of the primitive world-theory finds expression, has 
therefore not inappropriately been called a primitive meta- 
physics. Indeed, we have positive evidence of their relation- 
ship. From the days of Plato to the days of Schelling 
and Hegel, philosophical metaphysics has always taken 
refuge in mythological allegory at times when the abstrac- 
tions of formal reasoning have proved inadequate to its needs. 
The point of contact between these speculative essays and 
the primitive race-consciousness lies in the fact that they 
tempt the philosopher to go behind all the divisions and 
subdivisions of the mental life. Instead of trying to lead 
the many different springs of knowledge into a single 
channel, he hopes by their aid to reach some highest source, 
from which the multitude of streams diverge. Now that 
highest source existed only in the beginning of things^ in 
the age when philosophy, the pioneer of science, took its 
rise from the myth. It is small wonder, then, that even in 
our own day the search for it should not seldom carry the 
inquirer to the borders of the mythical realm. 

The mythology of a people contains all the elements of 
their theory of the universe. It includes science and religion; 



56 Religion and Morality [45-46 

it regulates domestic custom and public life. There is no 
boundary line between one sphere and another, because 
knowledge is entirely lost in belief. The views taken of the 
course of natural events are as subjective, bear the stamp of 
their psychical origin as plainly upon them, as the opinions 
held concerning the creation of the world or the fate of man 
after death. 

Now if the myth contains in undifferentiated form a sum- 
total of knowledge and belief that is later divided up among 
different disciplines, it is impossible to do as so many writers 
have done, and identify mythology and religion. On the 
contrary, only those elements of the myth can be put down 
as religious which retain a permanent religious significance 
throughout their later development, after the various depart- 
ments of life have been separated off from one another. 
What, then, are these elements } Clearly, it is easier to 
specify, the constituents that are not religious than it is to 
define the characteristics by which the religious elements 
may be recognised. Thus all features of the myth that 
refer simply to the primitive explanation of visible natural 
phenomena can be eliminated at the outset. They are 
really just as little religious elements as the Ptolemaic and 
Copernican systems are religious theories. At the same 
time, it is but very rarely that this distinction can be drawn 
as between myth and myth, — that a particular story can be 
classified as entirely religious or entirely non-religious. The 
undiversified unity of mythological conceptions not only 
leads to the attribution of various functions to one and the 
same divinity, but also allows one and the same^myth to 
present various aspects, so that it is ordinarily in part 
religious and in part concerned with the explanation of some 
natural phenomenon. Moreover, as a general rule the 
different aspects are not even separate elements in the single 
process ; it is usually one and the same series of ideas that 



46-47] Myth and Religion 57 

satisfies the intellectual craving for explanation and con- 
tributes to religious edification. But though this circum- 
stance may make it an exceedingly difficult task precisely to 
discriminate the religious constituents of the myth, it does 
not make discrimination impossible. For even when the 
same mythical process combines a variety of meanings, we 
shall still be able to determine which of them or which of 
their effects upon the mythologising consciousness are religious 
in tendency. What we shall not be able to do, despite the 
assurance of many anthropologists and mythologists, is to 
trace the development of the idea of religion from the myth. 
No ! we must first of all examine religion after it has broken 
free of its mythological connections, and only then go back 
to the myth itself, and try to define its religious contents. 
In doing this, again, we must not lose sight of the fact that 
the idea of religion, when we have it, is an idea taken from 
the developed consciousness ; and that we cannot, conse- 
quently, expect to find it fully formed at a primitive stage 
of human development, but at most to discover its rude 
beginnings. 

At this point we are thrown back again upon the answers 
which the three theories of religion described just now have 
ready for our question. But the criticism that we passed 
upon the theories will have prepared the reader for the state- 
ment that the answers offered are inadequate, at any rate to 
the present case, (i) The explanation proposed by the 
autonomous theory is too indefinite. While it makes religion 
an immediate knowledge of God, or a feeling of absolute 
dependence, it leaves the object of this knowledge or feeling 
entirely undefined. (2) The answer given by the ethical 
theory is too narrow. Even if we incline to see the principal 
value of religion in its ethical effect, or believe that religion is 
completely contained in morality, we cannot avoid the con- 
clusion that, as things now are, ethos and religion are really 



58 Religion and Morality [47-48 

not identical in the human consciousness, and that religion is 
not to be regarded as a special ethical attitude. (3) Finally, 
the fault of the metaphysical theory, in both its forms, is that 
it confounds religious ideas with intellectual problems. The 
partisans of metaphysics look upon religion as a department 
of the general theory of the universe. Their opponents regard 
it as a tissue of superstitious ideas, intended for the explana- 
tion of all or sundry of the phenomena of nature, — death, 
perhaps, or dreaming, — or of mental processes as a whole. 

If now, without further regard to any of these theories, we 
examine the developed consciousness from the standpoint of 
objective psychological observation, we find unmistakable 
evidence that the intimate connection of the religious 
elements with the other contents of consciousness, which we 
saw to be universal at the stage of myth, still continues, 
though in less overt form, long after that stage has been 
passed through. Quite apart from the more tangible influ- 
ences of traditional ideas, we often find a distinct religious 
toning, especially in the aesthetic feelings aroused by a 
consummate artistic creation, and that too when the work 
of art has no direct association at all with ordinary religious 
ideas. It may, of course, be objected to this statement that 
everyone does not find it true in his own case : to that we 
have no answer to make. It may further be urged that the 
religious toning of the aesthetic feelings might possibly 
depend after all upon associations with particular religious 
ideas. I confess that I fail to sec how a civilised man of the 
present day, gifted with aesthetic sensibility but ignorant 
of the mythology of art subjects, can have any familiar 
religious idea suggested to him by the Zeus of Otricoli, 
or still more by the Laokoon group: but I grant the objection 
for what it is worth. Even then, however, it remains true 
that the religious element may be connected with a complex 
conscious contents which in many respects is totally strange 



48-49] Myth and Religion 59 

to it ; and the question arises, what conditions a religiously 
indifferent impression must fulfil in order to gain the religious 
colouring. The same question can also be raised with regard 
to ideas that possess a specifically religious character from the 
first For in their case, too, the religious element never makes 
up the entire contents; however prominent it may be, it 
is only one constituent among many. 

How then shall we define religion in a way that shall do 
justice to all its modes of manifestation, the less obvious and 
the more obvious alike .^ In my opinion, the question can 
only be answered in one way : all ideas and feelings are 
religious which refer to an ideal existence^ an existence that 
fully corresponds to the wishes and requirements of the 
human mind. Since experience can offer at most only 
distant approximations to this ideal, it remains an ideal, 
existing simply in the realm of ideas: it is a product of 
human feeling and imagination. Hence the fact that artistic 
creation, whose aim has always been to idealise sensible 
reality, is also peculiarly fitted for the expression and arousal 
of religious feelings. 

That this definition of religion allows the freest play to 
development need scarcely be remarked. The human ideal 
changes as humanity itself changes. It will necessarily be 
crude and low where custom and aesthetic and intellectual 
culture are still bound in the chains of barbarism and 
superstition. But even at the highest levels of civilisation 
it is simply a more perfect picture of actual life, whose 
incompleteness it can never entirely transcend. Whether 
mankind ever lived without an idea of a more perfect 
existence, and whether they will be able to dispense with 
it at a more advanced stage of evolution than the present, 
are questions the answer to which will be affirmative or 
negative according as we do or do not admit the possibility 
of a fundamental change in human nature. Until some such 



6o Religion and Morality [49-50 

change has been demonstrated, the assertion that there are 
tribes destitute of religion has about as much weight as the 
tradition of speecUess races, which has now and again gone 
the rounds of the older ethnology. If we refuse to read 
into religion the doctrines of any dogmatic system, and 
simply go back to the original source of religious feeling, — 
the endeavour after an existence that shall satisfy the wishes 
and requirements of the human mind, — we shall find, indeed, 
that the religious factor appears in an endless variety of 
forms, some of them very imperfect ; but the hypothesis 
that it is ever wholly lacking will be as inconceivable as 
the hypothesis that there are men destitute of imagination 
and feeling. The mass of evidence for the existence of 
tribes that have no religion, collected especially by Sir 
John Lubbock, proves only that the observers on whose 
statements he relies partly meant very different things by 
the word * religion,* but partly also were not markedly 
successful in their attempt to explore the unfamiliar world 
of savage ideas.^ 

Finally, the psychologically indisputable fact that the 
conception of an ideal world is not an object of experience, 
but a product of imagination and will, leaves it quite 
undecided whether and how far the realm of wishes 
and requirements possesses an objective reality, over and 
above the immense effect that it exercises in the human 
consciousness. Ludwig Feuerbach sums up his view of 
religion in the short formula: *the gods are realisations in 
thought of the wishes of man * ; ^ and we cannot deny that 
the sentence indicates fairl]^ correctly one of the psychological 

^ John Lubbock, Prehistoric Times, 5th ed., 1890, pp. 574 ff., etc. The 
Origin of Civilisatum, 5th ed., 1889*, pp. 205 fT. A large amount of evidence 
on the other side has been collected by Gustav Roskoff, Dm Religionswesen 
der rohesten Naturvolker, pp. 36 ff. 

2 Feuerbach, Ces. PVerhe, viii. p. 257; ix. pp. 56 ff. C/, Feuerbach, 
Essence of Christianity^ trans, by Marian Evans, pp. 32, 33. 



5o] Myth and Religion 6i 

sources of religious ideas. But when he goes on to assert 
that all human wishes originate in self-love, and that belief 
in their reality stamps them with the mark of fantastic 
illusions, we must decline to follow him. The statements 
spring from his particular metaphysical theory that the world 
of sense -perception is fully adequate to the needs of the 
human mind and heart. An observer who is uninfluenced 
by metaphysical prejudice can hardly doubt that there are 
certain desires which do not originate in self-love, and that 
the thought of the realisation of a desire need not neces- 
sarily be an illusion, even if the realisation lie beyond the 
boundaries of empirical certainty or probability. It would, 
however, be premature to discuss this point now, since it can 
be settled only when we come to examine the fundamental 
ethical problems. It will be sufficient for what follows to 
consider religious ideas simply with reference to their im- 
mediate value in consciousness. For our first business is 
to determine the relations that obtain as a matter of fact 
between these ideas and the moral life. And for their 
ascertainment it is after all a matter of indifference what 
real signiflcance is attached to religious ideas : although the 
results of the present inquiry will undoubtedly be of weight 
for the decision of that question when it arises. 

{c) The Relation between the Religious and the Ethical 

Elements of the Myth. 

We have now, taking our definition of religion as starting- 
point, to try and separate out from the confused mass of myth- 
ological tradition all elements that can fairly be regarded as 
religious in character. First and most obviously, we may 
pick out those ideas in which ideal figures, superhuman and 
yet humanly conceived, are bodied forth as exemplars of 
man's endeavour. A second and equally important group 
of religious elements consists of the ideas of reward and 



62 Religion and Morality [50-51 

punishment, meted out by superhuman powers in accordance 
with human conduct, whether in this life or in some other 
known only to the imagination, and painted with all the 
charm of beauty and all the terrors of despair. In other 
words, the ideas of deity, of the gods, have a twofold signifi- 
cance for religion. On the one hand, the gods themselves are 
ideals and patterns for men to copy ; on the other, they 
are the representatives of an ideal and supersensible world- 
order. The remaining constituents of the myth are not 
directly religious in nature. They are partly elements in 
the primitive explanation of nature, and partly the expression 
of feeling^ and desires directed upon the reality of sense, and 
not upon any imaginary or ideal existence. The myths of 
creation and the m3^hologicaI personifications of stars, 
clouds, the thunderstorm and other natural phenomena, are 
not in themselves religious, although ordinarily interwoven 
with religious ideas. Hence the current use of the phrase 
* natural religion ' is illegitimate : it can rightly be employed 
only when we wish to emphasise the connection of religion 
with the myths that explain the course of natural events. 
And, in the second place, the ideas usually included under 
the terms fetichism and spiritism also lie outside the sphere 
of religion as we have defined it The psychological centre 
of both forms of superstition is the belief in witchcraft ; and 
this in turn originates in the desire to gain some advantage — 
health or wealth or fortune — for oneself, or to escape from 
some evil — sickness or pain or danger — or perhaps to inflict 
it on others. Here again, and more especially in spiritism, 
we find fragments of the primitive explanation of nature 
mingled with the other elements. But however closely the 
desires which give so strong, and often so terrible, an impulse 
to witchcraft may border upon the religious desires proper, 
even to the point of actual junction, we can no more term 
them religious than we can look upon the sense feelings 



51-52] Myth and Religion 63 

of pleasure and pain, and the impulses determined by them, 
as religious feelings and impulses. 

The marking off of those elements in the myth that are 
distinguished from the rest by their religious character gives 
us at once a general indication of the connection between 
morality and religion. The ideal world of the religious 
imagination is by no means necessarily an ethical ideal. 
Indeed, it almost always contains elements which, judged 
by the standards of the developed moral consciousness, 
would appear at least morally indifferent, if not actually 
immoral. To say nothing of the religious ideas of the 
surviving savage races, the conceptions of the gods held 
by the Greeks, Romans and ancient Germans undoubtedly 
contained many features and idealised many characteristics 
— cunning, violence, envy, drunkenness — which we should 
regard as being very far from moral. Besides which, one ' 
great group of religious ideas that do take their source from 
distinctively moral motives, the ideas of reward and punish- 
ment, have led by inner necessity to the creation of a special 
class of gods, whose duty is the avenging of evil-doing, and 
who thus acquire the significance of negative ideals, pro- 
totypes of all bad qualities. Nevertheless, however wide a 
separation of the religious and the moral ideals this may 
mean in the individual case, one thing is certain : that as 
soon as ever the thought arises of ideal moral exemplars of 
human conduct or an ideal moral order of the universe, it 
inevitably finds expression within the circle of ideas that 
constitute the religious ideal. So that the farther back we 
trace moral ideas, the more closely are they connected (as 
will presently be shown) with the ideas of moral exemplars 
and a moral world-order presided over by the gods. The 
relation of morality to religion is, therefore, like that of 
rch'gion to the myth. There can be no rigid delimitation 
of their spheres. The myth originally includes everything. 



64 Religion and Morality [52-53 

theories of nature, religion and morals, in an undiiTerentiated 
unity. The religious elements of the myth in their turn 
include the ethical^ which become partially detached from 
them later on, when the time of myths is nearing its end. 
Then, and not till then, can morality be regulated by law 
and custom, independently of religious presuppositions. 

The connection between religion and morals, then, is a 
connection of varying intimacy. Hence our investigation 
of it would be incomplete should we omit to consider the 
various stages in the development of the religious and 
moral consciousness. We shall, of course, do best to 
examine those forms of the myth in which the interaction 
of the two elements is plainest, and more especially those 
in which the gradual change of relation comes clearly to 
the front. In this respect the two extreme stages, the 
views of the world held by primitive races and the religions 
of modern civilisation, present the relatively most unfavour- 
able conditions, though for opposite reasons. Savage ideas 
are often very difficult to ascertain with any degree of 
accuracy, while the tracing of their development is more 
difficult still. Dependent as they are upon oral tradition, 
with all its chances of loss and confusion, they are probably 
not seldom incoherent in themselves, while they must appear 
still more so to the outside observer, who has to guess 
at possible inner motives hidden under an exterior of 
conduct that often seems wholly incomprehensible. Hence 
it is almost inevitable that at this stage religious and moral 
ideas shall more nearly resemble a medley of superstitious 
beliefs accidentally thrown together thart a consistent theory 
of the world and of life. And it is equally hazardous, 
though for quite different reasons, to draw very general 
conclusions from the religions of civilisation, which can 
be traced back to particular founders. The nature and 
extent of their connection with the original religious feeling 



53-54] Myth and Religion 65 

are both doubtful; and the objection can always be raised, 
in regard to the special question before us, that the union 
of religious and moral motives may be due to the personal 
attitude of the founder, and consequently cannot throw light 
upon the general nature of religion. 

The case stands quite differently with the natural religion 
of civilised nations which has been preserved in a series 
of continuous literary traditions, and so lies open to us 
throughout the greater portion of its historical develop- 
ment and in its connection with custom and civilisation. 
The religious conceptions of the Hindoos, Greeks and 
Romans give a true reflection of their whole outlook upon 
life and therewith of their moral consciousness, whose 
changes often manifest themselves first of all in change of 
the religious sense. At the same time, these mythological 
systems make the general nature of the myth — I mean the 
intimate mixture of the religious elements with the other 
constituents of a theory of the natural universe — fully 
evident And the intermixture gives rise to phenomena 
which, if the difference between myth and religion is not 
kept clearly before the mind, may easily suggest doubts 
in the future, as it has done in the past, as to the ethical 
significance of religious ideas. 

(//) The Immoral Elements in the Myth, 

It is a well - known fact that the gods and heroes of 
mythology are in many respects quite the reverse of moral 
ideals. This is the very essence of the original difference 
between the ideal of religion and the ideal of morality: 
man sees in the gods an exaggeration of all his own 
qualities, the bad included. They are not merely models 
of courage and justice and the other virtues upon which 
the common weal depends, but are equally great in cunning, 
deceit, violence and sensuality. It is, of course, inevitable 
I. F 



66 Religion and Morality [54-55 

that these ideas exert an influence upon the act of worship. 
Under certain circumstances they may even transform the 
immanent moral motive into its direct opposite. Thus the 
Hindoo, for all his piety, approaches his god not only with 
prayer and praise, but oftentimes with an insolent demand 
for the reward due in return for sacrifice ; and his demands 
are not for spiritual gifts alone, but mostly for material 
benefits, or sometimes for a prosperous issue to an evil 
undertaking. These phenomena are necessary consequences 
of the anthropomorphic conception of divine beings. They 
meet us in all forms of religious worship, from the fetichism 
of the negro to the sacrificial ceremonial of the Egyptians, 
Greeks, Romans and ancient Germans. And with the arrival 
of the epic poem, to take possession of mythological material, 
the bad side of anthropomorphism gains free scope. It 
would be unjust to do as the ancient philosophers did, 
however, and make the poets altogether responsible for 
what they wrote. They may have largely embellished the 
traditional legends, but the stories themselves were there, 
in the myths of the race. Nevertheless, the fact that in 
the poets* hands the world of the gods — the incidents in 
the lives of particular deities and their relations to one 
another — was a much closer copy of the world of men 
necessarily threw its moral blemishes into greater relief. 
Thus there is no question that the gods of the Homeric 
epics have as much to do with human crimes as with 
human virtues. This is true not only of Hephaestus and 
Aphrodite and all the number of lesser divinities. Zeus 
himself is the first to stoop to cunning and deceit, where it 
is a matter of attaining his oftentimes ignoble ends. In 
his pursuit of lo or Semele, and his other adventures with 
mortal women, he is simply the prototype of the voluptuous 
tyrant, hardly distinguished from the many human specimens 
of his kind except in having at his disposal supernatural 



55] Myth and Religion 67 

powers of transformation and superhuman strength. The 
episodes of his married life with Hera, and the intrigues 
and rivalries of the other gods, are far enough removed 
from what we should call an ideal moral world. These 
are the parts of popular mythology against which 
Xenophanes aimed the shafts of his polemic, and which 
from his time onwards drew upon themselves the constant 
attacks of philosophy. We must admit that the attacks 
were justified. The associating of immoral motives with 
the ideas of the gods came by degrees to exercise a bad 
effect upon the ethical side of religious conceptions. At 
the same time, the influence could be felt only in an age that 
was far removed from the naYve apprehension of the Greeks 
who first listened to the Homeric songs. That is the great 
difference between the naYve consciousness, into which 
doubt has not yet entered, and the standpoint of a later 
and more reflective age: the former, in its simplicity, puts 
together ideas derived from all sorts of motives, without 
noticing their contradiction, and therefore without letting 
any one constituent prejudice any other. The same Zeus, 
who is himself on occasion guilty of false swearing and 
revokes his most solemn promises, is none the less on that 
account the guardian of oaths and protector of contracts, 
who visits perjury and breach of faith with the punishment 
it deserves. 

Two factors, an objective and a subjective, combine to 
make this peaceful union of ethical opposites possible. 
Objectively the same god is very different when he is con- 
ceived as the ruler of the powers of heaven, endowed by 
the imagination with might far transcending that possessed 
by earthly sovereigns, and when he is called to witness an 
oath or approached in prayer, as the moral governor, the 
protector of the right and avenger of the wrong in human 
intercourse, the personification of the inner voice of one's 



68 Religion and Morality [55-56 

own conscience. The Greek of Homer's time, as Leopold 
Schmidt has truly said, is after all simply making the same 
distinction here that is still made to-day by the Roman 
Catholic between the Pope as a man subject to error and 
sin and the Pope as infallible head of the church.^ One 
and the same mythological idea may thus lead in dia- 
metrically opposite directions, according to differences in 
its objective significance. On the other hand, the absorbing 
nature of the religious sentiment brings about the subjective 
result that the religious significance made prominent by the 
purpose of the moment drives every other meaning out 
of consciousness. The invoker of the name of Zeus, at a 
solemn oath-taking, thinks of him only as the god of oaths ; 
the suppliant who is preferring his requests has in mind only 
the guardian of the moral order of the universe. The 
stronger the religious feeling, the more does it narrow the 
range of conscious ideas, banishing altogether those that 
might disturb the present trend of thought and emotion. 
It is for this reason that the idea of a multiplicity of gods 
has nothing of the disturbing influence upon the original 
naYve consciousness that it has upon the reflection of a later 
time. Worship and prayer, if they are really the expression 
of an inner need, bring with them in every individual case 
that limitation of ideas which is so necessary to religious 
exaltation. But we have evidently no right to interpret 
these natural psychological effects as evidence of an original 
monotheism, as some have done, or to read out of them a 
peculiar 'henotheism* as constituting the first stage of all 
religions.^ 

This way of looking at the gods under two different 
aspects, which brings with it the peaceable association of 

^ L. Schmidt, Die Ethik der alien Grtecken, i. p. 48. 

' Max MCller, Lectures on the Origin and Development of Religion, 1879, 
pp. 250 £ 



56] Myth and Religion 69 

logically incompatible ideas, — simply because when one 
aspect is thought of the other is non-existent for con- 
sciousness, — has no bad effect upon religious and ethical 
feeling so long as mythological thinking retains its original 
naivete. But it must inevitably lead to the destruction of 
religion and morality as soon as criticism has laid hold 
upon mythological ideas and brought out their inherent 
contradictions. At each stage of the destructive process, 
however, mythological thinking has recourse to various 
expedients, whereby it attempts to adapt itself to the 
higher level of conscious development at which the naive 
juxtaposition of ideas is no longer satisfactory. 

(i) There is one obvious expedient of this sort which lies 
outside of the myth itself, but is directly forced upon its 
defenders by hostile criticism. I mean the renunciation of 
all elements that are felt to be disturbing, on the ground 
that they are external accretions or arbitrary embellishments 
of the original legend. Every civilised religion has in the 
course of its development to pass through this stage of 
eclecticism : Christianity is now in the midst of it With 
the Greeks the process of selection ran more easily than it 
can with us, because their religious views had not been 
handed down in a specially sacred form. Hence it was 
not difficult for them to hold the poets responsible for all the 
mythological material that the more mature consciousness 
was unable to accept ; and everyone was free, within certain 
limits, to believe only so much of the traditional store as 
answered his own needs. This was plainly the state of 
things during the Attic period. 

(2) But mythological thinking itself possesses a far more 
effective instrument by which to produce the same result, 
in the creation of new gods, free from the defects of those of 
the older myths. This procedure makes it possible for 
consciousness, even at a comparatively high stage of moral 



70 Religion and Morality [57-58 

development, to clothe its religious ideas in forms that still 
appeal strongly to the imagination ; whereas philosophical 
criticism, which would leave nothing standing that is not 
proof against its attacks, soon falls into the danger of fining 
down the religious idea to a bare concept. Modern theology 
cannot resort to any such expedient. But in Greece and 
Rome we have in the first place the assimilation of oriental 
cults, that could be pressed into the service of good or bad 
tendencies with equal facility, and later on the very frequent 
personification of abstract ideas. Secondary deities of this 
latter kind are Tyche, Dike, Nemesis, Socrates' Daimonion, 
Fortuna, the Fates, etc. Tyche, primarily the handmaid of 
Zeus, gradually came to be a kind of rival goddess, who 
acquired more and more of the power to control destiny, the 
more the original gods lost in ethical appreciation through 
the play of the poetic imagination.^ Tyche and the rest 
were evidently preserved from a fate similar to that which 
befell the gods of the old myths by the persistence in con- 
sciousness of the abstract significance of their names. Tyche 
and Fortuna, and still more Honos and Virtus, and other 
objects of later worship, lead the mind so directly to the 
thought of fate and fortune, honour and virtue, that per- 
sonification of the abstract ideas is the first and last change 
which the mythologising imagination can make in them. 

In the mythological ideas of this advanced type we find 
also a more complete separation of the spheres in which the 
religious contents of the myth finds its application. We saw 
just now that there are two constituents of the religious 
ideal : one, in which the gods are regarded as ideal exemplars 
of human conduct, and another, in which they are looked 
upon as the representatives of an ideal world-order. Many 

^ Cf. Prellbr, Griech, Mythologu^ 3 Aufl., i. pp. 441 fF. Schmidt, Ethik 
der Gruchen^ i. pp. 53 ff. For the Roman gods of destiny and their like, 
cf. Prellkr, Kom. MythologU^ 3 Aufl., ii. pp. 178 ff. 



58-59] Myth and Religion 71 

of the figures in the later myth suggest this second ideal 
exclusively ; the personifications of the ideas of fate, virtue 
and justice, e.g,, cannot possibly contain any other reference. 
As the conception of an ideal world-order becomes pro- 
minent, the other point of view either disappears altogether, 
or the gods are transformed into demigods, half human and 
half divine, and at last, perhaps, reduced to merely human 
personalities, living on in memory in an idealised form. In 
the beginnings of religious development, however, the idea 
that the gods are ideal exemplars for mankind to copy is of 
the greatest ethical importance ; indeed, it is only through 
this idea that the other view — ^the view that the gods visit 
human conduct with reward and punishment — receives its 
moral impress. But the interaction of the two factors is 
so closely bound up with the conditions under which 
niytholc^ical thinking originates that, before we inquire 
more closely into their operation, we must undertake a brief 
preliminary discussion of the psychological development of 
the myth. 

(e) Tlu Psychological Development of the Myth. 

The thesis that all mythological thinking springs from a 
single source appears to many mythologists to be so 
obviously true that they do not even take the trouble to 
give its psychological explanation. They take it for granted 
from the outset that primitive man had only one motive for 
the construction of his theory of the universe. 

The prevailing view among students of the myths of 
classical antiquity is that this ultimate motive was a desire 
to interpret the phenomena of nature. At the earliest stage 
of his development, they say, man seems to be entirely 
dominated by his interest in natural events, though his 
attempted explanations necessarily take on an imaginative 
or poetic form. Modern anthropologists, relying on observa- 



72 Religion and Morality [59-60 

tions of savage races, have reached a difTerent conclusion. 
They make the belief in spirits and demons the beginning of 
all mythology ; and most of them are further of the opinion 
that this belief originated partly under the impression made 
by death, partly in the phenomena of dreams, and con- 
sequently is everywhere found together with the worship 
of departed spirits and of ancestors. The nature -myth, 
from which the mythologists of the classical school derive 
myth in general, will then come at the end of the whole 
development ; it is supposed to arise in some artificial 
manner out of the worship of ancestors, possibly by way of 
a belief in the transference of the souls of the dead to 
natural objects. 

Each of these theories dates the craving for unity, that 
characterises the human reason in the later periods of its 
development, from the very first beginnings of human thought. 
The error often goes along with a kind of psychological 
explanation that is strongly suggestive of the essays of that 
ancient interpreter of myths, Euhemerus. Modern euhemerism 
does not regard Zeus as a former king of Crete and Aeolus as 
a sailor of considerable experience in predicting the weather ; 
but it is following directly in the footsteps of its prototype 
when it speaks of the absurdity of supposing that the human 
mind could ever have seriously believed in so fantastic an 
interpretation of the real world as is given by the myth.^ 
The euhemerists of classical mythology, arguing from 
this premise, find the source of all their nature-myths in 
linguistic metaphors, the picture having gradually come to 
be taken for the real thing. At first, they say, the rays 
of light that are visible before the sun's rising may 
have been termed by some poet the horses of the sun, or 

^ Cf, with this the remarks of Max MOller {Essays^ ii. pp. lo fF.) and 
Herbert Spencer {Socioiogy^ i. p. 127), whose agreement is all the more 
significant since in other respects they represent diametrically opposite positions. 



6o] Myth and Religion 73 

if the emphasis was on their fatal effect, the arrows of 
the sun ; and out of these ideas the myth has made up the 
story of a god armed with bow and arrow, driving in a 
chariot drawn by harnessed steeds.^ The anthropologists 
naturally take a less favourable view of the primitive 
condition of humanity. They adopt not the poetic metaphor, 
but the universal belief in ghosts and witchcraft, as the most 
probable starting-point of mythological ideas. But their 
explanation is equally euhemeristic. Nor should the fact 
be surprising, when we remember that the projection of the 
views of one's own time and environment into the phenomena 
of the past is always the easiest and most obvious way to 
interpret them. Besides which, it is impossible to deny that 
mythological embellishments do really make their appear- 
ance, here and there, as a result of linguistic analogies and 
popular etymologies, and that the belief in spirits and 
witchcraft, the last trace in modern thinking of what were 
once elaborate myths, does everywhere extend back to the 
very beginnings of mythological development Unfortunately, 
however, the reasoning that passes for induction even with 
modern students of the myth regards this as satisfactory 
evidence on which to found an universal theory, before which 
the facts must bow down whether they will or no. 

Now it is noteworthy that both these forms of euhemerism 
— following the example of Euhemerus himself — save the 
good sense of the primitive myth-makers only at the 
expense of their descendants. A later generation is made 
responsible for the 'fantastic insanity' of mythological 
thinking. 'The ancestors of Homer,' says Max Miiller, 
'cannot have been such idiots as really to take the sun's 
rays for horses or arrows ' ; and yet he is obliged to credit 
Homer and Hesiod themselves with these ideas, since the 

^ KUHN, Ueber Entwuklungstufen der Mythenbildung^ Abhandl. der Berliner 
Akademie, 1873, P* 123. Max MOllbr, op. cit,^ pp. 66 flf. 



74 Religion and Morality [60-61 

relation in which they set the Olympian world to the 
phenomena of nature is most assuredly no mere poetic 
embellishment 'Must we suppose/ asks Herbert Spencer, 
^that primitive man was less intelligent than the mammals, 
the birds, the reptiles and the insects, as these animals 
assuredly know how to discriminate, as a rule, between the 
living and non-living?' And yet he too must admit that 
this descent below the level of the animal took place 
at some time or other, since at some time or other the 
nature-myth did, as a matter of fact, make its appearance. 
Whether the idea that the soul of an ancestor has chosen 
the sun for his abode, or the idea that the sun is the visible 
embodiment of a superhuman god is intellectually the higher 
conception, need not be discussed. But there can be no 
doubt that the second is the more imaginative of the two. 
If (i) the animals do not take the stars and rivers and 
mountains for living beings, that is simply because they 
do not reflect on these things at all. And the fact that 
the intelligent house-dog will occasionally bark at the moon 
or a rock, or a bubbling spring, seems, strangely enough, 
to have escaped the notice of the rationalistic philosopher. 
Unless perhaps the dog too finds the soul of an ancestor 
in these natural phenomena? Surely it is a far more 
probable hypothesis that their movement or unusual form 
appeals to him as the manifestation of some dreadful living 
being. With (2) the child the case is different That in 
childhood the play of the imagination should for the most 
part be occupied with objects of the immediate environment 
and not with the great and terrible phenomena of nature, 
and that the imaginative ascription of life to inanimate 
objects is for the most part nothing more than play, are facts 
intelligible enough when we remember the different con- 
ditions under which the civilised child and the primitive 
man are placed. The two have certain qualities in common ; 



61-62] Myth and Religion 75 

but the child is not a savage, and does not live under the 
same external influences as the savage. Just as the child can 
make at best only a few sporadic attempts at the creation 
of a language, which the savage perfects, so that fantastic 
interpretation of the real world from which the myth of 
the savage originates will show itself in the child only in the 
exercise of imagination upon the objects about him. 

We need hardly spend time in proving that all these 
attempts to trace mythological phenomena to a single 
source come into contradiction with experience, which 
refuses to be bound by the requirements of a system. 
But it is worth noticing that the euhemeristic explana- 
tions of the development of myth are guilty of a complete 
reversal of what is at least the normal course of events. 
It is not the normal procedure that a poetic picture should 
be gradually transformed into a real belief; on the con- 
trary, what is at first believed in as reality lives its later 
life as metaphor, the metaphor in turn passing out of con- 
sciousness when the transferred meaning of the word has 
gained a final victory over its original significance. And 
similarly with the other hypothesis. The belief in ghosts and 
witchcraft, so widely current among modem civilised peoples, 
contains the last remnants of a host of mythological ideas 
that once lived and flourished, and has kept many a feature 
of the old nature-myth, whose meaning we have forgotten ; 
but the reverse development from ghost to myth exists only 
in the form of an artificial construction. The idea of 
'fetichism,' arbitrarily defined and applied, plays the most 
considerable part in this anthropolc^ical theory.* Now, of 
course, to say that the Olympian Zeus, the wielder of 
thunderbolts, is a combination of mountain fetich and sky 
fetich, successfully bridges the chasm between the negro's 

* For instances of this usage, cf. J. Lippert, Die Religionen der europaischtn 
CuUurvolker, pp. 124, 325 ff. II. Spkncbr, Sociology, i. pp. 309 fF. 



76 Religion and Morality [62-63 

belief in witchcraft and the Greek's idea of deity — by a 
word ; but the difference between the two planes of thought 
remains after as before, and the hypothesis of their similar 
origin is as uncertain as ever. 

Any one-sided theory of historical phenomena may be 
expected a priori to prove inadequate to the complexity of 
real life, and more especially when the phenomena under 
consideration are the primitive explanations of the world and 
of life. Consistency of standpoint on these matters is a late 
product of scientific reflection. Primitive man no more takes 
up a consistent attitude towards things than he is dominated 
in feeling and conduct by a single motive. The mythology 
of a people is not originally unitary ; it is only gradually that 
the countless scattered and disconnected myths grow together 
into a kind of system, — largely under the influence of poetry, 
whose connected treatment of a legend has in it something 
akin to the philosophical impulse towards unification. In the 
same way, the motives of mythological thinking are not 
simple, but as complex as human nature itself. It is un- 
doubtedly quite unpsychological to suppose that man came 
into the world endowed with a craving for the explanation of 
nature, to say nothing of the theory that this was his one 
and only need ; but it is quite as unpsychological to imagine 
that he did not at flrst connect any idea at all with the terrors 
of thunder and lightning and the course of clouds and stars, 
or that he regarded all these phenomena with the same 
dispassionate calm with which the civilised man of to-day 
enters upon their study, — his hours of meditation filled simply 
with thoughts of the souls of the dead and their present fate. 

In a certain sense, however, it is true that myth-making 
takes its origin from a single psychological source. It arises 
from a personifying apperception^ the essential characteristic 
of which is the objectification of one's own consciousness. 
Where primitive man perceives a movement, he sees a will. 



63-^] Mjik amd Religum 77 

viicthcr resadii^ in the movii^ oliject or tying behind it as a 
distinct being. This idea is easQy carried over firom diii^ 
that move to things that do not, espedaUy when they meet 
him under conditions that attract his attention and arouse the 
emotion of hope or fear. Bot in the application of the per- 
sonifying process to the varioos objects of his environment 
are contained from the very first the germs of the most 
diverse forms of mytiiological thought Their development 
may, of course, follow all sorts of paths; what is a mere 
fragment of belief in one case may very soon become the 
dominant concepti(Mi in another ; but a mental connecti<Mi is 
none the less present At the same time, it is not given in 
the hypothesis of a single exUrmal starting-point, or again in 
the theory that the various stages follow each other in uniform 
succession, — whether in the order of fetichism, shamanism, 
polytheism, as we are now so often told, or in any other that 
may be proposed in place of it All such views are in- 
correct The hom<^eneity of the psychological motives in 
mythological thinking finds its true expression in the fact that 
all possible forms of the personifying apperception are nearly 
always to be observed side by side, distinguished only by 
degree of completeness or manner of interconnection. There 
is not a sign of uniformity of development, even in the process 
whereby the balance of individual elements in the whole is 
gradually changed : it differs widely among different peoples, 
varying with the conditions of physical environment and 
civilisation, and with mental endowment When we re- 
member the difference between the mythologies of races 
otherwise so closely related as the Indians and Persians, or 
the Greeks and Romans, — a difference not in secondary 
matters and points of detail, but of general character, so well 
marked as to seem almost to outweigh the resemblance, — we 
can hardly doubt that the differentiation of mythological ideas 
in related races is far greater than that of language ; while, 



78 Religion and Morality [64-65 

on the other hand, certain fundamental resemblances that 
obtain between all races, savage and civilised alike, are much 
more striking in the domain of myth. 

For the question which we are now considering, this union 
of differentiation and homogeneity is of the highest im- 
portance. It means, among other things, that those elements 
of the myth to which we have attributed a religious and 
moral character can connect in the most various ways with' 
its remaining constituents ; so that certain ideas may possess 
at an earlier stage of development an ethical value which 
they lose later on, and, conversely, certain other ideas may 
come to acquire an ethical value which originally did not 
belong to them. This is especially true of the ideas in which 
the myth-making imagination seeks to embody ideal prototypes 
of human excellence. 

2. THE GODS AS MORAL IDEALS. 

(a) The Worship of Ancestors. 

Reverence for ancestors is a trait seldom lacking in the 
mind of primitive man, and one that easily fits in with the 
general tendency of mankind at lai^e to idealise the memory 
of a past that they will never see again. The faults and 
weaknesses of the dead are forgotten, and his virtues ex- 
aggerated ; the rule de mortuis nil nisi bonum holds at all 
stages of human development. In primitive races, however, 
this reverence acquires the very considerable influence that it 
has upon feeling and conduct through the ideas that centre 
round the belief in a continuance of life after death. The 
soul is usually conceived of as a shadow or ethereal copy of 
the body, which leaves its original habitation with the last 
breath, but lingers for a longer or shorter time on the scene 
of its earthly interests. Or if it leaves this earth for some 
special kingdom of the dead, it still retains connection with 



65] The Gods as Moral luteals 79 

the living, and shares their joys and sorrows so long as the 
dead man lives in the memory of his former associates. 
Dream and vision, which to the savage are as real as any 
other form of experience, help to renew the intercourse 
whenever its cessation is threatened. 

The mysterious appearance and disappearance of these 
visionary figures, and the horror aroused by the sight of 
death, serve to connect the ideas of a future life with a 
group of ideas of a different order. Mystery is interpreted 
as magic. Good and bad fortune are then explained as the 
work of a horde of encompassing demons, among whom 
the soul of the dead naturally takes its place, — naturally, 
because it is natural to suppose that the departed spirit 
shares the fate of those left behind. It may assist the living 
by counsel, by suggesting happy thoughts ; or it may, like 
other beneficent or malignant demons, take a direct and 
active part in shaping a life. Accordingly, we find departed 
spirits not infrequently divided into the two classes of good 
and bad demons: the brave and glorious dead live on to 
further the aims of humanity, the profligate and criminal to 
thwart them. ^ 

Now it may be that the ethical impulse which is un- 
doubtedly seeking expression in the idealisation of ancestors 
is checked, and at times wholly suppressed, by its inter- 
mixture with the belief in spirits and witchcraft. Still, we 
must not forget that motives which appeal to hope and fear 
are better adapted than any others to exert a lasting influence 
upon conduct. Although the reverence for ancestors ceases 
to be entirely disinterested when they are summoned or 
dreaded as protecting or avenging spirits, it does not follow 
that the moral effect of the personal characteristics with 

^ For instances, cf, Waitz, AnihropologU der Naturoolker^ u. pp. 194 fF. ; iii. 
pp. 196 ff axid passim. Tylor, Primitive Culture^ ii. pp. ill fF. Bastian, 
Beiirage zur tftrgieichinden Psychologies pp. 72 flf. 



8o Religion and Morality [65-66 

which memory endows them must therefore necessarily dis- 
appear. And as a matter of fact there is plenty of evidence 
to prove its persistence in two principal directions. 

(i) In the first place, it is the personal example that 
rouses to emulation. The tendency of memory to idealise 
the qualities of the dead is itself partly ethical in 
character ; and the idea of the great ancestor which 
emanates from it has the same moral influence as the living 
reality which it is supposed to represent. A dead man is a 
better moral exemplar than a living man can be, because the 
imagination has free scope, or at least as free scope as the 
conditions of real life allow, to adorn him with all the virtues. 
For man, of course, there is no such thing as an absolute 
perfection; he can simply embody in his present ideal a more 
than common measure of the qualities which he regards as 
admirable, while he eliminates all that seem odious. But 
however defective the ideal may be, the influence which it 
exercises gives opportunity for its improvement, and so 
assures the possibility of unlimited development. 

(2) There is, however, another way in which the glamour 
of idealisation that a reverential memory sheds round bygone 
generations is reflected upon the present time. Old age, the 
evening of life, commands before death something of the 
reverence that will be accorded afterward. The worship of 
the dead, which had its source in the natural feeling of filial 
piety, now serves to reinforce and intensify this feeling by 
tinging it with a religious cast, and so — in the respect paid to 
living parents, to old age, and to the tribesman whom rank 
or nobility of character has raised above his comrades — 
awakens emotions that are near akin to those of religious 
obligation. The egoism that estimates a fellow-man simply 
by the usefulness of the work which he performs can see in 
the helplessness of age nothing but a burden, a load to be 
thrown off as soon as ever the stern necessity of existence 



66-67] ^^ Gods as Moral Ideals 8i 

requires. Perhaps the most striking contradictions that the 
life of primitive man affords are to be found in the cases 
where this egoism comes into coUision with the feeling of 
filial piety, utter barbarity alternating with instances of 
touching self-sacrifice. But the fact that filial piety can 
overcome so powerful a rival, and that, save at the very 
lowest stage of barbarism, it has obtained the supremacy, 
is one of the strongest proofs of the ethical power of the 
feelings which bind man to his fellow-men. And we may 
reasonably doubt whether they could have acquired that 
power without the religious colouring that they receive from 
ancestor worship. Even if the religious motives are them- 
selves not wholly purged of egoistic elements, that would 
only show what is shown by so much other evidence, that 
originally selfish motives of varying tendency must conrie 
into conflict to make outwardly unselfish conduct possible, 
until such time as unselfishness can stand alone in virtue 
of feelings of value attaching to it in its own right. 

That reverence should be paid more especially to the souls 
of those whose rank or virtues made them preeminent in life 
is natural enough, psychologically, while it is essential to the 
ideal significance of ancestor worship. But virtue and rank, 
unless their union is flatly negatived by experience, are apt to 
be closely associated in the thoughts of contemporaries, and 
still more in the mind of future generations. Hence we find 
further that among all primitive peoples something of the 
religious veneration which will be paid the soul after death 
attaches to the chief or prince during his lifetime, joined 
with a very natural fear of his power and authority. It not 
seldom happens, too, that custom withholds the chief from 
the sight of his subjects, at least on everyday occasions, 
almost as completely as death itself can cut him off from 
them. Whether instinctively or of set purpose, advantage 
is here taken of that tendency to idealise the unknown 
I. G 



82 Religion and Morality [67-68 

from which ancestor worship derives a great part of its power 
over the minds of men. Reverence for the ruler is, however, 
not merely shown in an attittide of submission, whose out«- 
ward expression constitutes a direct proof of its religious 
origin in prayer and self-abasement in the presence of 
deity, but sometimes actually passes over into conscious 
religious worship. That the relation of man to man is 
really transformed at a stroke into the relation of man to 
God, by the emotion accompanying these manifestations of 
extreme humility, is clearly proved by the instances of the 
deification of emperors occurring at a much more advanced 
stage of civilisation. Apart from certain aberrations of this 
kind, it cannot be denied that the religious colouring thus 
given in the first stages of human development to the relation 
between ruler and subject not only contributed to the estab- 
lishment of a moral order in society, but also helped to call 
forth all those impulses which manifest themselves in unselfish 
devotion to the good of others and to some general end. 
The feeling of duty and the love of country, in the form 
which they take in the civilised mind, are unknown to 
primitive man, whose social feelings are entirely restricted to 
personal likes and dislikes. The more general social and 
humanitarian impulses emerge very gradually out of filial 
piety, submission to authority, and admiration of talent; and 
even so there is a contant tendency in the individual case 
to throw them into a personal form. 

It is plain from this discussion that the religious views 
of primitive peoples can give us nothing more than sug- 
gestions of the influence which ancestor worship exercises 
on the moral consciousness. Positive evidence is furnished, 
however, by those civilised nations in whose religion and 
morals the veneration of ancestors plays a permanent and 
leading part. China is a salient instance. We are told on 
the authority of its founder that the religion of Confucius 



68-69] ^^^ Gods as Moral Ideals 83 

merely brought tc^ether the ideas originally current among 
the people, though we may add that it undoubtedly ennobled 
them when it made the veneration of ancestors, and 
especially of rulers preeminent for wisdom and virtue, the 
central — indeed, almost the exclusive — feature of religious 
worship. The family life of the Chinese, with all its ties 
of duty and affection, the patriarchal regulation of state 
and society, and the reverence for traditional custom, reflect 
a conception of religion, somewhat colourless, it is true, 
but still exerting a great moral influence by its emphatic 
reference to high exemplars of virtuous living. A crushing 
despotism and a too scrupulous adherence to traditional 
usage, that fetters all freedom of individual thought, make 
up the dark side of the picture. 

Among the western civilisations, that of Rome, despite 
many disturbing outside influences, retained throughout its 
history the elements of an original ancestor worship. There 
can be no question that the Roman genii, lares, penates and 
manes are simply the souls of the dead, regarded under 
various aspects according to the different relations in which 
they stand to the living; although in many cases the 
original meaning has become subordinated to the secondary 
idea of protecting spirits.* The old Roman pride of race, 
with its mixture of light and shadow, the adherence to 
hereditary custom, the reverence for family ties that persisted 
until gradually undermined by Greek example, the dignity 
of woman, the often excessive regard for paternal authority, 
and the influence of family ties on state and society, are 
all of them phenomena which declare that ancestor worship 
was the religious basis of Roman civilisation. The memory 
of ancestors had all the more strength and persistence as an 
ethical motive in the Roman mind because a real hero 
worship never formed part of the religion of the people. 

' pRBU.BR, Komische MytkologU, 3 Aufl, i. pp. 75 ff. 



84 Religion and Morality [69-70 

Its place was partly filled in later times by the artificial epic 
and by legends borrowed from the Greek ; but neither of 
these ever penetrated very deeply into the national conscious- 
ness. Hence there is in all probability no people that has 
been so strongly swayed by memory of the names and deeds 
of past leaders. This reverence for the past actors on the 
stage of history, who renew their life in idealised form in 
the memory of later generations, thus appears as a natural 
heritage from the ancestor worship of a prehistoric age, 
while that worship itself long continues in its original sim- 
plicity side by side with its newer phase. The heroes of 
history and of myth have, therefore, not only different origins, 
but different religious affiliations also. The historical hero 
is drawn from actual history, mythically embellished, and 
his cult is always associated with reverence for ancestors, 
retaining all its fundamental motives, though changed by 
civilisation and the course of historical events. Mythical 
hero worship, on the other hand, originates in the nature- 
myth ; and though it may be later interwoven with the 
history of the sagas, nevertheless keeps the essential features 
of the nature-myth intact : the ethical impulse to idealisation 
following the same course as -when it first began to find 
expression in the anthropomorphic creations of the nature- 
myth. 

{b) Tlu Anthropomorphic Nature- Myth. 

Nature-mythology does not include all the variations of 
mythological thinking in which natural objects appear as 
the vehicles of mythical ideas, but only those in which the 
conception of nature itself has determined the formation 
of the myth. Hence fetichism, ^^., does not form a part 
of nature-mythology. The original motive in fetich worship 
is always the thought of fate or destiny, and the attribution 
of spiritual or demonic powers to external objects a pheno- 



70-7I] ^^ Gods as Moral Ideals 85 

menon of later growth, in which the physical nature of the 
wonder-working object is of merely secondary importance. 
The same thing is true of the worship of animals, a cult 
connected on the one side with ancestor worship and the 
belief in transmigration of souls, and on the other with 
fetichbm. Although in this case the character of the animal 
does play a very considerable part, the central motive of the 
whole mode of thinking, like that of fetichism, lies elsewhere, 
in the ideas of future destiny and especially of the life after 
death. The nature-myth proper, on the other hand, always 
has for its objects the great phenomena of nature that are 
either wholly inaccessible to human hands or at least never 
comprehensible in their entirety by the perceptions of sense : 
the sky, the stars, the clouds, thunder and lightning, the rain, 
the earth, the sea, rivers, mountains, etc The chief factor in 
the formation of such a myth is the personifying appercep- 
tion. The change and motion of natural phenomena serve 
effectively to reinforce the idea that the objects are endowed 
with life and mind, while their magnitude and power arouse 
astonishment and fear. Hence the nature-myth is not only 
the forerunner of the later conceptions of natural philosophy ; 
it combines the attempt at a primitive theory of the natural 
universe with ethical and religious motives which originate 
in the emotions of fear and astonishment The result is 
that at a very early stage of development reflections on 
man's future destiny in life and death are interwoven with 
the mythological conception of nature. 

In the oldest form of the nature-myth natural objects 
themselves are usually represented as beings of super- 
natural power: the lightning is a writhing serpent, the sun 
a radiant deity, the morning and evening clouds are red 
cows, the thunder-clouds giants assaulting the heavens, and 
so on. We can readily understand that at this stage the 
significance of the moral ideal should be entirely obscured 



86 Religion and Morality [71 

by the direct interpretation of nature. The primitive nature- 
gods can doubtless be brought into relation with the idea 
of some sort of moral order of the universe ; but they are 
themselves too unlike man to be able to gain a personal 
influence over him through the qualities with which the 
myth-making imagination endows them. This probably 
explains why it is that, although the elements of a nature- 
myth are nearly always discoverable among primitive 
peoples, and we occasionally meet with quite complex cos- 
mogonies, the nature-gods never attain the rank of moral 
ideals. On the contrary, the terrifying features which they 
derive from the effects of various natural occurrences are 
often so predominant in their character as to make them 
seem terrible and nothing more. This is, however, a common 
tendency of the nature-myth even among civilised peoples, 
especially under certain conditions of natural environment. 
Evidence of it is furnished, e.g,^ by the religious ideas of 
the ancient Semites, and more particularly by the Syrian 
and Phcenician ritual, where motives of terror and fear take 
their place side by side with shrewd calculation. All these 
religions show further that, under such circumstances, man's 
natural and instinctive effort to shape in thought an ideal 
exemplar of what he considers virtuous and desirable seeks 
compensation in the worship of ancestors. And so we are 
able to understand the remarkable contrast of gloomy fear 
and loving service that runs through the religious conceptions 
and natural traditions of the Semitic peoples after these 
different elements have become commingled. 

By slow degrees, the union of the nature-god with the 
natural phenomenon which is originally considered as his 
outward embodiment comes to be dissolved. The god 
is then conceived of as the mover and director of the 
phenomenon, invisible save to the eye of the imagination. 
At this point the reasons which led to the ascription of 



71-72] The Gods as Moral Ideals 87 

animal forms, often grotesque, to various divinities cease to 
have weight; the gods become entirely anthropomorphic, 
with nothing but the persistence of particular attributes 
to remind us of their original character. The motives of 
astonishment and fear aroused from the very first by the 
sublimity of natural phenomena acquire a new function, 
and impel the myth-making imagination to endow the gods 
with a more than human measure of all those qualities which 
it discovers in the corresponding forms of human activity. 
This imaginative construction is no longer checked and 
limited by the theory of nature, and the separation of the 
god from the natural phenomenon makes it possible to give 
him attributes which his original sigpiificance in nature did 
not require. In time, the nature-attributes are altogether 
forgotten ; and as they disappear the world of the gods is 
more and more completely transformed into an imagina- 
tively-coloured copy of the world of men. Although the 
copy reflects the faults and weaknesses of man, oftentimes 
in exaggerated form, yet it is not less true that the gods, 
as exalted exemplars of every sort of ability that is valued 
among men, now obtain a greater significance, and a 
sigpiificance which continues to increase the more their 
world is felt to resemble the world of mortals. It no 
longer seems to man impossible to make himself like 
God ; indeed, there are cases where the attempt is actually 
required of him. Thus in Rome it was demanded of the 
fiamen Dialis that his own life should furnish an example 
of that ideal purity and holiness which was thought to be 
embodied in the god whom he served.^ 

But along with the ethical significance which humanisation 
gives them, the gods of the nature-myth retain enough of 
their original character to keep through all their later 
transformations the same emotional colouring that attaches 

^ Prblxer, Romisefu Afythologie, i. p. aoi. 



88 Religion and Alorality [72-73 

to the phenomena of nature ; only that, in virtue of the 
genera! interrelation of the feelings to which ^esthetic effects 
owe their power over the mind, the emotion is transferred 
from the realm of sense to the realm of morals. There 
can be no question, liowever, that this transference 
was not originally conscious. It is rather by a constrain- 
ing law of primitive thought that the bright god of the 
sky becomes the prototype of moral purity, and the 
thunder-cloud an evil-plotting demon. And the natural 
tendency of the mind not to embody its ideals, whether 
good or bad, in a single idea, but to distribute them over 
a targe number, as the shifting currents of feeling may 
suggest, finds support in the multiplicity of natural phe- 
nomena that can serve as sensible basis for a special ethical 
idea. On the other hand, the tendency to distribution is 
to some extent checked by the human personality of the 
transformed nature-gods. It is quite right that one virtue 
should be more conspicuous than others in a given character ; 
but an ideal personality must possess the other praiseworthy 
quahties as well. Hence the distribution of attributes among 
the humanised nature-gods is in the last resort the result of 
a kind of compromise between the tendency to separation, 
which is favoured by natural conditions and ethical needs, 
and the tendency to combine all the good qualities, which is 
favoured by the unity of personality. Thus the figure of Zeus 
stands forth in the Greek Pantheon as the prototype of all the 
virtues that a ruler should possess, and especially of Justice, 
though he combines with these not only the supreme degree 
of physical strength, the natural accompaniment of a majestic 
and powerful personality, but an equal greatness and terrible- 
ness of passion. Hera again, while she is disfigured by 
qualities derived from a primitive nature-significance, and 
from the transference of mortal weaknesses to divinity that 
with humanisation — qualities which rise into special 




73-74] '^^^ Gods as Moral Ideals 89 

prominence in her many disputes with Zeus — always re- 
mains the moral ideal of noble womanhood. In Athene 
are embodied a clearness of thought and discretion, united 
with vigorous action and strength of will, which make her 
the most powerful ally that man can have in war and peace 
alike. But as a shining example of every virtue that the 
Greek mind found worth the striving for, Apollo ranks high 
above all the other Hellenic gods; though just because his 
ethical significance is so wide and so varied, we can hardly 
point to a single trait in his personality which expresses any 
one virtue more clearly than any other. This serves, however, 
only to bring out more strongly the general religious and 
ethical significance of the cult which he represents, and of 
the influence which his worship exercised on the Pythago- 
reans, and through them on the whole of later philosophy. 

It would be interesting, though it is foreign to our present 
purpose, to follow out the differences in myths which 
exemplify the diff'erences of fundamental moral character 
in nearly related peoples. We might compare, e.g., the 
mythology of the Hindoos with that of the Greeks : the one 
sublimely conceived, but with evident predilection for the 
gloomy and terrible, the other reflecting a more many-sided 
view of life, but tending as evidently to ignore its darker 
sides. Or we might note how difl'erent, in spite of their 
common origin from the nature-myth, are the Roman Jupiter 
and the Hellenic Zeus. Every nation, as Xenophanes, that 
old-time enemy of myth, has said, endows its gods with its 
own faults and virtues. But when man has transferred some- 
thing that he finds praiseworthy among his feilow-men to liis 
gods, he sees in them not the men that they really are, but 
men as he wishes that they might be. And so the copy that 
began as the work of his own hands becomes a model, in 
emulating which he strives after perfection. 

But human faults and weaknesses, as well as human 



90 Religion and Morality [74-75 

virtues, are attributed to the humanised nature-gods. There 
is no part of his inner life that man does not strive to 
extemah'se (p. j6) ; and the conditions for the objectification 
of evil are given in the sense feelings attaching to the original 
nature-myth. The alternation of day and night and of 
winter and summer, the darkening of the heavens by thunder- 
clouds, the destroying power of fire, the scorching heat of the 
tropical sun, and a host of similar motives, are always present 
to bring support from without to the ethical need for an 
objective embodiment of gloomy moods and of the emotions 
that centre round evil and immorality. We have a typical 
example in the ideas suggested by the struggle of light with 
darkness, — ideas which attained their greatest development 
in the mythology of the ancient Iranians. 

At first sight it might seem prejudicial to the ethical 
character of religious conceptions that they should contain 
not only a positive ideal of virtue, but also a negative ideal 
of vice. In reality, however, this development of oppo- 
sites is an exceedingly strong proof of the value set upon 
morality. The value of the good is enhanced by the struggle 
of the conflicting forces. The ideal of virtue, like every 
emotional product, grows greater and richer by contrast with 
its opposite. It was for this reason that Christianity took up 
into itself the dualism of the Iranian religion. Here, how- 
ever, it is intimately bound up, as it was in its origin, with 
the ideas of reward and punishment, which we shall con- 
sider later. Through their influence the conception of an 
ethical ideal is partially supplanted by another that is also 
foreshadowed in the nature-myth : the conception of a moral 
order of the universe. 

{c) Hero Worship. 

By slow degrees, the union of the nature-gods with the 
natural phenomena, which are originally considered as their 



75] The Gods as Moral Ideals 91 

outward embodiment, comes to be dissolved, so that they are 
brought into closer connection with the different aspects of 
human life and human intercourse. They share in human 
interests; they fight side by side with the soldier in battle; 
they become the protecting deities of towns and districts, 
offices and occupations; aod they succumb to the charms of 
mortal women, and so give rise to a race of demigods, from 
whom the men eminent by birth or power of place in later 
ages are proud to trace their descent And this means that 
the nature-myth has become transformed into the hero-legend. 
Myth and history are now indistinguishably commingled : 
the nature-myth receives an historical interpretation, while at 
the same time real historical events are endowed with all the 
features of the original nature-myth, or poetically embellished 
by the free play of the myth-making imagination. In this 
way the peculiar province of the nature- myth, nature 
itself, is gradually withdrawn from mythological thinking. 
The theory of nature becomes a subject for scientific 
reflection; the myth turns to the mystery that man will never 
unravel, the problem of his future and of the vicissitudes of 
fate, or pictures the beginnings of race and history that have 
long vanished from his memory. The nature-gods thus 
acquire, in the last resort, some the character of gods of 
destiny, and some that of national heroes and founders of 
cities. In either case the belief in demons and the worship 
of ancestors, which never entirely disappear, must help to 
mediate the change of view. Nevertheless, it is a curious 
fact that in Greece and Rome there is no direct connection 
of the worship of heroes with the cult of the dead until a 
much later period, when the origin of this mythological 
evolution had been entirely forgotten, and oriental concep- 
tions of religion had attained a very considerable influence 
upon western thought* 

* Cf. Prellbr, Griech. MythohgUy ii. p. 7; Rim. MxtkohgU, u. pp. 435 ff. 



92 Religion and Morality [76 

The historical interpretation of myths and the com- 
mingling of mythical elements with real history are of the 
greatest significance for their preservation in the popular 
consciousness. The belief in heroes long outlives the belief 
in actual gods. Zeus and Apollo, Hera and Athene, were 
accorded a very doubtful veneration at a time when the 
acts of Theseus, of the Pelopidae, and of Odysseus still passed 
unquestioned as historical truth. The reduction of the 
superhuman to the human level, the frank derivation of 
the action of the l^end from human motives, on the one 
hand, and the intermixture of myth with the events and 
personages of real history, on the other, give the hero legend 
an air of genuineness which enables it to offer a stronger 
resistance to the destructive influences of philosophical 
criticism and of the general change of attitude that comes 
with intellectual development The liberal infusion of 
historical scenes and persons into a mythical material 
whose elements are as a rule clearly traceable to the old 
nature-myth (a very characteristic feature, e.g,^ of the German 
hero legends) expresses the impulse of the myth-making 
consciousness toward a more vivid and concrete representa- 
tion of its objects. Henceforward it is always busied, though 
with no knowledge of the fact, in adapting mythical material 
to the changing needs of the general mind. There are two 
different ways in which a myth may be transformed into 
accredited history. Either (i) the contents of some myth 
derived from the theory of nature is made more intelligible 
by the introduction of historical connections ; or (2) a veritable 
historical event is mythically embellished and changed. It 
is again the first kind of transformation that is the original ; 
but the second lasts longer. It appears as a source of new 
legends far on into the centuries illuminated by the light of 
history, and so bears witness to the fact that the myth- 
making power of the imagination never quite dies out. 



76-77] ^^ Gods as Moral Ideals 93 

In all these various connections, the ideas that cluster 
round hero worship exercise a specific and permanent 
influence upon morality^ and thereby bring many aspects 
of the religious life which have made but little progress at 
the stage of the nature-myth to a higher and more complete 
development The thought of God as the ideal exemplar 
of human endeavour does not attain its full significance 
until the heroic figures of the myth have become humanised, 
and all those elements in the world-order eliminated which 
depend upon the superhuman character of the manifestations 
of deity. Indeed, we might say that nature-mythology, in 
the nature of thingfs, could not carry it beyond the point 
at which the gods are just about to pass over into heroes; 
so that the effort after ethical idealisation does not really 
appear before the hero legend. Here it becomes so palpable 
that even in the ancient world itself philosophy was often 
able to lay hold of it, using the image of the hero and 
his deeds with full and conscious intent, whether for the 
concrete representation of some general ethical ideal or for 
the inculcating of special moral doctrines. While the 
philosophers opposed the nature-gods — opposed, i,e,^ all the 
immoral attributes with which the poetic imagination had 
endowed them — they approved of hero worship, under 
certain circumstances, as an effectual spur to the emulation 
of great moral examples. Here, surely, is convincing proof 
both of the great vitality and of the ethical value of the 
hero legend. 

All this is clearly illustrated by the character of Heracles, 
the chief figure of the Greek hero legends. Heracles 
represents a number of deities, who were gradually 
absorbed in him, as well as certain elements of barbarian 
myths ; but he owes his great importance to the fact that 
the national mind of Hellas, at all times and in all places, 
made him the prototype of the true hero, a model of 



94 Religion and Morality [77-78 

whatever seemed to it at the moment to be great and 
admirable. He has, too, one special feature, probably 
derived from the nature-myth, which afterwards became of 
peculiar ethical significance: he is the working, suffering 
hero, harassed by labours and persecutions, yet bravely per- 
severing in the midst of all misfortunes, and finally receiving 
the reward of virtue in his elevation to the rank of a god. 
His myth thus reflects a view of life that takes the world 
and its tasks seriously enough, but still, on the whole, looks 
cheerfully and hopefully to the end. Heracles is not miser- 
able under his burdens, does not break down, when left 
without divine assistance, under the load upon his shoulders : 
he is a mighty man of valour, who helps himself by his 
strength and endurance. And the story of his life is so 
rich in incident that every age and well-nigh every ethical 
school can take from it, or read into it, their own special 
ideal. The athletes of the gymnasia and the contestants 
in the Olympian games saw in him their protecting 
hero, the type of manly power and irresistible strength. 
The Sophists, with their parable of Heracles at the 
parting of the ways, took him as an example of wise 
foresight and prudent reflection. And the Cynics and 
Stoics found in him the ideal of the wise man who 
scorns pain, and prefers toil and privation to the good 
things of life. 

Alongside of this tendency to endow a single ideal 
personality with the full tale of praiseworthy attributes, 
we find in hero worship the same differentiation of moral 
qualities which plays so important a part in the separation 
of the humanised nature-gods (cf. p. 88). While it links 

« 

the hero legend to the underlying nature-myth, this distribu- 
tion of attributes also affords the means of bringing different 
heroic figures into manifold and varying relation, and so of 
giving to the legend that air of historical reality which 



78-79] T^ Gods as Moral Ideals 95 

renders most effectual aid towards its confusion with 
genuine history. To recognise this, we need only remind 
ourselves of the apportionment of qualities among the heroes 
of the Trojan war or of the story of the Nibelungs. The 
figures of Achilles and Ulysses, Siegfried and Hagen, though 
opposite traits of character seem to have been intentionally 
emphasised in them, still preserve each in its own way their 
ideal significance. And while the epic poem may have 
lai^ely contributed to the contrast of light and shade in the 
picture, it was, after all, only obeying the impulses which 
it received from the popular legend ; just as this, in its turn, 
grew up on the basis of a translation from the language of 
nature to that of conduct — from the changes of natural 
phenomena to the contrasts of the moral character — that 
preceded the more conscious formation of the myth. Here 
too, therefore, the mythical material obtains its ethical value 
through an original emotional connection between human 
actions and external nature. 

But the inmost moral convictions of a people are shown 
far more plainly in the characters of its heroes than in its 
gods. Even after their humanisation, the gods retain some- 
thing of their old unapproachableness. Not merely their 
anger, but their favour is felt by man to be an ordinance that 
he must receive with meekness. This attitude of mind was 
aptly expressed by the Greeks in the story of Tantalus, 
which relates the fateful consequences of a too familiar 
intercourse with the gods. With the heroes it is different 
Although their origin leads back to the gods, they have 
nevertheless lived as men among men, and have left behind 
them a human progeny, from which many a scion of later 
generations is proud to trace his descent. They thus appear 
as attainable ideals of human virtue, a character that 
abundantly offsets the greater elevation and majesty of 
the gods. They have, too, a further advantage in the fact 



96 Religion and Morality [go 

that the belief in their historical reality is stronger, and 
therefore lasts longer, than the belief in that of the gods 
themselves. 

But the heroes, also, have their appointed time. When it 
has come, they may still live on in popular legend, but 
lose, little by little, the moral influence which their earlier 
ideal significance gave them. The reasons for this decline 
lie partly in the constant shifting of mythological ideas, 
but more especially in the change of ethical conceptions. 
Hero worship cannot last very long after the decay of nature- 
mythology. It soon becomes manifest that the hero draws 
all his strength from the nature-myth, and that when the god 
who stands behind him disappears, he either becomes entirely 
human, — an actor upon a fictitious historical stage, — or a mere 
bugbear of popular superstition, — a thing to frighten cowards 
and children with. In any case, his ethical significance is 
entirely lost. 

Meanwhile, the moral life has itself undergone a change. 
The hero is the ideal of a barbarous age, when men 
still have something about them of that untamed power 
of nature which finds embodiment in the hero-myth. And 
though the attempt to adapt the hero-myth to changed 
conceptions may succeed for some short time, it must fail in 
the end, as soon as ever the change in moral requirements 
has given rise to a new religious theory of the world, that 
can cope with and overcome the remnants of the nature- 
mythology. The religions of civilisation thus originated 
must not be supposed, however, to lack the personal ideal. 
On the contrary, it is only in them that it acquires its most 
effective ethical form : the place of the hero is taken by 
an historical personality of exceptional moral greatness. 
Yet even then myth is not wholly banished : the new ideal 
cannot altogether escape mythical transformation. 



79-8o] The Gods as Moral Ideals 97 

(d) The Ideal of the Ethical Religions. 

The result of our investigation has been to show that there 
is no form of religion in which ethical elements are entirely 
wanting. The motives of the religious and moral feeling are 
so nearly related that a separation of the two is impossible. 
But in nature-religion, closely interwoven as it is with a 
mythical contents that oftentimes originates from very 
heterogeneous sources, morality is simply one constituent 
among many, and some of the rest are directly opposed to 
it We may therefore give the name of ethical religions^ by 
way of contrast, to those religious developments whose 
motives are from the beginning if not exclusively, at any 
rate so predominantly ethical, that the others possess only 
a minor significance. 

Looked at in this way, the 'ethical' religion is identical 
with the 'religion of civilisation.' For the nature-religions 
have always grown up out of those early views of the world 
and of life in which primitive man expressed his thoughts 
concerning nature and natural changes as well as concerning 
the moral qualities of his fellow-men. Nature-religion is 
never the creation of an individual mind, although individual 
poets and prehistoric thinkers may have helped to shape it. 
The religions of civilisation, on the other hand, have always 
been initiated by a single religious personality. I do not 
mean, of course, that the founder of such a religion could 
disregard the prevailing views and tendencies of his time. 
But while in the nature-religion these are the predominating 
influences, absorbing everything that the individual may 
contribute to the common stock of ideas as if it were 
necessarily common property, which might just as well have 
been contributed by anybody else, in the religion of civilisa- 
tion the reverse is true. There it is the founder who gives 
clear and definite expression to something which has moved 
I. H 



98 Religion and Morality [80-81 

all minds alike, but has never before been spoken. And 
the work, despite its inevitable dependence upon age and 
environment, bears the unmistakable impress of his in- 
dividuality, of his own personal attitude to the world. In 
the nature-religions, the religious and ethical element 
endeavours by slow degrees to free itself from the mythical 
constituents, though the separation is never fully consum- 
mated. In the ethical religion we have the obverse of the 
picture : sooner or later there is an intermixture of mythical 
elements, whether borrowed from some already existent 
nature-myth, or fresh formed by the never ceasing activity 
of the myth-making imagination. In most cases, it is 
probable that both factors — transference and creation — are 
operative. The Buddha legend contains many features of 
Hindoo nature-myth, which long before its day had become 
incomprehensible; so that modern mythologists have been 
tempted to transform Buddha himself into a sun-hero.^ And 
the same influence can be traced in Christianity, more 
especially in the translation of the legends of ancient 
heathendom into Christian ideas. But the main incentive 
to this secondary myth-formation is the personality of the 
founder of the religion, whom the imagination surrounds 
with a halo of legends, nearly all tending to emphasise the 
ethical values in the ideal picture. Hence, where there is no 
such single personality — when, as in Brahminism, the 
foundation of an ethical religion is the work of a whole 
priesthood — the ethical form is merely the outgrowth of a 
gradual philosophical transformation and reinterpretation of 
the original nature-religion ; and the transition to a purely 
ethical view of the world belongs properly not to religion, 
but to philosophy. A religion of this kind lacks, further, 
one very important ethical factor — the personal moral 

> Cf, Oldbnbbrg, Buddha^ pp. 73^; [Translated by William Hoby, 
1882.] 



8 1-82] The Gods as Moral Ideals 99 

exemplar — which can be introduced only by the existence of 
a personal founder. 

In the four greatest religions of the civilised world, Con- 
fucianism, Buddhism, Christianity and Mohammedanism, 
this idea of a moral personality^ which forms the centre of 
unity for religious thought, and stands as the supreme type 
of moral living, has attained its fullest development. The 
ideal, which found but partial and incomplete expression 
in the heroes of the ancient ethnic religions, is here 
concentrated, as it were, in a definite historical personality, 
whose portrayal may, it is true, be oftentimes disfigured by 
l^endary accretion, but whose moral effect has been too 
plainly printed upon the page of history for the value of the 
original to be thereby impaired. Here the reality outshines 
all the fictions of the myth-making imagination. Any poet 
can discover adventures for a hero; but the traditional 
teachings of the founders of the great religions contain, in 
the spirit of penetrating moral and religious insight that 
pervades them, unimpeachable evidence of the existence of 
the teachers themselves. It is the exact coincidence of word 
and deed that lays hold of the believer's mind and gives to 
these prophets of God and intermediaries between God and 
sinful humanity their immense significance as exemplars of 
life and conduct. Division of value is always a diminution 
of value ; so that the highest ideal must be a single ideal. 
That the moral ideal, if it is to be effective, must be personal, 
and provided with all the evidences of reality, is a corollary 
from the very nature of moral ideas, which always centre 
about an active human personality. And the requirement 
that in the ideal moral personality word and deed shall 
exactly coincide has its source in the twofold exemplifica- 
tion of moral living in sentiment and action, whose 
agreement or disagreement furnishes us with a criterion 
of character. 



lOO Religion and Morality [82-83 

As hero worship is a necessary development from a 
polytheistic nature - mythology, so is this moral ideal of 
humanity, realised for thought in the unity of a powerful 
personality, the correlate of an ethically purified monotheism. 
Christianity, in designating Christ as the mediator between 
God and man, has defined this position in terms that can be 
plainly read even through the obscurities of an intruding 
mythology. 

3. RELIGION AND THE MORAL ORDER OF THE UNIVERSE. 

(tf) Ideas of the Life after Death, 

The idea of the gods as representatives of an ideal moral 
order of the universe developed very gradually from various 
elements of mythological thinking. Among the most 
important of these are the ideas of the continued existence 
of the soul after death. Derived in the first place from 
independent motives, and so standing for the most part 
out of all relation to ethical conceptions, they came by slow 
degrees to have a close connection with ethics as reinforcing 
one of the most essential constituents in the notion of a 
moral world-order, the ideas of reward and punishment. So 
close is the union, that at a more advanced stage of develop- 
ment it may quite well appear as if the thought of 
continued existence after death has its sole incentive in these 
ideas. But although we may admit that the thought, once 
formed, is chiefly indebted to them for its long continuance 
and later transformations, still the fact remains that the two 
elements were originally separate, and only subsequently 
joined forces for mutual support and confirmation. And 
this gfives us valuable evidence of the complexity of the roots 
from which the religious feeling springs. 

It is a belief common to all primitive races that the human 
spirit is a sensible being, separable from the body. This 



83-84] Religion and i/ie Moral IVorld-Order lOi 

naive materialism, from which even the early philosophers 
were not exempt, has two sources : the phenomena of death 
and of sleep. It is due, in the first place, to the impression 
made by the cessation of life with the drawing of the last 
breath, as is still shown by the words denoting soul and 
spirit in the most diverse languages. Geist, atiimus, spiritus, 
i/rtr^jj, ruach, all alike point to the idea that the soul leaves 
the body with the last breath.' And popular superstition at 
the present day conceives of it as a puff of wind or smoke or 
a little cloud. The further development of the original idea 
is determined by association with the dream-image. The 
soul is a shadow, visible to the eye, but vanishing into 
thin air at the touch of the hand. As during the dream the 
soul can temporarily leave the body, and make long journeys 
in the form, perhaps, of a butterfly or a mouse or a snake, so 
it is sometimes conceived of as embodied in animals after 
death, and more especially in animals whose rapidity of 
movement and sudden comings and goings arouse an uneasy 
fear, a feeling akin to the impression produced by death 
itself- There can be no question that these ideas constituted 
the natural point of departure for the later and more 
systematically developed conceptions of the transmigration 
of souls. At the same time, the belief in the embodiment 
of the soul in animals or inanimate objects exercised a 
relatively slight and transient influence upon the general 
trend of ideas concerning the future life. The remembrance 
of the living is so potent that the souls of the dead tend 
more naturally to take the form which they wore during life. 
It follows from this that tlie ideas which cluster round the 

' On Geist (English ^htat), tf. Hildebrand in Grimm's Wbrtirbuck, iv. 
p. 1633; on the Hebrew ruach, Gbsbnius, Htmdwdrlsrbuth, 7 Aufl., p. 797. 
A list of wards of like meaning in oihcr Inngiuiges is given by F. A, Casus, 
GesckicAle der PsycMegU ; in Ihc Noihgtlauait Werki, iii. p. 51. The oiigia of 
the Gcnnan woid Siile (English soul) is unceitaiD. 

> GmUM, Deutsiht MytheU^, 4 Au9., p, 905. 



I02 Religion and Morality [84 

thought of the separation of the soul from the body have 
a kind of explanatory significance, somewhat after the fashion 
of the original nature-myth ; they do not express any 
particular moral conception. And this independence of 
morality is apt to extend further to the primitive ideas 
concerning the manner in which the soul is employed in its 
continued separate existence. Here, however, the need of 
explanation, for which there is little chance when the 
phenomena He on the farther side of death and dreams, 
becomes wholly subordinated to the feelings which fill tlie 
individual mind as it recalls dead friends or dwells on its own 
departure. When memory prevails, the ideas of life after 
death inevitably take on something of the sadness which the 
survivor experiences at the loss that he has suffered. So we 
can readily understand how the Greek, sanguine of temper as 
he was, should think of Hades as the scene of a gloomy 
and joyless existence. Where, on the other hand, the 
thoughts and efforts of man arc directed with anxious 
expectation to that which shall come after this life, he 
naturally looks forward to the future, in contrast to the toil 
and care of the present, as promising an endless renewal of 
the enjoyments of which the world has all too few to satisfy 
his longing. Thus the Indian, in his unsettled hunter's life, 
hardened to privations, dreams of the happy hunting-grounds 
in the west, where the spirits of the dead have plenty and to 
spare for their feasting.' And the ancient German, accustomed 
to fight and labour in his wild forests, believed that the 
heroes in Walhalla were happy for all eternity with merry 
drinking bouts and joyous exercise in the tilting field.^ But 
when once man's own hopes and fears have thus come to 
play the chief part in his ideas of the future, the notion 

' Waitz, Antkrapohgie der NaturvolJur, iii, p. 197. RaTzel, VolkcrkunJc, 
ii. pp. 694 f. 
' Grimm, DaUtclu Afythalagit, pp. d&i S. 



83-84] Religion and the Moral World-Order loi 

naTve materialism, from which even the early philosophers 
were not exempt, has two sources : the phenomena of death 
and of sleep. It is due, in the first place, to the impression 
made by the cessation of life with the drawing of the last 
breath, as is still shown by the words denoting soul and 
spirit in the most diverse languages. Geist^ animus^ spiritus^ 
^lOCi* ruacA, all alike point to the idea that the soul leaves 
the body with the last breath.^ And popular superstition at 
the present day conceives of it as a puff of wind or smoke or 
a little cloud. The further development of the original idea 
is determined by association with the dream-image. The 
soul is a shadow, visible to the eye, but vanishing into 
thin air at the touch of the hand. As during the dream the 
soul can temporarily leave the body, and make long journeys 
in the form, perhaps, of a butterfly or a mouse or a snake, so 
it is sometimes conceived of as embodied in animals after 
death, and more especially in animals whose rapidity of 
movement and sudden comings and goings arouse an uneasy 
fear, a feeling akin to the impression produced by death 
itself.^ There can be no question that these ideas constituted 
the natural point of departure for the later and more 
systematically developed conceptions of the transmigration 
of souls. At the same time, the belief in the embodiment 
of the soul in animals or inanimate objects exercised a 
relatively slight and transient influence upon the general 
trend of ideas concerning the future life. The remembrance 
of the living is so potent that the souls of the dead tend 
more naturally to take the form which they wore during life. 
It follows from this that the ideas which cluster round the 

^ On Geisl (English ghost), cf, Hildebrand in Grimm's Worterbuch^ iv. 
p. 2623 ; on the Hebrew niach^ Gesenius, Handworterbuch, 7 Aufl., p. 797. 
A list of words of like meaning in other languages is given by F. A. Carus, 
Geschichte der Psychologic ; in the Niuhgelassetu Werke, iii. p. 51. The origin of 
the German word SeeU (English soul) is uncertain. 

' Grimm, DetUsche Mythologies 4 Aufl., p. 905. 



I04 Religion and Morality [85-86 

despite its conflict with more highly developed conceptions, 
is never entirely rooted out. 

(2) When, on the other hand, hopes and fears concerning 
one's own fate after death occupy the foreground of con- 
sciousness, it is always the second series of ideas which 
predominates. We then have the notion of a special 
country or kingdom of the dead, conceived of after the 
model of this world, it is true, but still so remote and apart 
from the realm of the living, that the imagination has free 
play in the depiction of its joys or terrors. While the soul 
remains in the neighbourhood of the living, its existence is 
necessarily dependent upon the living : it lives on to further 
their desires or thwart their plans : but the renewed existence 
always bears heavily upon it, is always tinged by the ghostly 
horror which inevitably accompanies the intermingling of 
death with life. Not till the other world has been entirely 
separated from the world of life can it attain any high 
value in ethical regard. When the separation is made, 
however, the ideas about the abode and state of the dead 
may still take the most varied forms, according to the 
stage of general mental development and the special 
emotional tendencies of the race. They approximate most 
closely to the ideas of the first series when definite regfions 
in the neighbourhood of the dwellings of the living — 
usually lonely valleys and ravines — are made the residence 
of the departed souls. A farther step leads the dweller 
upon island or sea-coast to the belief in distant islands 
beyond the sea: islands which a symbolism that connects 
the course of life with the change of the sun has always 
set in the west Not only does Hesiod send the demigods 
of the fourth age to enjoy unruffled happiness in the 
'islands of the blest'; the Polynesian and the North 
American Indian also tell of a journey across the sea, 
which brings the soul to the happy islands. If the 



86^7] Religion arid the Moral World- Order 105 

imagination paints man's future destiny in dark and joyless 
colours, then (as in the Greek mythology) the inner parts 
of the earth become an underworld, a realm of shadows, 
ruled by special deities. If, on the contrary, man's thought 
of the future is dominated by the hope of better things to 
come, the abodes of the blessed are placed in the bright 
spaces of the heavens among the stars, in virtue of the 
same association of light and height with perfection and 
parity which gives the gods themselves a dwelling-place 
in heaven. Thus we find Elysium set over against Hades 
or Orcus, and Paradise over against Hell. That the two 
antithetical conceptions attain their full value only in 
relation to each other is a sure sign that they have grown 
up under the influence of moral ideas of reward and 
punishment And even where their origin was at first 
independent, they are gradually assimilated to one another. 
At first, the two opposite views of the future state simply 
reflect the feelings of hope and fear with which the mind 
IS filled when it considers the vast uncertainties of the fate 
to come. But when once the moral impulses have arisen, 
to control the work of the imagination, the feelings of hope 
and fear are bound up with the desire for good and the 
rejiUion of cvfl, and the future life \s thus transformed 
mto a world of reward and punishment, in which each 
man receives the measure of happiness and pain that he 
has merited in his life upon earth- But the course of this 
development is affected b>" yet other ethical motives, which 

#"?aTT €^^ — ?_f 



special 



{B) Tk€ Dectlo^munX of tJu Ideas ^f Riz::^d aitd Prntdsknufi^ 

From the moment f^>" dtie goes of :he mrire-axyth hive 
become humanised. — are ccoc^tv^c ot j5 men* but men en- 
Awed with all human diJtrA.*orrt>cic5 ta tncre taaa h uman 



io6 Religion and Morality [87-88 

measure, — they are not merely themselves ideals, moral 
exemplars or (where the notion of the negative ideal has 
arisen) protot}rpes of evil, but also the guardians of law 
and justice, of family and state, of the practice of the 
individual and social virtues. They have founded the moral 
order of the universe, and maintain it by reward and 
punishment. 

This conception of a divine order of the universe has not 
at first any necessary connection with the ideas of the life 
after death. It is found among peoples to whom the idea of 
a future life is almost entirely foreign: e.g. in the Semitic 
races. And it is a prominent factor in the religious thought 
of peoples whose belief in a continued existence is primarily 
determined by the gloom and horror of death, to whom, that 
is, death seems something wholly unfortunate, an evil that 
can hardly be mitigated : as, eg,y the Homeric Greeks. But 
experience shows that even in these cases the two sets of 
ideas become connected in course of time ; and that though 
the idea of a future life may have originally found no place at 
all in mythological thinking, the idea of reward and punish- 
ment assures its entrance later on. It is very possible that 
external influences, religious conceptions imported from other 
nations, take part in the process ; but still, the fact that they 
fall upon fruitful ground remains as evidence of a religious 
need which gradually matures with the evolution of moral 
ideas. The psychological development which leads to this 
fusion of what were originally disparate ideas is most clearly 
reflected in the changes which the Greek views of religion and 
morals underwent in regard to them. 

In Greece, as in Rome (p. 83), the course of religious 
development begins with a primitive soul worship, which has 
left many traces upon later thought But this gave way at a 
very early period, probably under the increasing influence of 
the custom of cremation, to the theory of life which has found 



S8] Religion and the Moral World-Order 107 

its expression in the Homeric poems,^ a theory concerned in 
the first instance with sensible reality, and caring little for 
what may be beyond. 

In Homer, life is a play whose motif is divine justice ; and 
this justice manifests itself principally in punishment Virtue 
finds its reward in itself and in the unfailing respect of one's 
fellow-men. But evil-doing is punished, either at once or 
later on, when a more favourable opportunity offers, and 
usually at the moment when the evil-doer is especially 
sensitive to correction. This conception of punitive justice, 
therefore, not only stands out of all relation to a life after 
death, but is coupled with the belief that retribution always 
overtakes the guilty, sooner or later, during his lifetime. The 
gods in general, and Zeus in particular, are the upholders of 
the moral order of the universe. Their punishment strikes 
the criminal sometimes in his own person only, sometimes 
together with his kindred and descendants. The sin of the 
ruler determines the destiny of the state : all the Trojans 
must atone for the crime of Paris. The dominant thought 
here is partly the notion of the solidarity of the state, and 
partly the idea that the severest punishment that can be 
meted out to a ruler is to have the commonalty perish with 
him. One of the heaviest punishments of all is that fate 
should lay hands upon children before the eyes of their 
parents, — as in the case of Niobe, whose sons and daughters 
are swept off by the arrows of Apollo and Artemis, because 
she had boasted too presumptuously of her motherhood. 

The frequent observation that crime may go for a long 
time unexpiated must, however, have favoured the develop- 
ment of different views : views that should make it possible 
to maintain the postulate of a punitive justice in face of 
contradictory experiences. The vengeance of heaven extends 

^ Erwin Rohdb, Psychi, SeeUtuultus und Unsterhluhkeitsgtaube der Griechen^ 

pp. I fir. 



io8 Religion and Morality [88-89 

farther and farther. It reaches out beyond the life of the 
criminal himself; the belief grows up that the punishment 
which cannot overtake him will fall upon the heads of his 
descendants. The feeling of blood-kinship and the idea of 
blood-revenge based upon it, which actually became a right 
recognised by law, did much to further this extension of the 
domain of punishment : for the punishment of a man's 
descendants is, in a certain sense, only the passive comple- 
ment of the idea of blood-revenge. As the kinsman takes 
the place of the injured man, who can obtain no satisfaction 
for himself, so must future generations take upon them the 
misdeeds of the criminal who has been snatched by death 
from the avenging arm of justice. This development of the 
idea of justice must further have been assisted by the revival 
of the worship of the dead and of ancestors, which had fallen 
into disuse in Homer's time, but which is clearly manifested 
in the various phases of the change in religious conceptions 
that we are now tracing, and especially in the constantly 
increasing importance of the cult of the gods of the under- 
world. 

The Attic tragedians give us this new theory of the world 
in its poetic form. The keynote of their work is the idea 
that punishment does not overtake the transgressor during 
his lifetime, but in the persons of his descendants. Not 
merely the unhappiness, but also the sin of sons and 
grandsons is considered as a punishment for the sin of 
their forefathers. The legends which tell the fortunes of 
the mythical families of the Pelopidae and Labdacidae 
contain an unbroken chain of incident illustrative of this 
persistent power of the fate that follows so unerringly upon 
sin to entangle the kindred and descendants ,of the guilty in 
ever new transgression. So, too, the national god of Israel 
avenges the sins of the fathers on the children unto the 
third and fourth generation. In this case, however, there 



89-90] Religion and the Moral World-Order 109 

is a bright side to the picture : he who leads a life that is 
pleasing to Jehovah will receive his reward to the remotest 
generations. 

At this point it must necessarily happen that the enlarged 
conception of justice becomes connected with the ideas of 
a life after death, if these are at all developed in the national 
consciousness. And, as a matter of fact, Greek thought is 
permeated by the belief that the dead in Hades share the 
fortunes of their house, that they feel the sin and unhappiness 
of their sons and grandsons to be a punishment for their 
own sins. Moreover, this view, that the dead suffer pain by 
sharing the pain of the living, soon becomes associated with 
a further idea. If the crime that a man committed in his 
lifetime is atoned for by the sorrow which he is destined to 
suffer in Hades, that sorrow need not consist merely in the 
sympathy with which he follows the destinies of his kinsmen. 
It may be a new and separate pain, inflicted upon him in 
his new state of existence. The conception of an endless 
torment which the wicked suffer in the underworld reaches 
back in its first beginnings to a very early period. Thus the 
Odyssey gives us the pictures of Tantalus, who languishes 
for the enjoyment that is constantly presented and as con- 
stantly taken away, and of Sisyphus, who never ceases to 
roll up the stone that continually rolls down again. ^ But 
it is plain that they are here simply aids invoked by the 
imagination ; the terror of the punishment is heightened by 
making it eternal, but the punishment itself is only a con- 
tinuation of such penalties as the wicked have already paid 
in their life upon earth. The opposite idea of a reward of 
virtue continued into the next world is similarly anticipated 
at a very early date in certain sporadic cases. Thus the 
idea of Elysium, where the dead enjoy for ever an un- 
troubled and serene existence, is also found in the Odyssey. 

^ Odyssey zi., 582. 



no Religion and Morality [90-91 

But the reward is a prize accorded only to the chosen few. 
It is promised in this sense, e.g., to Menelaus on his return 
homeward from Troy. ^ 

Now when these ideas have been generalised, i>., are trans- 
ferred from individual men especially distinguished by the 
favour or disfavour of the gods to the generality of man- 
kind, the thought of the life after death takes its entire 
colour, at once and as a matter of course, from the thought 
of retribution. The future life becomes a system of rewards 
and punishments, which are not merely continued from this 
world to the next, but cannot properly be said to begin until 
after death. The postulate of a divine justice, so often 
negatived by the events of the life upon earth, thus obtains 
a full and complete validity that is not to be shaken by con- 
tradictory experiences. At the same time, the gods of the 
underworld appear as the judges of the acts of the dead. 
Tartarus and Elysium are set over against each other as 
dwelling-places of the sinful and the blest, entirely separate 
and apart. Tartarus is ruled by Pluto ; Elysium by the fair- 
haired Rhadamanthus. As the gods of the realm of shadows 
thus assume the offices of reward and punishment, the older 
idea, that the divine vengeance pursues the criminal in his 
earthly life, gradually dies away, or if it persists, persists in 
different form. The avenging gods are no longer the un- 
approachable and majestic figures of the Olympian circle, 
but subordinate deities, whose special concernment is with 
fate and punishment, like the Moerae and the Erinnyes. The 
change shows, nevertheless, a distinct refinement of the moral 
feeling; for these lower deities are far more direct embodiments 
of the fear for the future and remorse for the past that prey 
upon the guilty conscience than were the thunderbolts of 
Zeus and the arrows of Apollo. And it does not carry 
with it any abrogation of the ethical significance of the 

^ Odyssey iv., 561. 



91-92] Religion and the Moral World-Order 1 1 1 

higher gods. Indeed, this is rather enhanced ; for they have 
not now themselves to execute each separate act of the 
divine justice, but only to assure its general maintenance. 
They are thus thrown into greater prominence as the 
founders and upholders of the moral order of the universe 
as a whole, while its details are regulated by subordinate 
instrumentalities. 

The purification of the moral feeling which is implied 
in the development of this thought of an universal moral 
order, finds its expression in two noteworthy changes in the 
trend of religious thought (i) The first consists in the 
slowly increasing significance of the idea of reward for 
good actions. The gods are no longer regarded merely as 
the avengers of crime committed. Their office is to assign 
to each man his due, in the future life, according to the 
measure of his deeds in the life before death ; and so they 
come to embody more and more perfectly the thought of an 
all-ruling justice. And this justice, in its turn, is no longer 
restricted to a few elect mortals, but is extended impartially 
to high and low alike; so that the expectation of future 
reward and punishment naturally becomes associated with the 
hope of an equalisation of those unmerited differences which 
the accidents of birth and fortune introduce into the life 
of man. (2) The second change, which runs parallel with 
the first, consists in the gradual disappearance of the idea of 
a divine punishment which is visited upon man at the hest of 
morally indifferent motives, an idea which has its chief 
source in the same tendency to humanise the gods that makes 
them share in human weaknesses and passions. The more 
human the god is made, the more readily can his anger be 
aroused by actions that are not in themselves blameworthy, 
but merely cross his own temporary moods and wishes. It 
may even come to pass that the good fortune and fame of 
a man, though they have their origin in moral excellence, call 



1 1 2 Religion and Morality [92 

forth the anger of a god, since desert that passes the 
customary human measure is a prerogative claimed by 
divinity alone. This is the foundation of an idea which 
obtained a very considerable influence in Greek thought, 
— the idea of the jealotisy of the gods. Despite its immoral 
interpretation of the reasons swaying the divine will, the idea 
of the divine jealousy is still not without significance for 
ethical development Indeed, it is not too much to say that 
the underlying conception is really moral in nature, although 
its religious expression is imperfect. On the one hand, there 
is the thought that too much good fortune may easily make a 
man presumptuous, and so disturb the equilibrium of his moral 
powers. On the other, the belief that a certain measure of 
material good fortune may not be transcended without 
being counterbalanced by a corresponding measure of 
misfortune gives utterance, for the first time in history, to 
the demand for a distributive justice. And as by slow 
degrees the demand is transferred from this world to the 
next, the lower feelings of envy give way to the idea of 
a perfect justice^ which not only rewards the good and 
punishes the evil, but also equalises all the differences of the 
life upon earth, so that everyone receives that which he 
deserves. There are, however, influences at work to produce 
this change of view which evidently have no place in 
the autonomous development of nature-religion, but are 
gradually brought to bear upon it by the maturing of 
philosophical reflection. 

{c) Tlte Influence of Philosophy on Ideas of Reward and 

Punishment 

The development of antithetical moral conceptions within 
the nature-religions took place most easily and naturally 
where the myth itself, in its primitive stage, had developed 
the antithesis between benevolent and malevolent powers. 



92-93] Religion and the Moral World-Order 113 

This had been done among the Indo-European peoples in the 
Iranian, and to some extent in the old German mythology. 
But the evolution of, eg,, the Iranian views upon religion 
shows clearly that the complete moralisation of the thought 
of immortality was accomplished only under the influence of 
philosophical speculation. Even in the oldest hymns of the 
Zendavesta we find an union of religious feeling and philo- 
sophical reflection which points conclusively to the work of 
certain powerful personalities, who have recast the contents 
of the original nature-religion in the interests of morality. 

On the other hand, we must remember that the ideas of the 
life after death which are handed down in the myth them- 
selves contain, like all religious ideas, a nucleus of moral 
significance; so that they furnish welcome assistance to 
philosophy in its attempts to unravel the ultimate motives of 
the ethical consciousness. Hence it comes about that the 
field of morals is a field at all points of which philosophy 
and mythology are constantly meeting and crossing : whether 
it be that the myth is permeated by philosophical thought, or 
that philosophy tries to embody its conceptions in mytho- 
logical images, or, finally, that both religion and philosophy 
interpenetrate so completely that it is hardly possible to 
decide which of the two constituents predominates in the 
whole. We may take Zoroastrianism as an instance of the 
first kind, i.e,, of a religion influenced by philosophical 
reflection, and Platonism as illustrative of a philosophy 
couched in religious ideas ; while the religious metaphysics of 
Brahminism affords us an example that has never been 
equalled — or, indeed, even approached — of a complete in- 
tussusception of the religious and philosophical elements. 

The ethical application of the ideas concerning a life after 

death is worked out most fully in two philosophical systems, 

one of which belongs to eastern and the other to western 

thought: the philosophy of the Hindoo Vedas, and Platonism. 

1. I 



1 1 4 Religion and Morality [93-94 

These two philosophies have exercised a profound influence 
upon the two ruling religions of the world, — Buddhism and 
Christianity. Carrying out to its logical conclusion the 
thought that death is followed by an eternal life, whose 
nature is determined by the contents of the life upon earth, 
they look upon man's earthly existence as no more than a 
preparation for its continuance in the other world. It is true 
that the theology of ancient Egypt, setting out from similar 
premises, had long before made a concernment with death 
and immortality the cardinal point in religious worship. But 
such a view could not gain its full power over the minds of 
men without the addition of that speculative idealism which 
was independently developed by the Vedic philosophy and 
the Platonic system. The Egyptian simply transferred the 
material things of this world to the world beyond the grave, 
so that the future life was for him only a prolongation of his 
present sensible existence. Brahminism and Platonism, on 
the other hand, rise to a belief in the immortality of the soul, 
while they regard the world of sense as foredoomed to decay, 
and valueless except in so far as the immortal principle 
participates in it» There is thus developed that impulse to 
flee from the world and to sink oneself wholly in the depths 
of one's own being which sets the Vedic philosophy in such 
sharp contrast with the practical ethics of Hellenism, actively 
devoted to the material ends of the individual life and the 
interests of the civic community. Platonism, itself a Greek 
product, stands at first midway between these two extremes. 
But the mysticism which grew out of it on the theoretical 
side, and the monastic asceticism which drew the practical 
inference from its contempt for the world of sense, once more 
forced the ideas of moral duty into the background. The 
mystic and the ascetic alike believe that it is possible even 
in this present life to enjoy a foretaste of that eternal blessed- 
ness which is free from earthly cares. The mystic would 



94-95] Religion and the Moral World-Order 115 

reach his end by absorption of self in the thought of a super- 
sensible world ; the ascetic would attain it by breaking down 
the barriers of sense, as far as may be, through mortification 
of the flesh. Both are striving for a moral reward without 
regard to moral conduct; and so complete is the separation 
of the moral life from connection with the external world 
that all genuine moral activity disappears. It is this con- 
tradiction that has proved fatal to Brahminism. Christianity, 
on the other hand, except for occasional aberrations, has 
taken up the standpoint of the earlier Platonism. The world 
of sense is the world of moral action; and the whole of the 
practical ethics of Christianity has reference to it. The 
supersensible world is the world of moral rewards and 
punishments. According to the Christian view of life, there- 
fore, a man should be guided by the idea of a supersensible 
world for which his earthly life is a preparation. And 
Christian ethics is led by this reference of external actions 
to an existence which, though withdrawn from its own sphere 
of operation, is nevertheless visible to the prophetic eye of 
faith, to lay stress on the inward motive as the measure of 
value in the moral life. No religion expresses so emphati- 
cally as Christianity the thought that God tries the conscience^ 
and that the merit of the moral life consists not in an out- 
ward righteousness of conduct, but in purity of the inward 
motive. 

Christianity has thus ended a conflict which the religious 
ethics of antiquity was never able to allay, — the strugrgle 
between external moral precept and internal moral duty. It 
is this struggle which finds such impressive portrayal in 
Sophocles' Antigone; and it may be that the play moves 
us as it does because the poet comes so near to the answering 
of the riddle, though he can nowhere find its full and final 
solution in the conceptions of his own time. Christianity 
settles the dispute by giving internal moral duty, the precept 



1 1 6 Religion and Morality [95-96 

of conscience, an unconditional superiority over conformity 
of external action. 

We see in all this how the idea that human conduct is 
visited according to its morality or immorality by reward or 
punishment takes shape under the dominating influence of 
the philosophical deepening of religious thought; and how 
the trend of development throughout is to add to the sum 
of ethical contents in the totality of religious conceptions, 
and so to enhance the effect that these produce upon the 
moral life. The primitive belief that a crime which escapes 
human notice will nevertheless be overtaken in this present 
life, be it sooner or be it later, by the divine punishment, has 
gradually given way to the belief in a system of rewards 
and punishments, whereby every man is requited in a future 
existence, free from the imperfections of this life, in exact 
accordance with the moral worth of his actions. And in the 
estimate of this worth the inner value of the virtuous motive 
has finally gained the victory over the external value of the act. 

The more decidedly the idea of the might of the gods 
outweighs in the primitive consciousness the fear of man's 
vengeance or of the punitive power of the state, the more 
certainly must the motives to moral action which lie in the 
natural conditions of life be strengthened by the religious 
motives. And the power of the religious motives must, in 
its turn, increase in proportion to the exaltation of man's 
ideas concerning the gods. Now there is nothing which has 
contributed more to this increase than the moral deepening 
of the idea of God that goes together with the thought 
of reward and punishment. And when the final stage of the 
development is reached — when exclusive stress is laid on 
the inward motive, and external actions are valued only in 
so far as the religious and moral disposition is evidenced 
by them — then the subjective factor in the appreciation of 
moral qualities obtains the place it deserves, and the objec- 



96] Religion and the Moral World-Order 1 1 7 

tive loses its old ascendancy. However exceptionable this 
ethical subjectivism may be when it takes the ^oistic form 
of an ascetic monasticism, still, the high value set upon 
self-examination as such must be regarded as a great moral 
gain. It adds incalculably to the power of the religious 
ethics to hold its own against the tendency to an external 
utilitarianism, which springs so easily from a purely objective 
consideration of moral phenomena. 

{d) The Idea of the Moral Order of the Universe. 

The ideas of reward and punishment, despite their great 
significance for ethical development, are open to objection 
on the ground that they employ egoism as an ethical motive. 
They value the moral action, that is, not for its own sake, 
but for the sake of future advantages that are to be gained 
by its means. While it is indubitable that they are among 
the most important factors in moral evolution — if indeed 
they are not the most important of all — still we cannot 
resist the conviction that they press immoral motives into 
the service of moral aims. But unpleasant as this con- 
sideration is at first sight, we shall be reconciled to the 
facts if we regard them from a somewhat different point 
of view. We must remember that 'motive' and 'aim,' as 
used here, indicate different stages in the process of ethical 
development. There is only one way in which mankind can 
transcend the primitive condition, when the moral conscious- 
ness has not grown strong enough to direct the will of itself, 
without the aid of extraneous motives: they must become 
familiar with morality as the result of conduct. The moral 
motive does not originate the moral aim ; it is the aim, 
attained in response to all sorts of promptings to action, that 
produces the moral motive. 

With this in mind, we cannot fail to trace a gradual 
purification of motives even within the thoughts that centre 



1 1 8 Religion and Morality [97 

round the ideas of reward and punishment. Fear of punish- 
ment, the earliest and lowest corrective of untamed impulses, 
yields by slow degrees to the nobler emotion of hope for 
better things in a future existence ; and the colours in which 
imagination paints the future life give clear evidence of the 
increasing purification of the moral consciousness. Then 
at last, when the highest stage is reached — when righteous- 
ness of outward conduct has ceased to be regarded, and the 
moral and religious nature of the inward motive becomes 
the one thing valued — the ideas of reward and punishment 
recede more and more into the background, or if they hold 
their former place, cease to be of any practical effect as 
motives. For the moral disposition, the inward moral 
motive, is not anything that can be produced at will by the 
consideration of the rewards or punishments that will fall 
to man's lot One may be outwardly righteous from selfish 
and intrinsically wrong motives ; but no wrong motives can 
give rise to purity of the inward disposition. Hence, when 
once the main emphasis in moral estimation is laid upon 
the inward motive, the thought of reward and punishment 
loses all its ethical significance. 

But if the thought of reward and punishment thus 
gradually disappears from among the ideas of the super- 
sensible world, these ideas themselves do not disappear with 
it. They take their origin not merely from the natural 
hopes and desires of mankind, and from the primitive sense 
of right that demands a justice which shall equalise the 
unmerited differences of life upon earth: their sources are 
as manifold as the moral feelings. The less influential the 
thought of reward and punishment becomes, therefore, the 
more largely are the ideas of a world beyond the grave 
moulded by the impulse to fashion an ideal copy of real 
life, in which all imperfections are blotted out And as the 
progressive deepening of the moral consciousness throws the 



97-98] Religion and the Moral World-Order 119 

ethical aspect of things into high relief, the world of the dead 
is transformed into the ideeU of a moral order of the universe. 
The real world is unable to fulfil objective moral require- 
ments, or to satisfy the endeavour after individual moral 
perfection ; so that the human mind is driven to the thought 
of an ideal world, morally perfect and therefore perfectly 
happy, as the indispensable complement of man's present 
sensible existence : a psychological process which, as history 
shows, runs its course the more certainly and irresistibly 
the more overt the discrepancy between ethical wishes and 
demands on the one hand, and their fulfilment in real life 
on the other. 

This view of the future life, which has its source in the 
ideas of reward and punishment and for a long time remains 
connected with them, is gradually separated from its original 
context At first it is only the virtuous who obtain entrance 
into the ideal world. Then the notion that the guilty undergo 
a process of purification arises to mitigate the terrors of the 
older idea of divine vengeance. Punishment is still looked 
for; but punishment will not endure for ever, and beyond 
it is the prospect of an all-embracing reconciliation. The 
doctrine of the transmigration of souls and the purgatory 
of Christian mythology — conceptions widely different in 
outward form, but really related both by community of 
ethical motive and by the symbolism in which that motive 
finds expression — show us this connection of the thoughts 
of vengeance and atonement in highly-wrought imaginative 
settings. The doctrine of transmigration provides for final 
expiation by constantly renewing the sinful life in lower 
animal forms, until the craving to be free from it has de- 
stroyed all other impulses. In the doctrine of purgatory, 
the element of fire suggests both the dominant ideas: the 
expiating pain, and the cleansing and purification that follow 
from it 



120 Religion and Morality [9B-99 

In course of time, even these last efforts to read a deeper 
ethical meaning into the mythological forms of the belief in 
immortality, by way of symbolic interpretation and systematic 
exposition, cease to be effectual, and only the philosophical 
form of the belief is left Philosophy is either content with 
the general notion of an ideal continuance of personal 
existence, — ^so, e,g,^ the later offshoots of Platonism in western 
philosophy; or sees the fulfilment of existence in the re- 
nunciation of all personal desires, and the return to that 
original principle of things from which individual existence is 
derived and into which it is again absorbed, — ^so the esoteric 
form of the Hindoo Vedic philosophy, and the modem pan- 
theism that is so closely related to it^ In both cases, in 
Platonism and in the Vedas, the development of the idea 
of purification reaches its climax in the idea of an universal 
spiritual life continued within an ideal cosmic order. The 
paths by which this consummation is attained, however, 
are very different While Platonism branched out into a 
number of systems, some of them widely separated in time 
and directly opposed in thought, the Vedic philosophy was 
the work of a single school, whose more advanced thinkers 
are piously concerned to uphold the work of their prede- 
cessors by proving the ethical value of the older views for 
the lower stages of human knowledge. We are here in 
presence of an unique phenomenon : a system which meets 
the religious needs of all stages of development at the same 
time, the higher stage explicitly accepting the lower as an 
imperfect form of the same truth. 

Because the ideas of reward and punishment disappear 
from the picture of the world beyond the grave, they do 
not, however, altogether cease to exist : they simply return to 
this present life, from which they were originally translated 

^ On the relation between the exoteric and esoteric doctrine of the Vedas, cf, 
Deussen, Das System des Vedanta^ Leipzig, 1883, pp. I04fr. 



99-IOO] Religion and the Moral World-Order 121 

to the life to come. A more refined moral consciousness feels 
the misery of a guilty conscience to be the heaviest punish- 
ment that man can suffer, while seeing in it a mode of expia- 
tion which stands to guilt in its inner aspect, its aspect for 
conscience, just as legal punishment stands to crime in its 
outward aspect of oiTence against society. This leads us to a 
final topic, closely connected with the ideas of reward and 
punishment : that of the religious sanction of the moral laws 
through their transformation into religious commands. 

{e) The Moral Laws ,as Religious Commands, 

It is a necessary consequence of this intimate connection 
between moral and religious ideas, which finds expression in 
the ascription of the moral order of the universe to divine 
regulation, that all moral precepts originally possess the 
character of religious commands. Morality, law and re- 
ligious worship are, in the first instance, inextricably 
commingled. Hence we find, almost universally, that 
legislation and the superintendence of public morals are 
originally priestly functions; and this outward unification 
of the various factors that go to make up the ethical and 
religious norms, their representation by one and the same 
individual, is in complete accordance with their confusion 
in the popular consciousness. A classical instance of the 
interweaving of the three sets of ideas, though one in which 
the specifically religious element is clearly predominant, is 
the Mosaic decalogue. This falls into two precisely equal 
parts. The first five commandments are exclusively religious 
and moral in character : four of them relate to the worship 
of the national God, to the hallowing of his name, and to 
the observance of the Sabbath, a day set apart especially 
for his veneration ; and these very general religious precepts 
are directly followed by the admonition to honour one's father 
and mother. The remaining five, on the other hand, are of 



122 Religion and Morality [loo 

the nature of legal norms: they forbid murder, adultery, 
theft, false witness and the fraudulent appropriation of what 
belongs to another. 

The difTerentiation of law, ethics and religion, which is 
barely hinted at in the decalogue in the separate grouping 
of the two classes of commandments, becomes explicit when, 
as happens in the first instance, the legal norms shake off 
their original connection with religious ideas. Later comes 
the separation of the moral commandments ; though duties 
like respect for age and filial piety long occupy an uncertain 
position midway between morality and law. But differ- 
entiation does not do away with mutual influence. There 
are two phenomena, in particular, which show that the 
original connection, if less patent, is still maintained, (i) In 
the first place, the law, after its secularisation, still retains 
the care of religious worship. Even in the cases where 
language seems to favour separation, as in the contrast drawn 
by the Romans between * Justum ' and * Injustum ' on the one 
hand and 'Fas' and *Nefas' on the other, the underlying 
motive is really the subordination of both legal and religious 
right and wrong to the general concept of law. And (2) 
secondly, a transgression of the law is always regarded as 
at the same time an offence against religion. This religious 
standpoint finds characteristic expression in the conception 
of siUy a conception which differs from the allied notions 
of error, crime and immoral action simply in the fact that 
it looks upon an offence against the moral law as an offence 
against religion. Here, too, however, the original unity of 
all the various ideas is clear enough : the fundamental mean- 
ing of ' sin ' {Sunde) is precisely the same as that of crime 
{Verbrecheti). To us, the term 'crime* suggests only the 
social and l^al aspect of the offence ; but that is the result 
of a differentiation of meanings which originated under the 
influence of the separation of religious and moral ideas. 



loo-i] Religion and the Moral World-Order 123 

The farther this separation proceeds, the more completely 
are the specifically religious commands withdrawn from the 
supervision of the civil power that stands surety for the 
protection of the legal norms. The guardianship of law 
gradually assumes the character of a purely social institution, 
which has to do with religion only in so far as the liberty to 
satisfy individual religious needs and the general moral value 
of religious worship call for legal protection. 

At the same time, the separation is and remains a one- 
sided matter. Religion cannot wash its hands of the 
commands that fall within the sphere of the legal norms, 
however sure the representatives of legal order may be 
that the duties of religious worship lie beyond their juris- 
diction. It regards the whole contents of the moral 
commands laid upon the individual as an inalienable 
element of his religious duties. Every moral command is 
thus apprehended by the religious consciousness as essentially 
a religious command ; every transgression of the moral laws, 
every grave oiTence against the general legal norms, is also 
a sifty an apostasy from God and his commandment 

Lastly, at the final st^e of this development, we have 
once more a complete fusion of the contents of the moral 
and religious commands, — a state of things which suggests 
the original unity from which the whole development began. 
But the resemblance must not mislead us ; this contents has 
become, in part, very difTerent from what it was. The 
external rules of religious worship, whose violation is usually 
accounted at a primitive stage of belief as one of the 
gravest offences, are now acknowledged to be morally 
indifferent Religion and morality tend more and more to 
blend in an inseparable unity, but in an unity that is 
purged of all ethically worthless elements. The difference 
between them has ceased to be a difference of contents; 
it consists solely in the point of view from which they 



124 Religion and Morality [101-2 

consider one and the same subject-matter. As Kant 
expresses it, religion has come to be the moral law 
regarded as a divine commandment 

Here, as before (p. 112), we find unmistakable traces of 
the influence of philosophy. It is most strikingly evidenced 
in the religion and philosophy of the Hindoos. Where the 
priestly office gave its holder the education of the philo- 
sopher, there could naturally be but little of the friction and 
opposition which have retarded the development both of 
philosophy and of the religious consciousness among 
western peoples. But this apart, the contrasts between the 
different stages of development are perhaps greater among 
the Hindoos than anywhere else, while they stand out all 
the more sharply for the fact that all stages have been 
preserved side by side (p. 120). Minutely as the life of the 
people at home and abroad is regulated by the mass of 
ceremonial rules, and rigorously as all these rules must be 
observed by the ordinary man who has not reached the 
higher stages of knowledge, the sage, who has attained to 
complete absorption in the divine being, is absolutely free 
from external restriction. The one thing lacking in this 
religious development is that direction of the religious 
sentiment into practical channels which is so characteristic 
of Christianity. And the consequence is that though it 
may come to dispense fully and completely with the 
observance of the outward, mythical and symbolical, rules 
of worship, yet the external ceremonial is never replaced 
by the moral and religious disposition and the practical 
religious life which expresses it, but only by an inactive 
mystical contemplation. On the other hand, there is one 
excellent feature of the philosophy of Brahminism which 
western philosophy, engaged from the first in a struggle 
with theology, does not display to the same degree: its 
recognition of the educational value of ceremonial rules for 



I02-3] Religion and the Moral World-Order 125 

the moral life. Only in this way can we explain the fact 
that the various stages of development have persisted peace- 
ably side by side, each regarding the other as authoritative in 
its own sphere. 

The development of moral commands from an originally 
unitary group of religious and moral regulations bears out 
the conclusion to which we had been led in the previous 
Sections of this Chapter, — the conclusion that the farther 
back we go, the more completely do the expressions of the 
moral and of the religious feelings coincide. To argue from 
this that morality has originated from religion would plainly 
be as unjustifiable as to infer, conversely, that religion has 
its source in morality. Either view would give precedence 
to one of the elements in the original interconnected whole. 
At the same time, the analysis of the developmental forms of 
religious ideas shows clearly enough that, wherever religion 
has meant the postulating of an ideal order of the universe, 
the strongest reh'gious motives have been furnished by moral 
requirements ; while, on the other hand, a firm belief in the 
existence of this ideal world has exerted an equally powerful 
influence upon the development of the moral life and of 
moral ideas, partly by way of the conception of reward 
and punishment, but chiefly through the creation of ideally 
perfect moral exemplars. But although it is impossible, in 
face of this interaction, to speak of a development of 
morality independently of the religious motives, there is 
nothing in the facts to prove the impossibility of a complete 
separation of morality from its ultimate religious connections 
in some one of the later stages of the moral life. In that 
event we should have to suppose that the religious motives, 
while they are indispensable to the origin and initial 
development of moral ideas, are not indispensable to their 
continuation, or to the final culmination of their develop- 



126 Religion and Morality [103-4 

ment And the thought that this may well be the case 
is at once suggested by the large number of philosophical 
attempts to find a basis for ethics, which abstract altogether 
from the religious factors. It is true that the popular moral 
consciousness, with which alone we are here dealing, is one 
thing, and the philosophical theory of morality another. 
Nevertheless it is conceivable that a real connection obtains 
between the two, however strongly theoretical abstraction 
may incline to emphasise certain points of view at the 
expense of others: a tendency whose importance we shall 
not minimise, remembering that one and the same subject- 
matter may give rise to entirely contradictory theories. 

But whether these speculations are right or wrong, there is 
one thing which everyone will admit without question : 
that if morality is to be cut off from its original substrate 
of religious ideas there must necessarily be other motives, 
over and above the religious, which can give occasion to a 
development of moral conceptions. These will, of course, be 
the motives exclusively emphasised in the various instances 
of philosophical abstraction which we have just mentioned. 
Now there is only one group of phenomena which can 
furnish motives at all comparable with the religious motives 
in moral power: the customs and usages which have their 
root in the social conditions of human life. That these 
conditions exercise a very considerable influence on the 
development of moral ideas is indubitable, whether the 
religious influence is regarded as permanent or as merely 
temporary. This latter point itself, however, can be de- 
cided only after an investigation of both classes of ruling 
motives, the social as well as the religious. Hence we pass 
from our consideration of the religious connections of the 
moral life to its necessary complement, an inquiry into 
those socicd factors in morality that manifest themselves in 
Qustom, 



I04] 



o 



CHAPTER III. 

CUSTOM AND THE MORAL UFE. 

I. THE UNIVERSAL CHARACTERISTICS OF CUSTOM. 

(a) Instinct and Custom. 
N£ of the favourite topics of discussion in the legal 



theories of earlier centuries was the question of the 
way in which human society first originated. Traces of the 
various answers proposed are to be found in philosophy 
and anthropology even at the present day. Whether legal 
order arises at the dictation of an irresistible necessity out of 
the * struggle for existence/ a struggle which Hobbes charac- 
terised so vividly in his homo homini lupus ; or whether, 
conversely, the conflict of selfish interests results from the 
debasing of an original purity of life and conduct: these 
were the questions to which the older theory of society 
confined discussion, as if no middle ground could possibly 
be taken between the two extremes. And yet the one 
incontestable fact in this field of uncertainty and conjecture 
is that however far back we push historical inquiry, and 
however low the stage of civilisation that we choose for 
observation, mankind appears always and everywhere as 
subject to the same good and evil impulses which constitute 
to-day the sources of its happiness and misery. In fact, the 
question whether there was ever a race of solitaries is, if 
anything, less possible of discussion than the question 



128 Custom and the Moral Life [104-5 

whether men have existed without language and without 
religion. For although the animals certainly lack language, 
in our sense of the term, and also, so far as we know, 
religious feelings and ideas, the forms of social combination 
and the exhibitions of love and hate connected with them 
extend almost as far back in the scale of organic nature 
as the simplest manifestations of sensation and will. 

A consideration of the facts of the moral life must, there- 
fore, take account of the relationship which here obtains 
between man and the animals. We must admit, without 
reservation, that the simplest feelings and impulses of the 
animals and of man are essentially the same, and, con- 
sequently, must not hesitate to recognise in certain 
phenomena of the social life of animals the anticipation 
of those aspects of our own morality which are dependent 
on the forms of human society. The old question of the 
origin of moral government is thus, in a manner, transferred 
from anthropology to zoology. Its discussion, so far as it 
can be discussed at all, will therefore consist simply in the 
indication of the natural conditions under which associations 
based on common impulses came to be made among 
creatures of the same kind, long before the advent of 
civilisation and the intellectual growth which civilisation 
implies. 

If this preliminary biological survey were of no further 
use, it would be of distinct service from a methodological 
point of view. For animal associations, however far they 
He below the very most primitive forms of human society, 
have this much at least in common with it, that they 
subserve the attainment of certain endsy valuable for the 
life either of all or, at any rate, of the majority of the 
individuals associated. Now a natural mistake to make in 
cases of this kind, and a mistake which as a matter of fact 
is ordinarily the first to be made, is the confusion of end 



I05-6] General Characteristics of Custom 129 

attained with its efficient cause (here, more specifically, 
the motive underlying the actions consciously executed). 
And there are so many arrangements within our own 
social system, which have indubitably originated from 
reflection on the ends to be achieved by them, that a 
refutation of the error as it affects theories of human 
society is exceedingly difficult, and to the popular mind 
perhaps never entirely convincing. With the animals it is 
different The discrepancy between the effect actually 
produced and the reflection which would be necessary for 
its purposed and intentional production is too great to allow 
of the persistence of the mistake even in popular opinion. 
Fortunately, too, it is just the simplest and most wide- 
spread of the animal impulses that give clearest evidence 
of the impossibility of any such conscious weighing of 
ends. Everyone admits, in a general way, that the animals, 
like ourselves, take nourishment not for the sake of repairing 
the loss of bodily vigour and gathering new force for 
future labour, but simply because hunger is a disagreeable 
and satiety an agreeable feeling. When we come to the 
social impulses of animals, the phenomena and their 
conditions are both alike apt to be of a more complex 
order ; but our attitude towards them must remain the 
same. Migratory birds do not go in flocks because they 
know that they are in this way less liable to stray from 
their course or to be attacked by enemies ; and ants and 
bees do not nest and hive in common because of a con- 
viction that they can never attain in isolation the ends 
that must be fulfilled by all if they are to live. These 
things are the result of certain impulses that bind the 
individuals together, whether temporarily (as with the 
migrants) or permanently (as with the ants and bees) ; 
and though we cannot fully grasp the psychical nature 
of such impulses — ^seeing that we cannot transport ourselves 

I. K 



130 Custom and the Moral Life [106-7 

into the consciousness of an entirely different creature — we 
may at any rate affirm without hesitation that they no 
more arose from reflection upon their physiological purpose 
than did the impulses of eating and drinking. 

The question how the fundamental animal impulses, the 
impulses which form the inalienable natural foundation of 
human society as well as of animal association, first 
originated, is a question which we shall in all probability 
never be able to answer. We may conjecture that two 
primary organic impulses, the nutritive and the sexual, have 
furnished the principal points of departure for evolutionary 
divergence. First of all, the purposes subserved by them 
have grown increasingly more complex ; and secondly, in 
virtue of the psychological law of the reaction of effect 
upon cause, the animals which possess them have become 
more and more highly organised. There can be little 
doubt that intelligence has played its part in the total 
process, even among the animals. Its effects are, however, 
largely incomprehensible, for the reason that the facts 
before us are simply the results of an immeasurable 
evolution, the course of which can at best be inferred only 
from the faint traces that remain of it in the graded series 
of habits displayed by nearly related animals.^ 

But when we pass beyond this point of ultimate agree- 
ment between man and the animals, we are reminded at 
once of the immense difference that obtains between them. 
Both derive their habits of life, individual and social alike, 
in large proportion from previous generations. But the 
animal's inheritance consists solely in the physical effects 
produced upon individual organisation by the development 
of the race ; while that of man, at any rate in great measure, 
has been further preserved in the form of conscious tradition, 
Man alone is conscious of his connection with the past. 

^ Cf, on this point my Physiol. Psychologies 3 Aufl., ii. pp. 411 flf. 



I07-8] General Characteristics of Custom 131 

The animal consciousness is continuous, as a general rule, 
only from moment to moment; in any case its continuity 
is confined to the limits of the individual life. The 
continuity of the human consciousness, even at its lowest 
level, embraces at least the tradition of several generations ; 
while at the highest stage it transcends the limitations even 
of national individuality, and rises to the conception of a 
connected development of the whole human race. 

It is this conscious connection with the past, and its 
correlate of an outlook upon the farther future beyond the 
individual life, which give human society its distinctive 
character. When an animal follows the laws that have 
determined the differentiation of impulses within its species, 
it does so at the hest of definite conscious motives ; but it 
is subject at the same time to a mechanical constraint which 
allows of but very little deviation from those laws. In the 
case of man, on the other hand, there are two principal 
factors at work to make both individual and social life 
immeasurably richer and more complex. The one is to 
be found in the freer exercise of the will; the other in that 
comprehensive prevision^ that consideration of past and 
future in their bearings upon the present, of which man 
alone is capable. 

It is the presence of these two factors in human life 
which justifies our speaking of custom as a purely human 
phenomenon. A custom is any norm of voluntary action that 
has been developed in a national or tribal community. How- 
ever rigorously individual conduct may be prescribed by 
custom, one is still left free to obey or disobey, as one 
chooses. In animal instinct, on the other hand, the will is 
always determined by unequivocal, simple motives, so that 
freedom of choice either does not exist at all or is confined to 
the narrowest circle of individual habit Hence, while habit 
is common to man with the animals, custom is an exclusively 



132 Custom and the Moral Life [108-9 

human prerogative. And it is custom, too, that transfers the 
principle of freedom, which in the animal consciousness does 
not extend beyond the realm of habit, to the general con- 
sciousness of society. This is, however, the natural result 
of the extension of consciousness beyond the limits of the 
individual life. Custom and instinct are both alike the 
outgrowth of individual habits. But while instinct sums up 
the habits of countless generations in the form of mechanised, 
and therefore unconscious movements, in custom the settled 
habits of the human race and of its subdivisions still retain 
the character of consciously operative motives. Instinct 
is habitual conduct that has become medianical ; custom, 
habitual conduct that has become generic. In instinct, habits 
that were originally conscious have become transformed into 
an unconscious activity ; in custom, habits and their motives 
have passed over together into a more general conscious- 
ness. The change of mental into mechanical is not, of course, 
confined to the animals. There are human instincts as well as 
animal, especially in the domain of habit. But the develop- 
ment of custom presupposes history^ — not in the mechanical 
sense of a means of holding events together that is foreign to 
and outside of the events themselves, but in the more original 
meaning of a series of events that is conscious of its own 
connection. The line of division between man and the 
animals is drawn on the side of consciousness by the connection 
of individual with general thought^ just as it is drawn on the 
side of will by the plurality of motives and the freedom of 
choice that goes with it. 

In spite of these essential differences, however, animal 
instincts form the analogues of human custom both in origin 
and in result. To this we may add the fact that the general 
contents of the purposes subserved are the same for both. 
There are individual and social instincts. The former, based 
upon the nutritive impulse, the most widespread and per- 



109] General Characteristics of Custom 133 

sistent of all the organic impulses, are directed upon the 
preservation and protection of the individual. The social 
instincts, controlled for the most part by the sexual impulse, 
are directed upon the protection and maintenance of the race; 
though the pursuance of this aim naturally leads to all sorts 
of reactive influences upon the individual life, — influences 
usually beneficial, but sometimes disturbing. Custom, in the 
same way, while always a common norm of conduct, aims at 
both individual and social ends. It, too, in the last resort, is 
based upon the need of protection felt by larger or smaller 
groups within society; and the same need keeps it alive, 
though generally in altered form, after its original purpose 
has ceased to be. But the ends subserved by custom have 
come to a much more varied growth than those of instinct 
Keeping steady pace with the intellectualisation of the life- 
history of the race, they have gradually absorbed the entire 
contents even of the higher ends of human living. Indeed, 
after the most inalienable ends of the individual and of the 
community are brought under the rule of law, the more con- 
straining norm of life that has slowly emerged from custom, 
it is principally the freer and more purely intellectual interests 
of life that fall beneath the dominance of custom proper. 

It is natural to suppose that the same need of protection 
which is satisfied by custom, and which, at least in many 
cases, has been effectual in preserving custom, is also the 
cause of its origination. Our way of eating and dressing, 
however widely it may differ from the primitive mode, is still, 
upon the whole, that best adapted for the satisfaction of our 
present needs. So with examples taken from the less material 
side of custom : the garb of mourning, the robes of the priest 
and of the judge, — good manners, courtesy in our daily inter- 
course, even the often burdensome forms of etiquette, — assure 
the individual or the community an effectual protection 
against manifestations of coarseness and selfish brutality. 



134 Custom and the Moral Life [109-10 

Looking at these things, we may well imagine that need 
of the protection which custom furnishes occasioned the 
origin of all the different customs. In reality, however, it is 
here that the remark which we made just now in speaking of 
the analogy between instinct and custom (p. 128) finds its 
most striking application. Fulfilment of purpose, however 
complete, does not insure the identity of purpose and motive. 
And the history of custom forms one of the most remark- 
able illustrations of an original incongruity between the two. 
History shows that almost all, and especially all the more 
significant forms of life have their root in religious motives 
that have disappeared from the consciousness of a later age, 
and thus teaches that man's self-education in custom and 
morality begins with the development of religious worship.^^ 

(i) The Religious Origin of Custom, 

Wherever it is possible to trace a custom at all far back on 
the road to its origin, we are led to ideas that are as a rule 
radically different from the later motives. In the great 
majority of cases, religious ideas appear to constitute the 
primary sources from which custom has been derived. 
Custom, />., was at first an act of worship^ and so owes its 
obligatory power partly to the universality of religious 
ceremonial and partly to the important place that ritual 
holds in general estimation by reason of its supposed 
influence on the favour or disfavour of the gods. 

This connection with religious worship is almost always 
forgotten in the later stages of custom. Among civilised 
peoples it is preserved, if at all, merely in certain faint sugges- 
tions, which can oftentimes be fully understood only by 
comparison with the more vivid originals. And even among 
the lowest of primitive races we ordinarily find habits of life, 
divorced from their religious origin, and therefore incompre- 
hensible to those who practise them, persisting alongside 



iio-i] General Characteristics of Custom 135 

of the actual forms of religious ceremonial At the same 
time, however, we come upon a second factor, which is of 
extreme importance, especially for ^i^at preservation of custom. 
While its original significance is fading away, the action that 
has grown habitual by repetition creates a new purpose for 
itself, — a purpose of which the agent is not always distinctly 
conscious, but which nevertheless is strong enough to deter- 
mine the further changes of the custom, and, under certain cir- 
cumstances, its final decay. So that if we approach the subject 
from the genetic standpoint, most of the customs that obtain 
even among the civilised peoples of the present day prove to 
be survivals of older ceremonial acts^ whose original purposes 
have been forgotten, and which have consequently been 
pressed into the service of new ends. Since these new ends 
may themselves be changed, the contents of custom is 
continually shifting, despite all its constancy of form. Just as 
the same word may convey entirely different meanings at 
different periods in the history of a language, so custom, 
however conservative in mode of outward manifestation, is in 
purpose undergoing perpetual readjustment to the immediate 
needs of the time. 

Since the tracing back of every separate custom to its 
original significance is, for the present at any rate, a matter 
of impossibility, there must be many cases where a religious 
origin can only be more or less probably conjectured. More- 
over, it is indubitable that certain customs have their source 
in traditions of a different order. Ancient rules of law^ e.g,, 
are not infrequently perpetuated in usages whose original 
meaning has long ceased to be understood. All over the 
world we find marriage ceremonies, many of them more playful 
than serious, that remind us of the primal forms of marriage 
— robbery and purchase. Other customs, like the Greek and 
Roman tradition that the mothers of bride and bridegroom 
should bring the newly-married pair together, suggest a very 



136 Custom and the Moral Life [111-2 

ancient and once widely prevalent law of inheritance and 
property, which gave the mother, and not the father, the first 
claim upon the children. But while we may admit that custom 
had its original roots in all the departments of life, as it 
pervades and penetrates them all, we must not forget that in 
the primitive state of human society, from which the develop- 
ment of most customary usages dates its first beginning, these 
various departments of life were still entirely undifferentiated ; 
and more especially that the whole of life, the commonest 
needs and habits of living included, was permeated through 
and through by religious ideas. Every action of any impor- 
tance is originally, whatever else it may be, a religious action ; 
and the norms of conduct, which a man feels to be binding 
upon him in the more serious moments of his life, are soon 
applied to all the unimportant actions that at all resemble the 
more critical. Just as the images of the gods pass from 
temple to dwelling house, so is prayer transferred from the 
sacrificial feast to the daily meal. And the tradition men- 
tioned just now, that the mother shall conduct the bride 
to the husband appointed for her, finds its religious setting in 
the fact that the wife was the priestess of the house : the 
protection of the hearth was assigned in the ancient world to 
a goddess, not to a god. It may be, then, that the wife owes 
her position as mistress of the house in the first instance 
to her priestly office. 

There are, it is true, many cases in which a custom that has 
lost its first significance is not made to subserve any novel 
purpose of at all serious character. Some of the marriage 
customs referred to above, e,g,^ the mock struggle of the 
bridegroom with the relatives of the bride, still current in 
civilised communities, are illustrations of this fact But 
although apparent exceptions to our rule, such cases furnish 
remarkable evidence of the tenacity of existence exhibited by 
customs that are supported by generations of observance. 



1 12-3] General Characteristics of Custom 137 

Indeed, it might be doubted whether the life of a custom 
is better assured by its accordance with a new purpose or by 
its own inherent tendency to continue in existence. 

Customs that have survived independently of all aim or 
purpose are of no further significance for the moral life. 
They are the decaying remnants of a long forgotten civilisa- 
tion ; and if they satisfy any modem need, it is merely the 
need of amusement. But so far as they do fulfil any need 
they are answering a purpose, and thus come under the rule 
that customs which have lost their original usefulness owe 
their preservation to their utility for some new end. At the 
same time, we find that linguistic usage emphasises the 
connection between morality and custom {Sittliche^ Sitte: 
p. 24) in generally reserving the name of * custom ' {Sitte) for 
those habits of living that are immediately related to the 
moral life. The relation need not necessarily be one of 
amity, however. Cannibalism and wife-stealing, ^.^., are 
accounted customs {Sitten\ although no one would maintain 
that their influence upon morality was anything but pre- 
judicial. And a 'bad' custom is still a custom, so long 
as the character of an obligatory rule attaches to it 
Purposelessness cannot of itself, then, reduce the usages 
and amusements that have become meaningless from the 
rank of customs, but only that absence of obligatory power 
which follows from the absence of an at all serious purpose. 
To a certain degree, of course, the power of habit can 
replace that of purpose. But in that case the usage, 
however meaningless it has become, tends again to assume 
the character of a custom.^ 

^ It has been remarked by von Jhbring {Zweck im Recht^ ii. p. 23) that 
language shows a tendency to reserve the singular form ' Sitte ' for good customs, 
while the plural ' Sitten ' is used indifferently for good and bad customs alike. 
The statement is probably correct, with the limitation that the singular ' Sitte ' is 
the collective term for all the customs {Sitten) recognised in a society : cf, the 
negative form UnsUte, by which a particular custom {Sitte) may be singled out 



138 Custom and the Moral Life [113-4 

The customs of modern civilisation are so far removed 
from their religious origin that religion and custom now seem 
to be two entirely different matters. The division has been 
furthered by the same process that led to the gradual 
separation of ideas of law from the sphere of custom 
proper, and left to custom only the survivals of legal 
practice that have come down from remote times. The 
place that the mere iclea of obligation held in the general 
consciousness has been taken by the obligatory norm of law. 
Now law differs from custom in enforcing the duty which it 
enjoins by definite penalties inflicted for its non-observance. 
It is true that this enforcement has been relaxed, in part at 
any rate, in the sphere of its earliest operation, the sphere of 
religious obligations. Nevertheless, its introduction marks a 
critical point in history. For thenceforth the commandments 
of religion and the acts which proceed from obedience to 
them are excluded from the realm of custom proper. 
Religion promises reward for faith and punishment for 
want of faith, flrst in this world and afterwards in the 
next; and its commandments constitute accordingly a 
peculiar province of law, even though no civil power may 
come to their support by punishing cases of disobedience. 
Indeed, it might be said that the specific character of 
religiotis law is clearly brought out just in proportion as the 
punitive power of the church ceases to be external, and is 
confined to a control of heart and conscience. The first 
step in this direction is taken with the transfer of reward 
and punishment to the realm of future hopes and fears, from 

from custom {Sitte) proper, and actually set over against it as its opposite. This 
application of the collective term ' Sitte ' in the sense of the Roman boni mores 
is evidently one of those reactionary changes of meaning of which language 
affords so many instances. After * Sittlichkeit ' has been derived firom ' Sitte,' 
' Sitte ' is used in the sense of the derivative, in accordance with the idea — easily 
enough read into the derivation, but not natural to it — that a man's moral 
(sittlich) attitude finds expression in his 'Sitte.' — Cf, chap, i., p. 24. 



114] General Characteristics of Custom 139 

which, while selfish interest predominates, religion looks to 
receive the greatest aid in enforcing obedience to her 
commands. 

(r) The Changes of Purpose in Custom. 

While the religious norms themselves are permanently re- 
moved from the dominance of custom, its hold upon those 
rudiments of earlier acts of worship which it has either 
pressed into the service of new ends or handed on without 
regard to purpose — except, perhaps, the purpose of amusement 
— grows stronger and stronger. Every phase of our modem 
life is thus permeated with usages that have survived from 
long forgotten cults, and which in their power to adapt 
themselves to the new thoughts that come with changed 
conditions of life seem to repeat in the mental realm, only 
in infinitely greater variety, the capacity for transformation 
exhibited in the organic world. Among them, too, are many 
fossilised forms, the petrified remains of once living actions, 
which owe their preservation simply and solely to that vis 
inerticB which is as characteristic of our ideas as it is of 
material bodies. Now if we consider the bare results of 
these transformations, without reference to their historical 
past, we may easily be misled into looking for their explana- 
tion within the circle of our present experience, and substi- 
tuting the aims which they do or might subserve to-day for 
the true causes of their origination. But in doing this we 
should be forgetting a law that is of the very highest 
importance in all mental, but more especially in moral 
development: the law that mankind is prepared for the 
adoption of new ends of life by modes of conduct already 
existent, but primarily adapted to other ends. Here, again, 
the change of significance in words furnishes an instance of 
an analogous process which will be most useful to us. The 
formation of a new idea is greatly facilitated — sometimes, 



140 Custom and the Moral Life ["4-5 

perhaps, only becomes possible — when the thought finds its 
appropriate word already present in language, and needing 
no more than a slight shift of meaning to meet the demands 
now laid upon it. Custom, however, need not by any means 
always be good custom ; so that the habits and usages which 
have become estranged from their first significance may be 
taken possession of by indifferent, or even by immoral 
purposes. The tendency of custom to live on in new forms 
after the decay of its original contents paves the way for the 
origination of the most varied purposes. And if, in the last 
resort, it is a moral development that secures the greatest 
advantages from this law of persistence in the midst of 
change, credit is not therefore to be given to the law, but 
only to the forces of which that moral development is the 
expression. 

It will be our aim in what follows to select from the 
wealth of material afforded by the history of custom the 
principal cases in which the effects of the transformation 
of a custom have proved to be ethically valuable. We may 
begin, therefore, by giving here a few illustrations of the 
process of transformation itself. These are chosen intention- 
ally from among habits of life that are ethically indifferent ; 
while within this field selection is governed by the distance 
separating the present purpose of the usage from that which 
it originally subserved. 

(i) A custom common to almost all civilised peoples, and 
yet entirely repugnant to a finer moral sense, is that of 
the funeral banquet. It has been explained by the 
hypothesis that the survivors of the dead man, wishing to 
attract a large train of mourners, offered a feast to all who 
attended the funeral, as a compensation for their trouble 
in coming. At first given voluntarily, this was afterwards 
demanded by the company, so that the custom was kept 
alive, long after its original motive had died out, by the 



1 1 5-6] General Characteristics of Custom 141 

selfishness of the indifferent participants in the funeral 
ceremony. In this way an observance that originated in the 
voluntary act of an individual has passed into a duty whose 
fulfilment is demanded by the community, and which is 
exceedingly burdensome to the first originator of the custom, 
the true mourner.^ Now it is not improbable that this 
explanation really lays its finger on the motives which have 
contributed in many societies to the preservation of the 
usage ; although it would seem that where the members 
of the funeral train are anxious to obtain their share of 
the funeral ' baked meats,' there must be not a few among 
the mourners proper whose sorrow can be mitigated by 
the thought of a sumptuous repast to follow. For where the 
funeral feast has survived, it is for the most part confined 
to the well-to-do classes of the community : the rich peasant 
is keenly conscious that the greatness of his possessions 
will be measured by the scale of his funeral preparations. 
But however much or little probability the explanation may 
have when we look at the custom from the modern point 
of view, it most assuredly does not touch the question of 
origin. A custom of this kind, so widely disseminated among 
peoples both primitive and civilised that it seems to be one 
of the earliest habitual usages of mankind in all parts 
of the world, could not possibly have originated in con- 
siderations which, while intelligible enough under certain 
circumstances, are applicable only to special and particular 
conditions. If we trace the funeral feast to its original 
and more living forms, we find it closely connected with 
other acts of religious ritual : it forms an essential element 
in the warship of the dead. In German villages to-day 
the funeral feast has become a secular observance, standing 
quite apart from the religious usages of the burial ceremony ; 
but for our forefathers the case was very different. The 

^ Jhering, Zwtck im Reeht^ ii. p. 244. 



142 Custom and the Moral Life [116-7 

dead man himself was given food and drink, as well as 
arms and ornaments ; and the funeral banquet was held by 
the survivors at the place of burial, as it still is among many 
primitive races. 

There are originally, then, two motives that concur to 
establish this custom. In its earliest form the funeral feast 
is a sacrificial feast Primitive man oflfers sacrifice to the 
gods at every important occasion of his life, and will very 
certainly make an offering at the burial of a kinsman. In 
part he desires to obtain the divine favour for his dead ; 
but in part — and this is probably the more ancient idea of 
the two— the dead man is himself an object of worship. 
The souls of the dead hover over the dwellings of the living, 
whether to injure or to protect their inmates; so that acts 
which symbolise adoration or propitiation of the dead always 
play an important part in primitive worship. A second 
motive, which came into operation at a later date, but may 
gradually have ousted the original worship of the dead, lies 
in the symbolic meaning of a feast eaten in common. The 
common enjoyment of meat and drink is for primitive man a 
religious symbol of brotherhood ; more especially if the feast 
have anything of solemnity about it, if it be sanctioned, so to 
speak, by the presence of the gods. The desire to share the 
last meal with the dead, to partake oneself of the food given 
him for his journey to the other world, springs, therefore, 
from a feeling of piety akin to that which impels primitive 
man to eat of the animal that he has sacrificed to the gods. 

It is this final form of the funeral feast whose traces have 
been longest preserved. With its passage from a sensible to 
a symbolic meaning, it has gradually lost its religious 
reference. The funeral feast, that is, becomes simply a 
commemorative feast, at which mention is made in con- 
versation and discourse of the virtues of the dead. Thus 
after the battle of Chaeronea the parents and brothers of the 



1 17-8] General Characteristics of Ctistom 143 

slain assembled at the house of Demosthenes to celebrate 
a solemn feast. There is nothing inherently improbable in 
tlie thought that the sense of piety which led the educated 
Greek of the Attic period thus to celebrate the memory 
of his dead should have left its traces in the funeral feast 
of the present day. As a matter of fact, that is not the case ; 
the custom is, to modern feeling, one best honoured in the 
breach. The reason may be sought, in part at any rate, 
in the disfavour which Christianity has shown to the old 
Germanic funeral banquet, as to so many other of the 
practices of heathendom. When a custom once lapses into 
disesteem, it easily falls a prey to impure motives, in 
obedience to the rule, common enough in such cases, that 
the eflfect reacts upon its cause. 

(2) A similar instance of a custom that has become 
practically meaningless, though not advanced quite so far 
on its downward course, is that of toasting^ the drinking of 
healths. In origin it is connected with the custom of the 
funeral feast : the one goes back to the food-offering, the 
other to the drink-offering, of primitive times. That one 
man should drink with another was regarded by our fore- 
fathers as a more sacred symbol of brotherhood even than 
the sitting together at meat. This belief was derived, in part, 
from the impression made by the stimulating effect of the 
wine, mead, etc., whose intoxicating properties have led to their 
choice by all peoples at all times for ceremonial purposes. 
In part, however, the idea of the inspiriting draught is 
associated with that of the blood, universally considered by 
primitive man to be the seat of the vital forces. He who 
drinks the blood of an enemy takes to himself the dead 
man's strength; he who exchanges a drop of blood with 
a friend becomes thereby his blood-relation, as if a son of 
the same mother. Even at the present day the Indian and 
the Negro conclude the bond of blood-brotherhood by this 



144 Custom and the Moral Life [ns 

custom of exchange. But as the age grew milder, the 
symbolism of a draught from the same cup took the place 
of the original ceremony, though much of the old significance 
was lost with the disappearance of the impressive blood-rite. 
Soon the draught of brotherhood extended its range beyond 
the individual ; it became an emblem of the union of host 
and invited guests, the cup travelling from hand to hand at 
the common meal. So the symbol reduces, first of all, to a 
simple sign of friendship, and finally comes to be a mere 
expression of social attention. When the cup ceased to pass 
from mouth to mouth, and the greater luxury of the time 
gave each guest his own drinking glass, the common draught 
from the same bowl was indicated by the touching of glasses, 
and the draught of brotherhood between two comrades had 
degenerated into the modern toast. There can be no doubt 
that when these usages first originated the memory of the 
more living forms which they displaced was still present in 
some degree. To-day the custom is entirely divorced from 
its origin, and the only character which it has in common 
with the blood-draught is the general feeling of good fellow- 
ship. Nor is there any reason why even this motive, which 
still has in it something of the motives of the original custom, 
should not in its turn be ousted by some entirely foreign 
purpose. Indeed, there are cases in which the substitution 
has actually taken place: as we see, e,g,^ when the Asiatic 
despot causes his cupbearer to drink first from the profTered 
cup, to assure himself against poison ; or when he himself 
tastes the cup presented to his guest in order to relieve him 
of a like anxiety. And it may be, perhaps, that this purpose 
comes nearer to our present point of view than the long- 
foigotten ceremony of the common drink-oflfering and the 
pact of blood-brotherhood ; so that if we are looking for the 
cause of these world-old usages among the purposes that 
seem possible to us to-day, we shall probably turn our 



[ii8-9 General Characteristics of Custom 145 

thoughts in the first instance to this very example of the 
suspicious tyrant^ Nevertheless, there is but little likelihood 
that the custom, as it exists at the present time, is derived 
from any such abnormal oflfshoot of the original usage. It 
has come down in the direct line of descent ; and remote as 
it is from its original in other respects, still shows its lineage 
in the similarity of the feelings which it expresses. 

(3) There is yet another custom, widely different in its 
present form from that just discussed, which probably takes 
its origin from the same source : the custom of the servant's 
fee or pourboire (Trinkgeld), Just as our ancestors looked 
upon the festal draught from a single cup as a token of peace 
and friendship, so they made the food offered to the enter- 
ing guest a sign of welcome. Sometimes it is a proffered 
draught, sometimes bread and salt, — emblems of food in 
general, — which give the stranger his unspoken invitation 
to sit at table with the members of the household. But in a 
primitive age table companionship is equivalent to com- 
panionship in sacrifice. Injury to the guest-friend, whose 
person is made sacred by a sacrificial bond, concluded as it 
were in the very presence of the gods, is counted as a great 
offence against the gods themselves. Here, too, the symbolic 
significance of the custom probably arose out of an original 
sensible meaning, attaching to the draught shared by wel- 
coming host and welcomed guest; and here, too, first the 
sensible and then the symbolic meaning have gradually died 
out But in proportion as the usage lost its original purpose 
did it adapt itself to the service of new ends : the first stage 
in the process being the transformation of what was once 
only secondary into the chief purpose. The drink proffered 
for the refreshment of the new-come guest appealed to a later 
age neither as religious symbol nor as token of protection ; 
the offer was an act of humanity to a stranger, an act of 

^ As Jhbring has done, op, cit.^ p. 248. 
I. L 



T46 Custom and the Moral Life [119-20 

kindly attention to a friend, for which a return was expected 
by the giver under like circumstances. The custom persisted 
in this form until comparatively recent times. Indeed, its 
continuance is necessary here and there, under certain of the 
simpler conditions of country life, even at the present day. 
If the friend has to travel a long distance to make his visit, 
his refreshment by food and drink becomes a necessity. If 
the befriended houses are less far apart, the entertainment is 
given, now and again, merely as an act of friendship. And 
the material character of the refreshment changes correspond- 
ingly, until at last it reduces once more to the simple draught, 
— ^the draught which was so highly prized by our forefathers, 
and of which the guest always felt called upon to partake. 
Lastly, when the business of a town life makes the entertain- 
ment of the visitor a more and more unwelcome burden both 
to giver and to receiver, the offering of a draught is made 
only to the workman who needs its stimulation for his work, 
or to the friend's servant sent with a message, to whom one 
cannot suggest payment, but whom one wishes in some way 
to recompense for his trouble, etc., etc. But even this final 
metamorphosis of the ancient symbol of hospitality and 
friendship at last disappears, under stress of the constant 
occupation of a city life. The draught is replaced by a 
present of money, with which the workman or messenger 
can buy its equivalent ; or, if he is a temperate and careful 
man, something more useful in its stead. So arose the 
custom of giving * drink-money.* There is in it no thought 
at all of that relationship of host and guest so prominent in 
the older usage with whose decay it came into being. It is 
applied, without restriction, to all possible relations where 
compensation is to be made for service rendered, but the 
amount of compensation is left to the judgment of the 
giver. This half-way position between wage and gift natu- 
rally limits the giving of drink-money to a certain group 



I20-I] General Characteristics of Ctistom 147 

of cases ; it can be practised, e.g,^ only where the recipient 
belongs to a lower social class than the donor. To offer 
drink-money to an equal would be to offer an insult It is 
this emphasis upon social inequality, inherent in the giving of 
drink-money, that constitutes its bad moral effect, justly 
emphasised by Jhering.^ It is one of the ethically most 
important features of refined customs, of *good manners,' 
that they aim at a total disregard of the external differences 
in social position ; while, conversely, every custom that makes 
one's social inferior feel his inferiority must injure his self- 
respect, and so does violence to morality. The giving of 
drink-money is thus a remarkable instance of a custom 
whose original significance has changed into its direct 
opposite. It has passed from a symbol of friendship to 
an expression of the subordination of servant to master. 
Usage, it is true, has set up standards of practice, trans- 
forming the gift into a fee whose minimal limit is fixed by 
the constraining power of custom, while only the maximum 
depends upon the will of the individual. But this last 
uncertainty remains to stamp the present made with the 
double character of w^e and of free gift, if not of charity 
pure and simple. 

There is, too, yet another regard in which the original 
custom has here been transformed into its opposite. Whereas 
the draught was formerly presented by the host to the guest, 
it is now, on the contrary, the servant of the host — e.g., the 
waiter handing the glass — who receives the drink-money. In 
view of all these changes, it is not surprising that some 
authorities, judging from the present significance of drink- 
money, have declared it to be a degenerate sub-form of wage, 
and so traced it to an original free gift on the part of in- 
dividuals, the bestowal of which has gradually become an 

^ Jhering, Zweck im Recht, ii. pp. 251, 284; and Westbrmann*s Monats- 
hefiey April, 1882. 



148 Ctistom and the Moral Life [121-2 

universal habit^ But surely the very word 'drink-money' 
points us unmistakably to the original custom of the proffered 
draught, whose place the peculiar ' sub-form of wage ' has 
subsequently taken.^ 

Enough examples have now been adduced to show, in 
general, how ancient ceremonial acts have become trans- 
formed into customs of wholly different contents. Further 
evidence of the process, and evidence that bears more 
directly upon ethics, will be given later on, when we come 
to discuss the principal forms of life, individual and social, 
that stand under the protection of custom. But even if 
we take it as proven — and it is obvious that the proof 
can never be anything more than approximative — that all 
customs which have an historical past of any extent behind 
them go back to this religious root, it still remains an 
entirely open question whether we have in religion their 
really ultimate and primary source. For the worship of 
the gods must itself have been developed out of some- 
thing, out of some preceding conditions. And if there 
ever was a time when mankind lived without religion and 
without worship, even then they must have had certain 
common habits of living. Might not, then, these same habits 
have been the determining influence that shaped the first 
beginnings of religious worship } This would simply mean 
that usages which had already become universal, under stress 

* Jhering, op, cit,t p. 246. 

' Under the simpler conditions of country life the proffered draught is still 
found, not infrequently, as the peculiar reward of the messenger : e,g. , of the 
errand boy who delivers a piece of goods from the merchant, or of the carter who 
brings the winter's supply of wood. In Switzerland, as I have myself observed, 
the custom persists in this form even in the cities. In one respect, however, the 
changed habits of life have made their influence felt ; the messenger occasionally 
demands drink-money after he has had the draught itself: an interesting combina- 
tion of the original custom and its later substitute, which shows that the origin of 
an usage, though still indicated in its name, may entirely lapse from memory even 
where it is practised in its primitive form. To be sure, the interest of the recipient 
may have contributed something to this forgetfulness in the present instance. 



w 

122] General Characteristics of Custom 149 

of some of the external needs of life, now received a religious 
sanction, and took on a more definite and conscious form. 
That very general custom, e.g., which regards the stranger 
within one's gates as safeguarded from every sort of injury, 
might have arisen at the constraining hest of necessity, and 
its origin have been masked by the religious significance that 
it obtained under the influence of the gradual diffusion of 
religious worship. 

We do, in fact, find that this view is held by many in- 
vestigators of the history of civilisation and of religion. 
Thus the custom of infanticide, which still prevails among 
some of the savage tribes of Australia and Oceania, has 
been derived from the need of adapting the number of the 
population to the given supply of food ; to which is added, as 
a secondary motive, the desire of certain women to be 
relieved of the first duties of motherhood. The idea which 
underlies all cannibalism, that the soul of the dead is assimi- 
lated along with his flesh and blood, is then supposed to 
have led to the horrible custom of feasting upon the 
murdered children. Finally, when the sacrificial feast had 
come into being, the further idea would naturally arise that 
the gods should have their share of this as of other food, 
and so child-sacrifice would grow to be a part of religious 
worship.^ It is surely unmistakable that the tendency to 
look for the origin of custom in motives which are operative 
to-day or which, at any rate, make the strongest appeal to 
the modern mind, is responsible for this theory of the origina- 
tion of infanticide. The fact that the custom applies pre- 
dominantly to first-born children, however, — even where we 
find it without any discoverable religious setting, — calls for a 
different explanation. If necessity gave the law, it would 
surely be the younger children that must suffer. We must 
rather have recourse to an idea which pervades all sacrificial 

^ LiPPERT, Die GeschkhU der Familie^ pp. 196 ff. 



150 Custom and the Moral Life [122-3 

worship, the idea that the gift most pleasing to the gods is 
the gift most prized by man. It is with this in mind that the 
husbandman offers the first-fruits of his field, and the nomad 
the best portions of the kid that he has slain. If once the 
aim that sacrificial worship expresses, the endeavour to win 
the favour of heaven, had overcome the horror of the murder 
of one's own children, then the same motives which lead the 
worshipper to eat of his other sacrifices could bring him to 
devour the body of the child. At this point the further idea, 
of the assimilation of the soul together with the body, would 
naturally enter into the rite. And that, having entered, it 
might ultimately prove effective to secure the continuance of 
this most terrible form of cannibalism is a hypothesis which 
we can hardly term impossible in view of the similar 
metamorphoses of custom described just now. On the other 
hand, the theory that the practice is not the last outgrowth 
of a custom (as is indicated by the preference of the first- 
born), but the original form of it, cannot lay claim to any 
degree of probability at all, unless it can show, e,g,^ that the 
devouring of the young brood is a widespread habit among 
the higher animals. We can hardly suppose that the impulse 
of mother-love which in the animals is strong enough to 
protect the young from the hunger of the parents is alto- 
gether wanting in man. The motives must have been strong 
indeed, more constraining even than the necessity of self- 
preservation, which could cause mankind to traverse the 
most powerful of the natural impulses. And there are, as 
experience shows, no motives that can cope with the in- 
fluence of religious worship, and the superstitious ideas 
connected with it, upon the mind of primitive man. Of 
course, religious worship itself must have had an origin. 
But the time of that origination lies far beyond the reach 
of our present observation. Even the most primitive form 
of worship, the cult of the dead, leads us by way of the food 



123-4] General Characteristics of Custom 151 

laid out for the dead man straight to the act of sacrifice. It 
is this primitiveness of religious worship — attested further 
by the earliest evidences of language — which makes it 
possible for the good custom, by which man raises himself 
and his mode of living above the level of the animals, and 
the bad custom, in which he sinks below them, to spring 
from one and the same source.^ 

But although religious worship — in part directly, and in 
part through the mediation of primitive ideas of law — is, 
in most instances, the ultimate source to which custom may 
be empirically referred, the result of the reference is simply 
to explain the nature of custom from one side or under one 
aspect, — ^the genetic. The idea of custom itself is not by any 
means fully explained. In its further development, custom 
may subserve the most diverse aims, far removed from any 
connection with religious worship ; indeed, this process of 
transformation is one of the chief distinguishing marks of 
custom. Hence, behind all the change of motive and purpose, 
there must be certain constant and abiding characteristics 
which differentiate custom from the other forms of human 
activity that resemble it in the regularity of their recurrence. 
To determine them we must devote special attention (i) to 
the distinction between custom and law and morality ; and 
(2) to that between custom and habit and n^age. 

(d) The Relation of Custom to Law and Morality. 

Custom, in the sense in which it is ordinarily used to-day, 
means a norm of voluntary action that is valid for a national 
or tribal society without enforcement by express command or 
by punishment for nonconformity. It is true that custom 
finds its own means of compulsion. But these, like custom 

* Cf, LiPPERT, Op. cit.f pp. 171 ff., where another instance occurs of this 
reversal of what I believe to be the natural progress of custom, as related to 
religious worship. 



152 Custom and the Moral Life [124-5 

itself, are never of the obligatory kind. They consist neither 
in subjective commandments like the moral laws, nor in 
objective menaces like the laws of the state. On the other 
hand, custom is related both to morality and to law; to 
morality, in having at its disposal a subjective, and to law, 
in having at its disposal an objective means of compulsion. 
The first consists in a natural dislike, closely akin to the 
imitative impulse, of making oneself conspicuously different 
from one's fellows ; the second, in the social disadvantages — 
disparaging remarks or rough treatment — that follow upon 
any considerable deviation from the ordinary code of be- 
haviour. The fear of seeming peculiar affects a weak nature 
as powerfully as a bad conscience could do ; and the real 
injuries consequent upon non-observance of a custom may 
be more keenly felt than the penalties with which the law 
punishes actual crime. 

The fact that custom possesses means of constraint, which 
it ruthlessly applies, enables us to understand how it is 
possible for a people to live in a state of comparatively 
good order without having any recourse to legislation, in our 
sense of the word. That is, as a matter of fact, approxi- 
mately what we find in the earliest stages of civilisation : 
* law and order ' are upheld simply and solely by the coercive 
power of custom. It is true that, under these circumstances, 
the means of compulsion employed are always of a distinctly 
energetic character. Not mere personal disparagement, but 
actual injury to life and limb may result from a disregard of 
customary usage. The necessary consequence of such a state 
of affairs is that nonconformity in what would seem to us to 
be an extremely trivial matter may be punished every whit 
as severely as the most serious violation of social order. In 
other words, law and custom have not as yet been differen- 
tiated. Evidently, then, this distinction, when it is drawn, is 
drawn because of the growing need to divide up the great 



125-6] General Characteristics of Custom 153 

body of customs into two separate departments: the one 
containing all norms of conduct upon whose observance a 
high value is set, — a value so high that in certain circumstances 
appeal is made for their maintenance to physical force, — and 
the other covering the rules that may safely be entrusted to 
the gentler form of constraint aflforded by the simple desire 
to do what others do, in order to share with them the approval 
of the community. 

The older theories of society looked upon this development 
of law and order as a process of special creation ; determinate 
laws were suddenly set up through the influence of powerful 
law-givers, and a conduct regulated by legal norms at once 
replaced the original unruliness. In modem times the theory 
has been considerably modified, and it is admitted that the 
looser bond of custom only gradually gave way to the firmer 
bond of law. But even as thus altered, the explanation 
squares better with the facts if we reverse its way of looking 
at them. It is not that custom was consolidated into law; 
but rather that custom, which originally held mankind by 
the strongest chains of external coercion, came to be dif- 
ferentiated into custom (as we know it) and law, and that 
thereafter measures of objective restraint are restricted to 
the enforcement of the legal norms, while custom keeps 
only the milder sanctions of imitation and the pressure of 
public opinion. But for a long time the rules alike of custom 
and of law are wholly dependent for their validity upon 
customary usage. The expressly formulated law — the law 
that is read to the people {lex\ or, still more, the written law 
{Vorschrifty prescription) — is of much later origin. And 
even after it has come into being, it can but imperfectly 
represent the living law that governs a community, the law 
that is distinguished from mere custom solely by its use of 
physical force to secure obedience. Hence it is that the 
Romans included the store of unwritten law, upon which 



154 Custom and the Moral Life [126 

l^slation properly so called is constantly drawing, under 
the general term mores ; thus emphasising the absence of 
that external promulgation which finds expression in the 
Latin term for law: lex, from legere, *to read.' We can 
understand the point of view here taken when we remem- 
ber that the observance of national customs was guarded 
in ancient Rome fully as strenuously as that of law itself. 
To us modems, on the other hand, who find the constraint 
of custom less irksome because we allow a larger scope to 
individual freedom, the obligatory character of the legal 
norm appeals with much greater force. Hence, when we 
wish to stress the relationship that obtains between unwritten 
law and custom, we refer it to the character of habitual usage 
that is shared by both, and speak of the unwritten law as 
the law of use and wont, 'common' law.^ Law in all its 
forms, however, common law as well as statute law, owes its 
preservation to the means of physical compulsion that are at 
its disposal In saying, then, that the constraining power of 
custom rests not upon a physical, but upon a moral sanction, 
we bring it on the other hand into immediate connection with 
morality. Again, however, the resemblance is superficial only. 
It is not the contents of custom that can be termed moral : 
the analogy extends simply to a similarity in the means 
employed by custom (as distinct from law) and morality 
to secure their outward observance. These means are in 
both cases psychical, not physical, in nature. They consist 
for the most part in loss of social estimation, which boorish- 
ness or contravention of the prevailing social code must be 
expected to bring no less surely than positive immorality. 

But while this subjective constraint may, on occasion, 
subserve the retention of a custom of immoral character, 
nevertheless, the similarity of the sanctions employed by 
morality and custom indicates, after all, a close connection 

^ Cf. JHBRING, Zweck im Recht^ iL pp. 52 ff. 



126-7] General Characteristics of Custom 155 

between the contents of customary and moral norms. And, 
as a matter of fact, the original unity of custom and law 
is exactly paralleled by an unity of custom and morality. 
The custom of primitive times is t|ie root both of law and 
of morals, as well as of ' custom ' proper, — custom, ix.^ that 
is ethically indifferent But the separation of the three is 
not by any means absolute. The original interconnection 
is still so far continued that custom takes both law and 
morality under its protection. Unlawful or immoral conduct 
is at the same time conduct that offends against custom. 
This phenomenon is a natural consequence of the original 
unity of them all : an unity which has left its traces in the 
equal dependence of Aristotle's ethos and Roman common 
law upon the idea of 'custom.' But as the sphere of custom 
is always wider than that of law or of morals, it necessarily 
happens that here and there rules of custom are laid down 
which conflict with moral laws, and perhaps even with legal 
obligations. Customs of this sort we name Unsitte (bad 
customs, immorality), and the term suggests at once the 
relation that holds between morality and custom. The bad 
custom is the custom that ought not to exist The mark of 
immorality is branded upon its front ; whereas custom in 
general does not possess a moral character in its own right 
Custom includes norms of living that are moral and norms 
that are ethically indifferent ; indeed, in the wider sense in 
which the bad custom counts as custom, it may (as we have 
seen) include norms that are actually immoral. If custom is a 
measure of the moral condition of a people, it owes its value 
to its moral and immoral elements alike. — In any case, the 
differentiation of law and morality from the original body 
of custom is manifestly one of the most important facts 
of moral evolution ; it is the expression of a refinement of 
ideas, which paves the way for the improvement of practical 
morality. The low level of morality in primitive society is 



156 Custom and the Moral Life [127-8 

not due, as a rule, to a total absence of moral ideas, but 
to the inextricable confusion of morality with immoral 
practices. 

In saying that custom, considered for itself, is equally 
receptive of moral, immoral and morally indifferent elements, 
we have also by implication said that the idea of custom 
is not capable of any but a formal definition. This formal 
character distinguishes it from the ideas of morality and of 
law, which are both possessed of definite material attributes, 
whose enumeration is one of the problems of ethics. On 
the other hand, its formal character brings the idea of 
custom into relation with two other ideas which are also 
of merely formal significance : those of habit and usage. 

(e) The Relation of Custom {Sitte) to Habit (Gewohn/ieit) and 

Usage {Branch). 

Morality and law are offshoots from the original stock 
of custom. Custom itself, on the other hand, is included 
under the wider terms 'habit' and 'usage.* Widest of all 
is the idea of habit. Habit covers all and every form of 
voluntary action that, for whatever reason, we have made 
our own. In speaking of habit, therefore, we abstract 
entirely from the notion of community which is inherent in 
the other two ideas. Habit is an individual rule of conduct. 
If the acts of the individual accord with the habitual action 
of the community to which he belongs, habit becomes usage. 
Usage, that is, is social habit. When we talk without qualifi- 
cation of a man's habits, we mean the rules of life and 
behaviour that are peculiar to him as an individual person- 
ality. Usage, on the contrary, always implies a community, 
however widely or narrowly its limits may be conceived. 
There are family usages, 'local' usages, municipal usages, 
popular usages; but language knows nothing of an 'in- 
dividual' usage. 



128-9] General Characteristics of Custom 157 

Custom forms a smaller circle within this general field 
of usage. Custom is habit: it is marked by the regular 
recurrence of voluntary actions. Custom is usage: it is 
always the custom of some community. But it has, further, 
what usage lacks, — a normative character. Conformity to 
custom is not, like conformity to usage, a matter of in- 
dividual choice; custom has the sanction of a moral 
constraint, which the individual cannot disregard without 
personal disadvantage. If the line of demarcation between 
custom and usage is not always easy to draw in the concrete 
case, that is because the attribute of universality, which raises 
usage above habit, necessarily carries with it a certain ten- 
dency towards the coercion of the individual. Hence in 
many cases it is only the greater or less degree of com- 
pulsion, or (what is ordinarily the same thing) the greater 
or less extension of the practice, that can guide us in dis- 
criminating between custom and usage. Custom is national ; 
usage belongs to the family or district or town. For the 
wider the circle within which an habitual mode of conduct 
obtains, the greater is the constraint that it puts upon the 
individual will. While, therefore, individual habit is left 
absolutely and entirely to choice, provided only that it does 
not conflict with the more comprehensive rules of social 
conduct, usage exercises a practical compulsion through the 
example that it sets, and custom raises this compulsion to 
the dignity of a constraining norm. 

The original meanings of words do not always bear 
any clear and definite relation to the meanings in which 
we use the words at the present day. The change of 
meaning that comes with age involves not only all sorts 
of expansion and contraction of the contents of an idea, 
but, sometimes at any rate, an actual exchange of signifi- 
cance between words. Thus Latin gets its word for habit, 
consuetudOf from the same root from which the German 



158 Custom and the Moral Life [129-30 

Sitte (custom) is derived ; while the Greek edo? contains 
both ideas, altogether undifferentiated.^ At the same time, 
when once the differentiation has taken place, we can find 
traces, in the primary meanings which the specialised words 
represent, of the distinguishing attributes that attach to them 
in modem usage. Gewohnheit (habit, wont) is connected 
with Wohnung (dwelling), and, like Wohnung^ goes back to a 
root whose meaning is still preserved in the word Wonne 
(delight). Just as a man orders his 'Wohnung' in accord- 
ance with his own will and pleasure, so is his ' Gewohnheit ' 
the way in which he finds pleasure within the sphere of 
his individual life.^ 

Here, then, we have an indication both of the subjectivity 
and of the arbitrariness of custom, Le,^ of its independence 
of any constraining. rule. Branch (usage), on the other hand, 
which is connected with the verb brauchen (M. H. G. briUhefi), 
is of the same origin as the Latin fructus. The usable 
(braucAbar) thing is the useful {niitzlicK) thing. But useful- 
ness is a more oj^jective idea than pleasurableness. Everyone 
tries to do what is useful, profitable; and the simpler and 
more uniform the needs of life, the more uniform is the 
judgment as to what things are useful. Hence we have, e.g., 
the idea of comrade {Genoss) = h\m who eats {geniessen) with 
us.^ Following the same analogy, we may probably explain 
usage {BrauctC) as an exercise in which all take part, because 
all alike deem it useful. Now among the very earliest 

^ The group of connected words, Skt. svadha, Goth, stdus, Gk. I^or, LAt. 
suetus, all express the general idea of habit {GeitfohnMeii), and hence, secondarily, 
the idea of custom {Sitte\ in so £ur as custom is classed under habit. They are 
supposed to be derived from the pronominal stem sva^ and the root dha, meaning 
' to place/ ' to do.* Sva-dha would accordingly signify ' that which is made one's 
own,' — a sense which makes it equally applicable to the individual and to a 
community. Cf, CURTIUS, Gr, Etym. 5te Aufl., p. 251. 

' Wohnung and Wonne ^ Goth, ttmnan, * to be glad,' are derived from the I. £. 
root wen or wan, which has the same primary meaning. C/, Klugb, Etymol^ 
Worterbuch der detitschen Sprachi, pp. 377, 378. 

[^ ' Comrade * = by derivation ' chamber '-mate.] 



I30-I] General Characteristics of Custom 159 

usages are those usages of religious worship whereby man 
hopes to win the favour of his gods or to avert their anger. 
And here lies the point of transition from usage to custom. 
Whenever disregard of that which everyone deems useful 
threatens to bring injury upon all, the usage passes into statute 
{Saieung). It is established, once for all, that everyone 
must conform to it. In this way language brings custom 
{Sitte) into direct connection with law (Gesetz). 

It is very tempting to transform this logical relation of 
the three ideas, habit, usage and custom, into a chronolc^cal 
succession. First of all, one might think, the individual 
habit finds its imitators. Then some utilitarian purpose 
which it happens to fulfil takes possession of it. And so 
it gradually takes on an obligatory character, whose 
stringency varies directly with its extension in space and 
time.^ But evident as this psychological reconstruction may 
appear, we must none the less remember that the decision 
of the question rests not upon psychological possibility but 
upon historical fact. It is true that we cannot do with- 
out psychological interpretation in following the history 
of the development of custom. But it must always come 
after the historical reconstruction ; it cannot precede or, 
what amounts to the same thing, take the place of history. 
Now there is, as a matter of fact, no single national custom 
of any considerable range or importance — none, i,e,y that 
really deserves the name of custom — where there is factual 
proof of a development from individual habits. We can 

^ Cf, Jhbring, Zweck im Reckty ii. pp. 242 fT. This account of the origin of 
custom, which Jhering calls 'secondary,' is contrasted by him (p. 244) with a 
' primary ' mode of origin which * brings custom into the world as such, bearing 
upon it from the beginning the mark of a social obligation.' But he goes on at 
once to remark that the latter form is of no interest from the scientific point 
of view, and accordingly gives no further consideration to it. Nevertheless, as 
we have shown above, all the examples of 'secondary custom' which Jhering 
discusses take us back to ' primary ' customs. Cf. what was said of the funeral 
feast, toasting, and the pourboire (pp. 140 flf.). 



i6o Ctistom and the Moral Life [131 

never pierce beyond older forms of the same custom, though 
in certain circumstances these may differ very largely, in 
purpose and significance as well as in outward observance, 
from the custom that we know. The derivation of custom 
from individual habit is simply a fiction, analogous to the 
fictions of a first property-holder, or a first law-giver, or 
a first language-maker, which have been set up to explain the 
origin of property, of the state and of language. All these 
fictions spring from the desire, laudable enough in itself, to dis- 
cover the ultimate reasons for the great products of the social 
mind in the individual human consciousness; but they are 
pressing their rule of procedure beyond what is warranted 
when they transform the undeniable fact that the individual 
is ^factor in the general development into the assumption 
that he is its sole motor power. True, the individual must 
possess the root-capacity for everything which he and his 
fellows within the given society together bring to intellectual 
birth ; but it is equally certain that the most important 
creations of the community, — language, myth, custom, law, — 
although influenced by the individual, can never be indi- 
vidually created. The special evidence of this in the case of 
custom lies in the fact that wherever we are able to trace 
a custom back to its more primitive forms, we are left 
with religious ideas and rude ideas of law, often intimately 
interconnected, as the earliest discoverable stage of the 
course of development. 

Here, however, the objection may be raised that the 
attempt at an historical reconstruction of the origination 
of custom must inevitably lead beyond this limit of attain- 
able fact, since it would be absurd to cut hypothesis short 
at a point that cannot possibly be regarded as the real 
starting-point of custom. However great the antiquity of 
a national custom, it must have originated at some time or 
other; and its diffusion among the community must have 



I3I-2] General Characteristics of Custom i6i 

preceded its general acceptance. But how can diffusion be 
effected unless by transmission from individual to individual, 
— ^the imitative impulse here playing the same part in great 
matters that it so often plays to-day in small ? We may 
grant all that the argument demands, and yet refuse to admit 
that individual influence has anything more to say in the 
origin of custom than it has, e.g,^ in the origin of language. 
Since language consists always in a communication of ideas, 
the original word-creation cannot have been the work of any 
individual inventor; it must have proceeded from a com- 
munity of individuals, endowed with similar mental capacities 
and living under the same external conditions. So is it with 
custom, which, like language, is a mode of common conduct 
arising from community of ideas. One man may contribute 
one thing to a custom, and another another ; but the custom 
as a whole is a common creation, w^hich cannot be analysed 
into individual elements, for the simple reason that the 
various individual factors are all operative at one and the 
same time, and that it is consequently impossible for the 
individual to separate his own particular contribution from 
the contributions made by others. We do not deny, of 
course, that the influence of the greatest minds has always 
made itself felt in the history of custom. But we never 
find traces of it without also finding that it tends all the 
more surely to disappear in a mass of indistinguishable 
partial forces, the more remote the past to which our 
inquiry has carried us. No one doubts that Moses and 
Confucius and Buddha exerted an influence upon the 
development not only of religion and morality, but also 
of the outward form of custom in which morality is clothed, 
that extended far beyond the limits of their own age and 
time. But men of this range of power do not appear except 
at a highly developed stage of civilisation, and there is no 
evidence in the life of the less advanced peoples that could 

L M 



1 62 Custom and the Moral Life [132-3 

lead us to attribute an equal significance to individual 
influence, even within a much narrower circle, in primitive 
society. Just as we see a general or * typical ' cast of features 
inhibiting, in savage tribes, the development of any physio- 
gnomic individuality, so we find that the individual will has 
but a very slight influence upon the general will of the 
community. For the first condition of personal influence 
is a degree of social freedom that allows individual views 
to grow and ripen. And freedom is wholly and absolutely 
an achievement of civilisation. Here too, therefore, the facts 
of history give us a picture which is diametrically opposed 
to the fictions of the theory. Only by slow degrees and 
in the course of ages do individual habits gain any freedom 
of range and scope as compared with the at first despotic 
rules of general custom ; only by slow degrees does the 
individual come to have any extended influence upon 
custom. And after as before, custom always has a greater 
power of persistence than law or morality. The founders 
of religion and moral law-givers have not established new 
customs among men, but have simply moulded the already 
existent customs — whether directly or indirectly — by their 
influence on the moral ideas of their times. 

But while we can nowhere lay our hand upon a custom 
that has originated from individual habits, the reverse process 
of development, from custom to usage and habit, is an 
undeniable fact. The whole of our modern civilisation is 
pervaded by usages that once were customs: customs that 
have become unintelligible, or have been divorced from their 
original significance and pressed into the service of other 
aims. These ancient customs survive in our daily habits 
of life, in children's games, in popular superstition ; and 
before they quite die out, lose more and more of their 
original universality, until they come at least very near 
the limit at which usage passes over into mere habit. The 



'33-4] General Characteristics of Custom 163 

standard, and certainly the most frequent source of usage 
is to be looked for in decaying custom. 

It is none the less true, however, that the other, ascending 
mode of origin — from habit to custom — is also possible. But 
the rules of life that originate in this way differ from the 
customs that have followed the normal process in being, for 
the most part, merely temporary in character. Linguistic 
usage accordingly distinguishes them, as fashions^ from the 
customs and usages which are possessed of so much greater 
tenacity and persisting power. That I take off my hat when 
I greet an acquaintance is a matter of custom; that boys 
wear their hats to church at their first communion is a usage 
occurring here and there in different localities; but that a man 
wears a high hat or a broad-brimmed felt is a matter of 
fashion. Fashion naturally connects with custom and usage: 
thus it is a custom that we cover our heads in some way. 
But within the particular field that fashion has marked out 
for its own from the wide domain of custom, the largest 
scope is allowed to individual choice. A lady of rank or a 
tailor can invent a fashion; but the attack of the individual 
upon usage or custom rebounds harmlessly upon himself. 
Hence fashion is confined almost entirely to the purely 
external^ easily changeable forms of life, — to clothing, or the 
way of setting the table, or the use of a fork for certain kinds 
of food, etc, etc. And there is another peculiarity that 
characterises this origin of fashion from individual habit : 
there is no long process of change, running its course without 
visible sign of volitional direction, as there is in the other 
metamorphoses of custom and usage, but an intentional 
creation, a sudden Minerva-birth of the full idea. Hence 
while custom and usage are in the highest degree conser- 
vative, fashion, the half-sister of usage, is proverbial for her 
fickleness. 

Habit^ again, may appear in two forms. As a general rule. 



164 Custom and the Moral Life [134-5 

habit covers those expressions of individuality in the conduct 
of life which remain possible within the limits drawn by 
custom and usage. But it may also appear, though only 
exceptionally, as the last remnant of what was once an usage 
and is now confined to a very few individuals. Custom has, 
so far as we know, but one course of development, and that 
is from preceding customs of kindred contents. Usage, 
fashion and habits, on the other hand, constitute a mixed 
medley of new forms and relics of a long dead past Trans- 
formation and new formation are here often enough difficult 
of discrimination; but there is no such thing as an entirely 
new custom. Of all these forms of life, therefore, custom is 
the most persistent. And yet custom itself is constantly 
changing ; its existing forms are continually adapting them- 
selves to new purposes, and in the course of adaptation 
undergoing a gradual and steady alteration. 

Closely connected with the persistence of custom is the 
immutability of all that part of life to which it has reference. 
It is the constant needs and habits of life that are regulated 
by the norms of custom. Food and dwelling-place, the 
common life and intercourse of mankind in family and 
society, — these are the things which in the last analysis come 
under the rule of custom among all peoples and at all times. 
They are subject to change only with change in conditions of 
life or theories of living; and as this change is reflected in 
the forms of custom, custom is as truly a picture of the moral 
consciousness of the community as a man's habits are the 
expression of his individual character. Habits can constantly 
be formed anew, because new individuals, whose habits they 
are, are constantly coming into existence. But custom, 
national habit, endures while the nation endures. It changes 
so gradually that the alteration can never be observed while 
it is in progress, but only when it is viewed in historical 
retrospect, /.^., when phases of the development that lie far 



135] General Characteristics of Ctistom . 165 

apart in time may be set side by side for purposes of con- 
parison. And we must further remember that outward forms 
of conduct always possess a greater persisting power than 
the thoughts and feelings from which they originally sprang. 
Hence it is that we see so often, along with the adaptation of 
custom to new ends, the preservation of actions that have 
outlived their day and become wholly purposeless, — but out 
of which the voice of the past speaks to us all the more 
distinctly. 

(f) The Systematisation of Custom. 

Any attempt at a systematisation of custom must set out 
from the consideration of those permanent life-purposes which 
custom is called upon to subserve, under varying conditions, 
at the different periods of its development. From this point 
of view we may distinguish, first of all, individual and social 
forms of life. The former include all customs which make 
for the fulfilment of purely individual aims. Here the 
impulse oi self-preservation is all-important. However depen- 
dent a man may be upon his fellow-men, upon the aid of 
the community in which he lives, for the satisfaction of his 
need of meat and drink, for the protection which he seeks to 
obtain by clothing and shelter from climate, from bad weather 
and from dangerous enemies, and for the performance and 
enjoyment of his work, this impulse is always the ultimate 
and most constant, although not the only motive to the 
customs that fall under our first heading. Midway between 
the individual and the social forms of life lie the forms of 
intercourse. Considered with regard to the objects concerned 
in them, these forms of life possess all the characteristics of 
the social customs proper; but their dominant aim is still 
individualistic. Thirdly, the social forms of life are those 
directed upon the furtherance of the purposes of the race^ 
or, at least, upon the satisfaction of needs which arise only 



1 66 Custom and the Moral Life [135-6 

when the union of a number of individuals is itself a part of 
the end to be obtained, and not simply a means for the 
attainment of individual ends. To this class belong the 
family^ the state, and the organisation of society into definite 
classes and associations, held together by more or less per- 
manent interests. The social forms of life also constitute the 
transition from the sphere of custom to that of law. Law is 
not only identical with custom in origin : it always retains its 
connection with those forms of society which were pre- 
figured in custom, and especially with that of the state. 
Finally, we have in the humanistic forms of life our last and 
most comprehensive category. We understand by 'humanistic' 
forms the customs which govern the behaviour of man 
to his fellow-men in its most general aspects, — the behaviour 
that is independent of any particular social connection, and 
proceeds from an ultimate similarity of mental attributes. 

We thus obtain four different departments of custom, which 
can be distinguished as follows : 

(i) In the individual forms of life, the individual is at once 
subject and object of the obligations which custom imposes. 
The primary motive that drives a man to seek meat and 
drink and shelter is the motive of self-preservation, even 
though he may be satisfying these needs of life in company 
with other men. And his desire for clothing and ornament 
is primarily a desire for the protection and adornment of his 
own person, however much it be determined by regard to 
other men's opinions. 

(2) In the forms of intercourse^ the individual is the subject 
and society (either as a whole, or in the persons of certain of 
its members) the object of the obligation. In the labour 
contract, e.g.y the individual performs a task for others, and 
the wage that he receives is, in turn, an obligation which these 
others discharge to him. The greeting with which we meet 
an acquaintance is the action of an individual; but we perform 



136-7] General Characteristics of Custom 167 

it not for our own sakes, but for the sake of the other to 
whom we desire thereby to show our respect. 

(3) In the social forms the subject of the obligation is a 
determinate social group of individuals^ and the object again 
society itself, whether the same society which has the duty to 
perform, or a larger circle of which this is a subordinate part 
Here the individual is only indirectly subject and object of 
the norms prescribed by custom, i,e, only in as far as he is 
himself a member of the social group to which the custom 
applies. The ultimate units with which these social customs 
are concerned, actively and passively alike, are, of course, 
always individual men. But since their effects, present and 
future, invariably extend beyond the circumscribed limits of 
individual interests, the reaction on the individual can be 
regarded at most as ^partial end, never as their full purpose. 

(4) In the humanistic forms of life, the subjects under 
obligation are either individuals ox groups oi individuals ; the 
object of obligation is humanity at large, which may be repre- 
sented in the concrete case by any individual man or social 
community. Thus we may perform an act of charity as 
individuals or as members of a civic community, or of a 
state, or of some humane society founded expressly for this 
purpose ; and the act may equally well affect individuals, 
families, communities, etc., which do or do not belong to our 
own state, nation, etc. 

The obvious fact that whatever form a custom may take, 
it is represented, in the last resort, by individual men, 
makes it impossible for us to draw any hard and fast line 
of distinction between class and class, as defined above. 
Primitive man builds his hut not only to protect himself, 
but also to protect those who belong to him. His meal 
is not seldom a public ceremony, a part of his religious 
ritual, or a festive celebration of events in the life of the 
community. The ornamentation of clothing owes its chief 



i68 Custofn and the Moral Life [137-3 

value to the importance which it gives its wearer in the eyes 
of his fellows. On the other hand, the h'fe of the family and 
the state receives its strongest support from the satisfaction 
that it promises to the impulses and needs of the individual. 
That the purpose of the social forms is not fully realised in 
these reactive effects upon the individual is a truth which can 
hardly take shape in the popular consciousness in the guise 
of clear knowledge, but which becomes all the more im- 
perative and insistent in the guise oi feeling. For we cannot 
doubt that the actions which the individual is capable of 
performing on behalf of his family or of the community to 
which he belongs, even in the earh'er stages of civilisation, far 
transcend the narrow circle of his individual interests ; more 
especially when we remember that the prudence and fore- 
sight, which see that actions performed for the sake of others 
serve in the long run most effectually to promote one's own 
interests, can arise only at a later stage of development, a 
stage of reflection, of which the primitive consciousness 
knows absolutely nothing. In this interaction of the 
individual and social forms of life, then, we have good 
evidence that morality developes far earlier in the form of 
xvLOXdX facts than in the higher form of moral ideas. Now it 
is an universal law of moral facts, as the following investiga- 
tion will show, that the individual forms of life, in which 
purely personal ends are involved, nevertheless contain the 
germs of social custom ; they are manifested, from the very 
first, in what are intrinsically social ways. Since, then, the 
individual purpose is attained by a combined activity, it is 
natural that other aims become associated to it, — without any 
consciousness of the process on the part of the members of 
the community, — the object of which is not the individual, 
but the community itself. After this, the field covered by 
the custom that has thus transcended the interests of the 
individual simply grows larger and larger. Beginning with 



138-9] Individual Forms of Life 169 

the family and the tribe, it first of all extends to the nation, 
and then to the intercourse of nations, coming to a final end 
only when it touches the utmost limit that is reached by 
human custom and the relation of man to man : that ideal 
union of humanity, as such, which, though it always remains 
an ideal, humanistic custom is constantly striving to transform 
into reality. 

2. THE INDIVIDUAL FORMS OF LIFE. 

(tf) Food, 

The impulse to seek food and drink, and the need of shelter, 
are shared by man, the first with all, and the second at least 
with very many of the animals. Nevertheless, the forms of 
life in which these impulses are exhibited are peculiarly 
characteristic of the human species. Where the original ends 
of the life habits are evidently one and the same for the 
animal and for man, the multiplication of ends and motives, 
which is so significant for the differentiation of custom from 
impulse in human evolution, is thrown into especially high 
relief. There is no animal that carries the search for food 
and the provision of shelter, whether for adults or for the 
growing young, beyond the limits of what is absolutely 
demanded by the needs of fwurishment and protection. And, 
on the other hand, there is no race of men, however far down 
in the scale of development, that has not associated other 
ends, in part of widely differing contents, with the forms 
of life that minister to the fulfilment of these needs. True, 
even the highest degree of civilisation cannot do away with 
the identity of the ultimate conditions of living; so that 
the needs of nourishment and protection always remain 
the most imperative motives to the customary acts in which 
these impulses are displayed. None the less, habits of life 
are developed, and developed in equal number and variety, 



170 Custom and the Moral Life [139 

in which what were at first secondary ends have now gained 
the upper hand. For this reason the forms of custom that 
are based upon the needs of nourishment and shelter form 
some of the most valuable pieces of evidence that we have to 
the development of its higher and more perfect forms. They 
constitute almost the only case in which we are able to com- 
pare the original motives with those superinduced at a later 
stage. At the same time it is to be noted that even here we 
hardly ever gain an opportunity at the present day really 
to observe the exclusive dominance of the primitive motives. 
This is a necessary consequence of the specifically human 
law of evolution : the law that all original impulses enter into 
the service of custom, and in so doing evince as great a 
capacity for development as is shown by the changes of 
meaning in words and the traditions of the myth, — pheno- 
mena, both of which are very closely related to the meta- 
morphoses of custom. 

Here, again, the transformation is dependent in very small 
degree upon accidental, external influences. It was rather 
that supreme governor of our impulses, necessity, which first 
pressed impulse into the service of custom. Human denti- 
tion is such that the only things fit for food, in the natural 
state, are soft fruits like the banana and bread-fruit and other 
tropical growths, and the marrow found in the bones of 
animals. But the diffusion of the race obliges mankind to 
take for food various other substances — the flesh of animals 
and a number of vegetable products — which become edible 
only by artificial preparation : the fruits by grinding or some 
similar method of artificial mastication, and the meats by 
boiling or roasting. Now the most important of these aids 
in the preparation of food is fire ; and the difficulty of pro- 
curing fire had most to do, at this stage, in showing the 
necessity of common labour. The very oldest method of 
procuring fire, by the rubbing together of two pieces of wood 



i4o] Individual Forms of Life 171 

or the twisting of a stick thrust into a flat disc, involves 
a physical strain — more especially in a damp climate — which 
necessitates not only co-operation but also alternate labour 
and relief. Both are still preserved in the popular usages, 
whether game or superstition, in which the kindling of the 
beacon fire plays a part^ The toilsomeness of getting 
a fire after this primitive fashion made the continuance 
and watching of the fire one of the earliest and most 
important protective regulations, whose observance required, 
in its turn, a community and even a certain division of 
labour. Furthermore, the character of fire as a beneficent, 
and yet at times fatal and destructive element led to its 
early inclusion in the sphere of mythological thinking; 
and so the lighting and the guarding of the fire were 
r^arded not merely as external acts, which ministered 
to the necessities of life, but as religious duties, in the 
discharge of which man came in contact with an embodi- 
ment of divine powers. Fire thus combined the characters 
of a deity and of an essential requirement of life. The 
kindling of it was both an indispensable labour and a 
religious ceremony. And the hearth which served for the 
preparation of food was the place where man offered 
sacrifice and presented his petitions to the gods. 

The necessity of common preparation led, of itself, to a 
common consumption of the food prepared; and an in- 
evitable result of this was the introduction of fixed meals 
at definite hours of the day. The Latin word for meal, 
coefta^ denotes literally 'what is common,' jcoii/17, communis. 
The German McJUzeit emphasises not the spatial com- 
munity of the meal, as the Latin word does, but its regular 
recurrence in time. As the word M(M comes from the old 
German McU^ 'point of time' (a word which still occurs 

^ Cf. RocHHOLZ, Deutscker Glaube und Brouch im Spiegel der heidnischm 
Vorteit, Bd. ii., pp. 145 ff. 



1 72 Custom and the Moral Life [140-1 

in this meaning in the compound temporal adverbs einmal, 
zweimal, etc.), Mahlzeit really consists of a repetition of 
the idea of time. A generation to which the word Mahl 
carried no significance beyond that of eating felt anew 
the need that had controlled the original formation of the 
word, and so added a second time-reference to that already 
derivatively present This is surely strong evidence that 
the time-characteristic was always regarded as especially 
important. The common meal thus became the subjective 
point of departure for a regular division of time, just as 
the uniform movement of the heavenly bodies offered itself 
as the objective means of time-measurement. And if the 
alternation of human occupations is not quite so regular 
as the course of the stars, it is nevertheless so far r^^lar 
that a number of men who have appeased their hunger 
at the same time will also become hungry again at approxi- 
mately the same time. The recurrence of the operations 
demanded by the preparation of food thus accustomed 
mankind to that regular alternation of rest and labour which 
is one of the fundamental conditions of a civilised society. 

Not less important than these external results are the 
subjective effects which the habit of eating in common brings 
in its train. True, that consideration for others, which we 
might be inclined to infer from an union about one hearth and 
one dish, has very much less weight in a state of barbarism 
than our present experience would lead us to expect. Here, 
as in so many other things, fear of the gods preceded regard 
for one's fellow-men. The hearth, as the place of household 
worship, gave a religious consecration to the household meal. 
To invite the gods to partake of the food prepared, to offer 
them the first and best pieces in order to be assured of their 
favour, is so natural, in view of the ideas associated with the 
power of the hearth-fire for good and for harm, that we 
cannot wonder if we meet it everywhere, and often under 



I4I-2] Indimcbml Forms of Life 1 73 

conditions which point to its independent origination. In 
this union of reh'gious ceremonial with the daily meal, we 
have the presumptive origin of all those sacrificial obser- 
vances which involve the offering of food of which man 
himself partakes. But it is readily intelligible that need 
must soon arise for the sundering of the two purposes. The 
important thing at the ordinary meal would then be the 
satisfaction of one's own appetite, though the gods are not 
wholly forgotten : the Greeks, e,g,^ poured a libation at the 
banning of the feast : while for the unseen powers special 
banquets would be prepared, at which the relation was 
reversed, and man looked upon himself as the guest 

We thus find that the sitting at meat together has given 
rise even in the first beginnings of civilisation to two distinct 
forms of social usage: the ordinary meal, which has its 
source in the necessities of life, and the sacrificial meal, 
which is part of the worship of the gods. There is always 
a ground of connection between the two in the fact that 
the chief end of the one is a secondary end in the other. 
Traces of this primitive intermixture of ends may be clearly 
seen in modem life. The last vestige of the sacrifice that 
accompanied the daily meal is the grace or blessing. The 
sacrificial meal itself has assumed the most varied forms, 
largely as a result of the secularisation of its ends. We 
have it, e,g,^ in the ' celebration ' dinner held in joyful re- 
membrance of important family occurrences, or of important 
public events. We have it, again, in a form peculiar to 
modern civilisation, in the public banquet^ where it serves as 
the material basis for the prosecution of municipal, political 
or professional interests. Whenever any of these interests 
call for harmonious co-operation, it is attempted to arouse 
enthusiasm for the common end by way of social enjoyment : 
hence the name Zweckessen^ * business dinner.' A third and 
last form, in which there is least trace left of the original 



174 Custom and the Moral Life [142-3 

sacrificial meaning, is that of the dinner given privately to 
invited guests, which is simply the family dinner amplified 
by certain additions and embellishments. This, too, falls 
under the head of the ' business dinner ' in the wider sense 
of the term, in which its essential mark consists in the 
reversal of end and motive. We come together at the 
family table in order to eat ; we eat of the business dinner 
in order that we may come together. 

It is evident, now, that in the course of the manifold 
transformations which this most indispensable of all the 
occupations of life has undergone, another motive, of 
psychological character, has gradually risen to prominence : 
a motive that has ultimately forced the influence of the 
religious element in the preparation of food, the original 
source of all these refinements of its sensible purpose, entirely 
into the background. That motive lies in the impulse to the 
attainment of pleasurable sensations, which readily associate 
with intellectual pleasures of the most diverse origin, and 
strengthen them by helping us to realise one of their 
principal conditions, the company of our friends. But it 
is necessary to the operation of the psychological factor 
not only that the custom of the common meal has been 
established, but also that other reasons for it have been 
found besides that of the satisfaction of hunger. This is 
why all such secondary motives are entirely foreign to the 
animals, despite their keen enjoyment of food and drink. 

We cannot put too high an estimate upon the ethical 
significance of this development, whereby the most primitive 
requirement of the animal life is changed to one of the 
most powerful instruments of human civilisation. The mere 
outward fact that the form in which the individual impulse is 
satisfied lays upon each man certain social duties, that 
confine his egoism within definite limits, is in itself of very 
great importance. But we have, further, the subjective 



143-4] Individual Farms of Life 1 75 

influence of the regular alternation of work and recreation 
that comes with a regular division of time, — an influence 
which ennobles both work and recreation, and at the same 
time educates the character. For of all the aids to an even 
and regular conduct of life, of all the means that help 
us to resist our wandering inclinations, the habit of 
regular alternation is the best and strongest. Habit thus 
becomes our instructor in duty. Custom strengthens the 
feeling of duty, by taking the regular recurrence of action, 
as it always does, under its special protection, and adds 
a moral sanction to the incentive already inherent in the 
natural requirements of life, by stigmatising every departure 
from the established rule. Now the same custom that gives 
birth to this moral sanction is also the source of the highest 
and noblest forms of human enjoyment Just as the 
regularity of the working hours originated from the setting 
of a fixed time for the daily meal, so the * celebration ' dinner 
has expanded into the festival. Here the coercion of the 
social custom is fully oflset by tlie enhancement of individual 
pleasure in its transformation to an enjoyment shared in 
common with others. This augmentation of the individual 
feeling is again, on its part, of great ethical significance. 
It not only shows how high a value the individual should 
put upon society, but gives the first occasion for a feeling 
of pleasure in the attainment of ends that are not ^oistic, 
and proves that this pleasure is more permanent than that 
felt in the satisfaction of selfish impulses. 

When we remember all the good things that have grown 
out of the germs of civilisation in primitive usage, we shall 
view the disadvantages which the abuse of custom here 
as everywhere entails with a more lenient eye. These bad 
customs are generally survivals of older customs, forms 
handed down to a time which has lost all consciousness 
of their original significance, and so easily pressed into the 



176 Custom and the Moral Life [144 

service of strange and sometimes reprehensible purposes. A 
moral retrogression of this sort is especially probable in 
the present instance, because alongside of all the ideal aims 
which custom has been able to connect with the taking of 
food the original sensible purpose must necessarily persist 
unchanged. Hence, whenever this is made the chief end in a 
case where it should be only subordinate, the first step has 
been taken on the downward path that leads to demoralisa- 
tion. When once the solemnity of the occasion, the element 
of religious worship, the memory of the dead, have de- 
generated into mere excuses for the concealment of the real 
motive — enjoyment of the pleasures of the table — the festal 
meal, the sacrificial meal and the funeral feast not only sink 
to the level of the ordinary daily meal, but take on a 
positively repellent character through the contrast of the real 
with the pretended purpose. When a noble purpose is made 
the shield for the satisfaction of lower impulses, the action 
of the individual becomes a lie. And the custom is still 
repugnant, even if things have gone so far that no one thinks 
of the original purpose at all : we have the disagreeable 
knowledge that a whole company is actuated by motives 
entirely disproportionate to the occasion in which they find 
expression. The least unpleasant of these degenerate forms 
of custom, for obvious reasons, is that form of the ' business ' 
dinner in which the eating, instead of subserving other ends, 
has become an end in itself. Since, as a general rule, the 
purposes to be furthered do not belong to any very exalted 
sphere of human interests, — since, j>., the value of the real and 
of the pretended ends often differs but little, — we ordinarily 
raise no special objection to an interpretation of the phrase 
' business dinner ' which implies that it is ' dinner ' which is 
the 'business' in hand. There is, too, another point to 
consider. Bad customs are always reprehensible, however 
noble the custom from which they are derived ; but we 



144-5] Individual Forms of Life 177 

shall grant that a worthy origin serves nevertheless as some 
sort of excuse, especially when we remember how impossible 
It often is to fix the point at which the first good end gives 
way to some worthless subordinate purpose, behind which 
it finally disappears altogether. The course of custom is 
always a series of ups and downs. The law of progress, 
which rules all the transformations of custom, makes it 
inevitable that retrogression shall occur in individual 
instances. Hence it is not doing full justice to the bad 
custom, even in ethical regard, if in our estimate of it we 
leave its historical evolution entirely out of consideration.^ 

{p) The Dwelling, 

Next to that of food, the earliest need of human life is 
the need of a dwelling-place, a shelter against the in- 
clemency of the weather, against dangerous animals, and 
against human foes. Although a tropical climate may 
render it possible to dispense with clothing, some kind of 
house or shelter is always necessary. This need, again, is 
not peculiar to man. Many of the animals choose a special 
dwelling-place, at any rate for the time when they are rearing 
their young, — either taking possession of some natural shelter, 
or themselves making a nest or burrow in some suitable 
place. Man, too, originally took advantage of the means of 
protection offered by nature. The European contemporaries 
of the cave bear dwelt in natural rock -caverns, whose 
entrances they concealed, and whose interior they widened 
as necessity required. Although these primitive dwelling- 
places could hardly have been meant to serve any other 
purpose than that of protection, rude drawings on bones 
and reindeer horn prove that the sense of ornament was 
not wholly lacking even in the man of the cave period; 
while the signs of fire-places in the centre of the caves show 

* Cf. what was said above of the funeml feast, pp. 40 flf. 
I. N 



178 Custom and the Moral Life [145-6 

that the artificial preparation of food had already become a 
necessity. Nay, more, these primitive habitations, the gift 
of nature to man, formed a common shelter and a common 
burial place, at least for the members of a single family. 
This is indicated by the human remains that have been 
found alongside of the bones of slaughtered animals. 

When once the cooking of food had accustomed mankind to 
common labour, and more especially to the use of wood, it was 
an easy matter for them to throw off their dependence upon 
the localities that chanced to offer natural shelter. The Indian 
still builds his wigwam on the pattern of a group of forest 
trees, with its roof of interwoven leafage. He plants poles 
or branches in the ground, and bends them together over- 
head, spreading mats or some other protective covering over 
all.^ This primitive form of dwelling could easily develope 
into the travelling tent, on the one hand, and the permanent 
dwelling-house, on the other. The latter requires that the 
open interstices be filled with wattles or earth or stones, and 
a roof constructed upon cross-beams. The purpose is partly 
to strengthen the dwelling against outside attack, and partly 
to get a larger space within, suitable for a permanent abode 
and adequate to all the various needs of life. It is plain, too, 
that the travelling house, the waggon, had its origin in the 
tent of the nomad. Oftentimes there are indications in 
language of these old-world relationships, words of the same 
root-meaning serving to express tent and house, or house and 
waggon. 

We have seen that the awe of fire, the element at once so 
beneficent and so terrible, had raised the preparation and 
even the consumption of food in the immemorial past to an 
act of religious worship. No less venerable in its antiquity, 
though prompted by very different motives, is the consecra- 

^ Waitz, Anthropologic der Naturvdlker^ iii. pp. 90 ff. Ratzel, V^Ikerkunde^ 
ii. pp. 653 ff. 



146-7] Individual Forms of Life 179 

tion of the dwelling-place. Primitive man looks to the 
shelter of his house for protection from the dangers that 
threaten him abroad ; but the house can afford this pro- 
tection only if it stands itself under the guardianship of 
those divine powers that control both the forces of nature 
and the course of human life. Hence the building of a 
house is everywhere connected with acts of religious cere- 
monial; and its most important parts, the hearth and the 
door through which the owner passes to and fro upon his 
daily business, — which lies open to the invited g^est but 
is closed to unfriendly intrusion, — are always placed under 
the special protection of the tutelary spirits of the house- 
hold.^ In this way man makes his own dwelling-place the 
abode of his gods, and strengthens the bands of habit, which 
hold him more and more closely to the hearth-side the more 
settled his manner of life becomes, by the added power of 
religious feeling. 

Still another important advance in moral development is 
connected with this religious consecration of the house. The 
thought that the house stands under divine protection makes 
any act of violence to its owner committed within its walls a 
religious offence ; while, on the other side, the household gods 
secure the stranger who has crossed the threshold from any 
attack that might otherwise be made upon him by the members 
of the house. Out of this religiously coloured idea of the 
house-peace arise the first conceptions of a legal security of 
person and property. For as the house-peace includes all 
who have come under the protection of the roof, the house 
itself is accounted a sacred possession. Here lie, latent in 
their mythological envelope, the first germs of legal ideas 
which, where they have once broken free in any considerable 

^ Cf, the Vedic hymns that refer to house-building, quoted by Zimmbr, Altind, 
Leben^ pp. 150 ff. For the vestiges of the original ideas still preserved in the 
custom and usage of Germany, vid, Rochholz, Das altmannische Haus^ in 
Ikutscher Ciaube und Brauch, ii. pp. 67 ff. 



i8o Custom and the Moral Life [147-8 

measure from their religious connections, govern the attitude 
of society to the individual and to individual property in 
circumstances where the house-peace has long been forgotten. 
It is evidently a far-off suggestion of this origin, still pre- 
served in our modern sense of justice, that makes us think 
so seriously of an injury, perhaps insignificant in itself, done 
to a man in his own house in such fashion that violation of 
domestic security is added to the original offence. 

With the growing sense of common interest, /«W/r worship 
replaces the worship of the household. The house of God 
is the resort of all who wish to offer sacrifice or prayer : it 
is also a house of refuge from pursuit, — on the steps of the 
altar even the criminal finds safety. The threatened blood- 
revenge, or whatever the intended penalty may be, is thus 
delayed ; the pursuer's thirst for vengeance has time to 
moderate ; and the security of the holy ground gives oppor- 
tunity for reflection, for the question whether the crime 
committed may not be expiated by ransom or some other 
mode of atonement. Thus, under the protection of the peace 
of God, which abides in the temple, revenge gradually gives 
way to punishmefit. And punishment, since it is made the 
subject of a more dispassionate consideration, is graduated 
according to the seriousness of the offence ; until, little by 
little, it passes wholly out of the hands of the injured man, 
and is publicly administered on behalf of a social law and 
order that stands under the protection of the common gods. 

A similar intellectual development culminates in that 
sense for the beautiful which displays itself, after the bare 
shelter of primitive times has been replaced by a house 
adequate to the manifold requirements of life, in the 
decoration of the dwelling-place. At first the need of orna- 
mentation is felt only for those parts of the house which 
also serve as places of worship, or with which religious ideas 
are for some other reason connected. Thus the hearth is 



148] Individual Forms of Life i8i 

transformed into the altar of sacrifice, and then again into 
the oratory, where tKe members of the household meet for 
religious celebration round the decorated image of some 
god. When a common form of worship has grown up, the 
decoration passes from the individual dwelling-house to 
the house of God. And as temple-worship represents the 
worship of many individuals, the ornamentation of the 
temple also takes on a more imposing form. It extends 
from the image itself to the whole surrounding space, and 
spreads from the inside to the outside of the building. 
Since the house of God is used simply for religious cele- 
brations, the utilitarian motives that determine the building 
of a private house have nothing to say to its construction ; 
and all the freer scope is left for the sense of beauty, as 
expressive of a purely religious feeling. At a low level 
of civilisation the dwelling even of the chief differs at most 
in size and in greater solidity of structure from the hut 
of the ordinary man. External decoration of the house 
begins, as the history of architectural evolution shows us, 
not with the house of the individual, but in the place where 
reverence is paid in common to a common god, — the place 
which is therefore regarded as the dwelling-place of the god. 
The temple is the first public building. Its external decora- 
tion serves the further purpose of making the house of God 
known, far and wide, as a place of public worship. Hence 
it is that among so many peoples, and without any indication 
of historical connection, the tower has been chosen to 
mark out the house of God. From the temple, external 
ornamentation travels first to other buildings intended for 
common purposes and to the houses of the chiefs, and 
ultimately finds its way, in more modest forms, to the 
ordinary dwelling-house. It is only in the poor man's 
cottage that we find decoration confined to-day to some 
little corner of the interior, where the hanging of a crucifix 



1 82 Custom and the Moral Life [148-9 

or saint's image, or if these, too, have vanished at any rate 

the arrangement of the scanty collection of 'ornaments,* 

gives clear evidence of an origin from the altar of household 

worship. Ornamentation, then, passes first from the individual 

dwelling-house to the public building, there extends from the 

inside to the outside of the structure, and, thus elaborated, 

returns once more to the dwelling-house. Only at those 

lower stages of life where obsolete ceremonial forms persist 

longest as traditional usage, has the decoration of the house 

preserved its original character through all the changes of 

the centuries. 

if) Clothing. 

Food and shelter are sought, at first, under stress of sheer 
necessity, and come only by slow degrees to play a part 
in the aesthetic side of life. The development of clothing 
has followed a somewhat different course. There are two 
points of departure for it from the very beginning. In a 
harsh climate the covering of the body is absolutely neces- 
sary; clothes are as much a necessity as some form of 
shelter. But in the tropics clothing is not indispensable. 
The covering of certain parts of the body is, however, with 
rare exceptions, demanded by modesty^ a specifically human 
feeling, that stands in intimate relation to the 'good manners' 
of civilised society, which we shall discuss later on. Now 
the more dispensable clothing is, and the more it is actually 
dispensed with, the more important does the adornment 
of the body itself become. Here we see one of the most 
characteristic differences between primitive and civilised 
man : primitive man adorns his body directly, and civilised 
man only indirectly, by way of clothing. The great man 
among the Feejee islanders is marked out by an especially 
elaborate tattooing of the skin, and by an especially strange 
and complicated mode of dressing the hair. The great man 
of modern Europe is distinguished from his inferiors merely 



U9-5o] Individual Forms of Life 183 

by the clothes that he wears ; and even this difference is 
gradually disappearing in the prevailing struggle for social 
equality. High and low, rich and poor are known to-day 
not by the character, but at most by the quality of their 
clothing, — more particularly if they have been subjected to 
the levelling influences of a city life. 

The means employed by the savage for bodily decoration 
consist principally — aside from the rings and sticks with 
which he bores his ears and nose — in the tattooing and 
painting of the body, in complicated arrangements of the 
hair, in the filing of the teeth, and in the artificial deforma- 
tion of special parts of the body. Many Indian tribes induce 
deformity of the skull, and the Chinese women deform 
their feet. Superstition excepted, there is no motive which 
impels man so irresistibl3^ to self-torture as the desire of 
self-adornment. Tattooing is a painful, tedious and often 
dangerous operation. The Feejee chief, whose hair stands 
far out from his head in bristling points, can never lay his 
head down for sleep, but must be satisfied to support his 
neck at night-time upon a wooden block. And nose-rings, 
the blocks which the Botocudos wear in their underlip, and 
the sharp points to which the Malays file their teeth, must 
be very far from adding to the agreeableness of life. But 
they are endured with just the same resignation to the in- 
evitable as the self-imposed tortures which are supposed 
to be pleasing to the gods. 

Indeed, there is originally a very close connection between 
these two motives — the desire to adorn oneself and the 
desire to please the gods — widely separated as they are 
at the present day. Tattooing, in particular, the commonest 
form of direct bodily ornamentation, undoubtedly springs 
from a religious source. The Polynesian and the Indian 
often use in their tattooing the symbols in which they 
imagine the spirits of their tribal heroes or of other divine 



184 Custom and the Moral Life [150-1 

beings to be embodied. The tattoo itself is a duty to which 
everyone must bow ; and in earlier times its execution 
was, in all probability, universally accompanied by religious 
ceremonies.^ 

By slow degrees, personal adornment passed from the 
body to the clothes; chiefly, no doubt, under pressure of 
climatic necessities. At first the decoration of clothing does 
not exclude the direct adornment of the body. The Indian, 
who is fond of decorating the skins that form his clothing 
with particoloured feather-work, still tattoos his face and 
the other exposed portions of the body. And there is no 
civilised nation which has not preserved traces of this direct 
bodily ornamentation. We find them in Assyria, in the 
artificial dressing of hair and beard ; in ancient Egypt and 
among many of the Oriental nations at the present day, in 
the painting of hands and face ; among the Arabs (the 
Bedouins and the Arabs of the towns), in the tattooing of 
hands and face; and among ourselves, in the ear-rings and 
hair-ornaments of our women, — since the disappearance of 
the masculine queue the last vestige of direct bodily orna- 
mentation among the western peoples. Ornament thus 
travels slowly, and not without many a backward turn, from 
the body itself to the covering of the body. The merit of 
abolishing this survival from prehistoric savagery, though 
not always with permanent result, belongs to the Greeks. 
Even in the heroic age, when Eastern example was still 
followed in the gay colours and ornamentation of clothing, 
the aesthetic sense of the Greeks had almost entirely given 
up direct bodily adornment, at any rate for the male sex.^ 
The Hellenic admiration of the normal male figure in its 
pride of strength and beauty — brought out so characteristic- 
ally even in Homer — naturally led, in course of time, to the 

^ Waitz, Anthropologic der NcUurvblker^ iii. p. 95 ; iv. pp. 28 ff. 
" Cj. liUCllllOLZ, Die Iloiucrisihcn Kcaiicti, ii. 2. pp. 260 (T. 



151-2] Individual Forms of Life 185 

feeling that that form of clothing was most desirable which 
was most perfectly adapted to the natural outline of the 
body. Variegated colours and highly-ornamented garments 
then began to give place to a simple dress of a single colour. 
The Greek of the Periclean epoch showed his superiority of 
birth and position not in the Oriental fashion, by splendour 
of outward adornment, but by a greater care in dress, and 
more especially by polished behaviour and dignity of 
bearing. The Athenian distinguished the well-educated 
Greek from the barbarian by the manner in which he wore 
the himation, the cloak thrown over the shoulder. The 
Romans copied the example of the Greeks. In later times, 
however, the East again obtained considerable influence upon 
personal adornment, as it did upon other customs, religious 
and secular. The picturesque fashions of the middle ages 
are thus traceable to the interaction of that sense for 
simplicity in beauty which characterised the peoples of 
classical antiquity and the preference of the Oriental nations 
for splendour and variety of colour. The Crusades gave an 
impetus to the influence of Oriental custom, which lasted for 
centuries. But in the period of the Renaissance classical 
simplicity began to regain its old supremacy. The ornate 
baroque style brought with it all sorts of disfigurements in 
dress, and actually led to an attempt to reinstate the direct 
ornamentation of the body. And though perruques and 
queues, rouge and beauty-patches, have gradually passed out 
of use, still the age of the baroque has left its mark upon us 
in a certain tendency to direct bodily adornment shown in 
our feminine fashions. The dress of the sterner sex has been 
simplified, for practical ends, under stress of the utilitarian 
sense of modem times ; and the sense of beauty has now 
very little to say to it. 

In the course of development which we have here followed 
two transferences have been effected, both of which are of 



i86 Custom and the Moral Life [152 

some significance in ethical regard. Although they began in 
ancient Greece, they are nevertheless especially characteristic 
of modern civilisation. The first is the transference of 
ornament from man to woman. In the savage state it is 
the man who bears upon him the outward marks of wealth 
and position : the woman, upon whose shoulders generally 
rests the daily labour that is too troublesome for the man, 
goes more simply clad, and ordinarily wears no ornament at 
all. In the civilised world of to-day masculine dress has 
become practically uniform. The only exceptions are certain 
marks of military and political distinction, which are still 
attached to the clothings — last vestiges of the war trophies of 
the savage and of the hero of prehistoric times. Woman's 
dress, on the other hand, still keeps its variety of colour and 
brilliant ornaments ; nor can it be said that direct adornment 
of the body has altogether died out. 

The second transference that ornament undergoes is from 
th^ person of man to his environmetit. The more completely 
the direct ornamentation of the body and (though this is of 
less import) the ornamentation of the clothing disappear, the 
more does the sense of beauty turn to the interior and ex- 
terior of the house, and to its natural surroundings, for a 
vehicle of expression. In modern society we may meet two 
men whose clothing hardly differs in a single detail. Yet the 
one is, perhaps, the occupier of a bare room in the top storey 
of a huge lodging-house, while the other is the owner of a 
luxuriously appointed mansion. This equality in dress has 
extended even to women ; though it is attained not by the 
relinquishment of outward ornament, but rather by the effort 
of all classes to show as much of it as is possible. 

These two transferences of ornamentation, from man to 
woman and from person to environment, have their principal 
source in the tendency towards equalisation of social differ- 
ences. A secondary motive is to be found, further, in the 



»52-3] Individual Forms of Life 187 

necessity that comes with the increasing demands of life for 
a reduction of the time and labour to be expended on 
clothing and ornament The poor man, or the man of 
lower social standing, naturally wishes to do the same thing 
as his rich and more distinguished neighbour. In the 
uniform dress of society, the 'dress suit,' we have the 
explicit renunciation of this costly rivalry. But the re- 
nunciation would probably never have been made had not 
the desire to save time and labour been so strong a motive. 
The dress that men wear at the present day is the most 
comfortable for a temperate climate. The every-day suit 
can be exchanged for the dress suit without any serious 
expenditure of time ; and the dress suit can be worn on all 
possible occasions, at a funeral or a wedding or the session 
of a public board. It is, of course, the man, struggling for 
his own support or working on behalf of general interests, 
who is chiefly concerned to save time whenever the saving of 
time is possible. There is no similar cessation of hostilities, 
expressed or understood, among women. On work days the 
cook in a professional family cannot hope to rival her 
mistress ; but on Sunday, when she has the necessary 
leisure for self-adornment, it is sometimes now, as it was 
with the Greeks, merely the way of wearing the himation 
that distinguishes her from the lady of the house. 

There are, however, certain forms of clothing which have 
successfully resisted the tendency to uniformity pervading 
this whole development, forms which custom has made it a 
duty to retain, with all their characteristic differences. These 
exceptions are : the peasant dress, the professional dress, the 
holiday dress, and the dress of the mourner. The word 
'dress' (Tracht)^ used in all these phrases in place of the 
more general and variable term ' clothing ' (Kleidung), carries 
with it the idea of a certain permanence and stability. Thus 
the peasant dress is the uniform costume of a particular 



1 88 Custom and the Moral Life [153-4 

population, and the professional dress the uniform costume of 
a given calling, whether worn permanently or only during the 
discharge of professional duties. The holiday dress and the 
dress of mourning are slightly different ; they stand on the 
boundary line between * dress ' and ' clothing.' Not the whole 
costume, but only certain parts or aspects of it are dictated 
by custom. Holiday attire must show brighter colours, or 
be made of better materials than usual ; or else follow the 
conventional rule which prescribes certain articles of apparel, 
like the frock coat and high hat of modern society, for holiday 
occasions. The garb of mourning, the opposite of the holiday 
costume, avoids varied colours and lustrous materials. The 
mourner is clothed either in black or in white : white is still 
the colour of mourning among many Oriental nations, and 
its use was probably universal in ancient times. The avoid- 
ance of varied colours is a feature common to all mourning 
customs, and finds an obvious explanation in the mood of 
the mourner. The change from white to black may be due in 
part to changes in the external conditions of manufacture, 
but was probably also suggested by the desire to express 
sorrow by some outward sign which should be specifically 
characteristic of this emotion. The mourner wears his special 
dress not only for the satisfaction of his own feelings, but to 
show to others that he is debarred for the time from all forms 
of social enjoyment.^ 

In these specific costumes, enjoined by custom and in 

^ Cf, on this point the excellent remarks of Jhering, Zweck im Recht^ ii. 
pp. 312 ff. I cannot subscribe unconditionally to Jhering's hypothesis that the 
garment of mourning is not worn at all as an expression of the mourner's feelings, 
but only as a signal of his state of mind to others. We may grant that the second 
purpose is the more important at the present day. But it is equally certain that 
this was not the case in earlier stages of civilisation. For there the mourning 
dress was generally assumed merely during the funeral ceremonies, when the 
mourner had no need to give warning of his grief. It is plain that we have here, 
as in so many other cases, a shifting of motives : a motive that was originally 
secondary has now gained the supiemacy over the primary motive. 



'54-5] Individual Forms of Life 189 

certain cases (the uniform of the soldier and the government 
official) by law itself, we still find traces of that ethical signifi- 
cance which originally attached to the satisfaction of the need 
of clothing, in all its forms, as to that of all the other require- 
ments of human life. Even at the present day custom 
prescribes to all of us a certain form of dress, — a form whose 
general characteristics remain the same, however much its 
details vary with sex and age. And this prescription is 
simply the faint echo of the more binding rules which 
regulated the life of the individual in a time less remote from 
the origin of civilisation than our own. Clothing, which of 
all the objects of the outside world stands nearest to man, 
also serves most forcibly to admonish him of his dependence 
upon the custom that he shares with his fellow-tribesmen. 
An age whose sense of this relation of man to his environ- 
ment was still vivid would accordingly not only feel it 
absolutely necessary to give expression in mode of clothing 
to all the most important situations of life, but would also 
regard the change of dress that comes with entrance upon 
manhood or with the assumption of the man's armour as a 
serious event, demanding the sanction of religious ceremonies. 
There are two offices in particular, the offices of priest and 
chieftain, whose distinctive dress appeals directly to the 
feelings of reverence necessarily called forth by the high 
position of the representatives of deity and of temporal 
authority. We have not entirely lost these feelings, even at 
the present day, although they have now but little of their 
old constraining power, and, more especially, hardly anything 
of the religious import which in primitive ages attaches to 
all moral phenomena. The norm of clothing prescribed by 
custom is the first bulwark of morality. Clothing erects a 
barrier which separates classes and callings. It thus assigns 
each man to his own social position, and at the same time 
exacts from others the respect which that position demands. 



I go Custom and the Moral Life [iss-^ 

More lasting than this division, which cannot wholly resist 
the levelling spirit of the time, is the barrier which 
clothing — clothing in the abstract, without regard to its 
distinctive character — erects between individual man and 
individual man. Just as the dwelling-house is at once the 
outward sign and the most effectual means of family union, 
so clothing is at once the sign and the means of individual 
independence. It increases one's self-respect at the same time 
that it increases respect for the person of one's neighbour. 

This connection between clothing and personal dignity 
takes on a specific character in the case of the professional 
dress. The dress is to remind everyone, not least him who 
wears it, of the dignity of the calling which it indicates. The 
king with the insignia of his power, the priest with his 
vestments, the judge with his gown, stand simply for the idea 
which it is their calling to subserve.^ The significance of the 
professional dress, however, did not arise by way of contrast 
to that of the every-day costume: it is simply a special 
development, in a special direction, of a meaning already 
inherent in more general form in the dress of every-day life. 
Besides fulfilling its original purpose of a protection against 
cold and bad weather, clothing gives expression to ideas and 
feelings which relate partly to the general character of the 
wearer as man, partly to his particular position in life, and 
partly to his public calling. In other words, it constitutes an 
artificial means for the expression of the personality, supple- 
menting the natural expression of carriage and bearing and 
play of feature. The development of clothing thus reflects, 
in an especially characteristic manner, the development of 
moral culture. Sometimes it makes straight for the fulfil- 
ment of its purpose, and sometimes follows all sorts of 
roundabout paths ; sometimes it adapts itself to the outline 
of the body, and sometimes tries to produce an artificial 

^ Cf. JHBRING, Zwick im Reekif ii pp. 322 ff. 



156] Individual Forms of Life 191 

change of figure ; sometimes it prefers simplicity of cut and 
colour, sometimes variety of colour and complexity of pattern; 
here it marks off classes and callings, and there again aims at 
the effacement of social distinctions. In all these ways it 
displays to us the aesthetic taste and the moral character of 
a people. And it is here, in the nicety of one's outward 
appearance, that taste and morals are most closely inter- 
woven. 

We may notice in this same connection that clothing, like 
food and shelter, is a side of life which has its origin in very 
simple impulses, but which gradually evolves a multitude of 
secondary motives to serve as foundations of the moral life. 
Hence these three most indispensable life functions constitute, 
in the forms which they assume under the dominion of 
custom, both a measure of the existing moral condition and 
a means to the furtherance of moral development The law 
of the infinite growth of energy, which rules the whole of 
the mental life of mankind, is thus strikingly attested by the 
facts of moral development As the satisfaction of the 
animal impulses takes to itself first religious, and then 
esthetic and simple ethical motives, norms of conduct are 
set up whose moral significance only gradually comes to 
clear consciousness. But when it has once been grasped, 
other modes of moral conduct are suggested by it, and give 
rise in their turn to the formation of yet other groups of 
moral ideas. We thus have an intercrossing of conduct and 
idea, of actions and their reactive effects upon consciousness, 
so complex and close-meshed that it is impossible to decide 
in the concrete case what is effect and what is cause. At 
the beginning of the developmental series stands the bare 
animal impulse, stripped of all moral motives ; at the end we 
have the complete interpenetration of organic requirement 
and moral idea. Hence there can be no question that in this 
case morality must have originated from non-moral elements. 



192 Custom and the Moral Life [157 

But we should be taking a false path, a path that brought us 
at every step into contradiction with the facts, if we sought 
to explain the mystery of this origination by the gradual 
growth of man in knowledge of social purposes. These purposes 
always come to consciousness by way of their effects; and 
this presupposes that motives of a different order have 
preceded the acts which can later be referred to them. The 
motives are, as a matter of fact, primarily, religious ideas, and 
secondarily, (Sst/ieHc feelings, that are struggling for satis- 
faction side by side with the sensible impulses with which 
they are gradually intermingled. That the good and the 
beautiful are also the most useful is knowledge which does 
not dawn upon the human mind until very late in its history, 
and the truth of which, after all, is at any rate not without 
exception. Thus we find in the moralisation of the universal 
animal impulses a striking verification of the general experi- 
ence that in the growth of the moral from the non-moral it is 
not the moral feelings, pure and simple, that apply the lever 
to development, but complex feelings, in which the moral 
elements are contained, but contained in latent form. 

Besides the direct influence which the impulses to the 
procuring of food, shelter and clothing exert upon the moral 
life, along the manifold lines of moral development that 
proceed immediately from them, there is also an indirect and 
secondary influence, extending as time goes on over wider 
and wider social areas, and limited at last only by the finitude 
of human existence. The preparation of food, the building 
of a house, and the fashioning of clothes, are the earliest, 
because the most indispensable, forms of human labour. But 
they do not long remain alone. When once the worship of 
the gods, the sense of the beautiful and intellectual interest 
— all at first bound up with the acts that minister to these 
necessities of life — have attained their independence, new 
forms of labour, in greater and greater variety, are developed 



s 



157-8] Individtial Forms of Life 193 

from them. Work, at first merely a means of sustaining life, 

gradually comes to be the most important part of life. And 

the pleasurable feeling that comes with work well done is 

the source of play^ the lighter mood of work. Play thus 

serves to occupy the hours of rest that must necessarily 

follow the exercise and enjoyment of human powers and 

activities. 

(d) Work. 

Work, too, has its origin in the necessities of life. Its 
primitive forms are the making of clothing, the preparation 
of food, and the construction of a shelter. Primitive man is 
little inclined to carry these necessary tasks farther than 
necessity requires. When his most pressing needs are 
satisfied, he sinks into apathetic indolence. The first crude 
decoration of hearth, body or sacrificial meal is also a 
matter of necessity: it has its source in ceremonial ideas, 
which themselves spring from the desire to place human life 
under the abiding protection of the gods. At the same time, 
the tendency to decoration furnishes one of the conditions 
which ultimately led to an extension of the original sphere 
of labour. Since neither decoration nor the purposes which 
decoration subserves contribute directly to the satisfaction of 
the needs of life, its production evidently involves a kind of 
work that aims at something beyond what is absolutely and 
constrainingly necessary. Later, with the application of 
ornament to secular purposes, and the growth of the aesthetic 
sense, new forms of work are evolved, at the prompting, not 
of the impulse to self-preservation, but of the wish to make 
life beautiful. At this stage we find, too, that pleasure in 
work which contains the germs of the development of play. 

But this love of ornament, which goes back to the earliest 
stages of human life, is not the sole condition of the origin of 
work. There is another, which is not less important for 
its evolution. It consists in the increasing number of the 

I. o 



194 Custom and the Moral Life [158-9 

^necessities' of life. As more and more things become 
' necessary/ new forms of activity originate ; and these, in 
turn, afford new points of departure for the love of ornament 
and the aesthetic sense. The outward result of this multipli- 
cation of necessities is an increasing division of labour, — 
a process that exerts a profound influence upon moral 
development. 

Division of labour obtains, to a certain limited extent, at 
the very lowest stages of man's existence. We have at least 
the division of duties that follows from the differentiation of 
the sexes ; and this is the beginning of all the other and 
more complicated forms of the division of labour. In a tribe of 
hunters, where the man spends his life in pursuing game and 
fighting with the neighbouring tribes that are endeavouring 
to seize his hunting grounds, the rude hut that serves as 
' home ' is under the woman's care ; she has to prepare the 
food, to provide clothing, to tend the children. We have, 
j>., a primitive division of labour which is simply a repetition, 
in somewhat higher form, of the sexual differentiation of 
function among the animals. Nor is the nomadic life much 
more advanced. The man provides a shelter, protects the 
camp and directs the course of the family wanderings. The 
woman milks the cows, prepares the food, makes the clothing, 
and looks after the children. There is some difference, 
however: the greater complexity of the conditions of life 
brings with it the first beginnings of a division of labour 
among the men of the nomad horde. The setting up of the 
tents, the construction of the waggons and the fabrication of 
arms are tasks for whose performance some are more apt 
or more practised than others. The occupations of the 
carpenter, the cartwright and the armourer are thus seen to 
date back to the nomadic age. But the division of labour 
is still very partial and imperfect. The man who devotes 
himself to a definite kind of skilled work is not thereby 



159-^] Individual Forms of Life 195 

relieved of the labours common to all the other members of 
his tribe; and these others are not entirely ignorant of his 
special business. 

It is only under the settled conditions of an agricultural 
life that circumstances arise which make a separation of 
definite departments of work imperatively necessary. There 
are two principal reasons for the division. The first lies 
in the complexity of the conditions of life, which is greatly 
increased by the change from a wandering to a settled 
mode of living, — far more, indeed, than by the change 
from hunting to pasturing. The second is to be found in 
the origination of class distinctions that comes with the 
occupation of permanent dwelling-places. The conditions 
under which the husbandman lives are more complex, 
because a settled life demands a much larger measure of 
provision for the future, and brings the need of foresight — 
strongest of all the incentives to custom as to law and order 
— and its importance for the individual and for society to 
clearer consciousness. The hunter and the nomad defend 
their huts against the dangers of the moment. The husband- 
man aims at the lasting security of his domestic hearth and 
the fields that lie around it ; his solicitude extends beyond 
the limit of his own life to the welfare of future generations. 
Hence the building of his house is conducted with incom- 
parably greater care; the fabrication of household utensils 
and farm implements that are to last for a long time is an 
incentive to more thorough work ; while house and furniture 
alike, because they are intended as a permanent possession, 
make a stronger appeal to the sense for artistic decoration. 
Nevertheless, this motive to a more complete division of 
labour would not, perhaps, have been powerful enough to 
secure its end had it not been reinforced by the influences 
of class-distinction, which makes its appearance with the 
agricultural mode of life. The nomads know nothing of it. 



196 Custom and the Moral Life [160 

The only difference in nomadic society is between the chief 
— who as leader in battle has the first voice in the affairs 
of peace — and all the rest of the tribe who are capable of 
carrying arms. A class of dependents, of servants, can come 
into being only where the cultivation of the soil ensures 
the support of a numerous household, and at the same 
time requires more than one man's strength for tillage 
and the other tasks imposed by a settled manner of life. 
The hunter and the nomad try to prevent any increase 
of the horde that may hamper their freedom of movement 
or lessen the scanty supply of food in time of need : so 
that customs as cruel as that of child exposure and the 
abandonment of the very old are not infrequent among them. 
Prisoners of war are killed or released ; or if for any reason 
this custom is infringed, may be admitted as free men into 
the conquering tribe, — ^as e,g., among the North American 
Indians. It is agriculture that suggests the idea of utilising 
the labour of prisoners for one's own purposes. So this first 
step towards civilisation establishes at once the greatest of 
all social inequalities, that of master and slave : the slave, 
as the property of his lord, takes over all the labour that 
the master finds troublesome. In time, however, the 
relation, which was at first one of absolute oppression for 
the slave, is modified by the mere fact of a common life. 
The slave comes to be looked upon as a member of the 
family; coercion is replaced by the feeling of reverent 
affection so strikingly exemplified in the pictures of Eumaeus 
and Eurycleia in the Odyssey. Now, as the lot of the 
slave is more and more alleviated, a further factor in the 
development of class-distinctions becomes more and more 
important : the difference in amount of property that 
necessarily results from the ownership of land and the 
conditions of a settled manner of life. This difference 
means that the poorer and therefore more defenceless 



i6i] Individual Forms of Life 197 

members of a population, freemen though they are, put 
themselves under the protection of their richer and more 
powerful neighbours. In return for the advantages thus 
secured, certain duties are imposed and acknowledged : 
service in time of war, the payment of a certain portion 
of the harvest, the performance of definite personal tasks. 
Soon the struggle for possession gives rise to a class of 
freemen who are entirely without property ; and many of 
them are driven by necessity to offer their services for 
labour such as none but a slave would normally perform. So 
we have the development of a class of free artisans, who 
build and furnish the landowners house, foi^e his weapons, 
make his carts and agricultural implements, manufacture 
his household utensils, and suggest and execute modes of 
artistic decoration, receiving in return food, clothes and 
shelter. These three needs of life, whose satisfaction con- 
stitutes the primitive form of wage, are the last to come 
under the principle of the division of labour. In the 
heroic age, which had carried it into all the occupations 
mentioned just now, spinning and weaving, the grinding 
of corn and baking of bread, the preparation of meals and 
the making of clothes, are still domestic employments, en- 
trusted to the women of the household, — the only sign of 
class-distinction being that the heaviest part of the work 
is incumbent in every case upon the slave-girls and maid- 
servants. The lady of the house may not expend too great 
a measure of her strength upon the routine of domestic 
work, if only for the reason that she is to bring up her 
many children. Pride in a numerous family marks off this 
stage of human development from those that precede it as 
sharply and characteristically as the maintenance of a large 
number of household dependents. 

The course of development here sketched holds, in all 
essentials, for every tribe that maintains a constant struggle 



198 Custom and tfie Moral Life [161-2 

with neighbouring tribes of equal independence, and so has 
opportunity from time to time to make new acquisitions of 
slave labour for the cultivation of the soil. It is different 
when, as in ancient India, the conquering race find an 
original population ready to their hand, and can press it 
into their service in clearing and tilling the land. In such 
a case class-distinction follows the line of race-distinction ; 
and the eradication of hostile feeling and its social conse- 
quences is exceedingly difficult, since the subject-race form 
a body for themselves apart by sheer force of numbers. 
The mixture of races, which is bound to occur to some 
extent, gives rise, later on, to a new middle class, whose 
permanence is assured by the division of labour. Difference 
of race means difference of occupation. Here we have the 
first beginnings of the separation into castes^ the origin of 
which in the struggle of two different races is shown by 
the subsequent regulation of a man's profession according 
to his descent. 

3. THE FORMS OF INTERCOURSE. 

{d) The Labour Contract. 

With the transference of labour from the slave to the free 
(or partially free) craftsman, there arise, first, a settled trade 
in labour, and secondly, as the result of that, the two funda- 
mentals of economic civilisation, wages and the contract. 
Both alike exercise a profound influence on the social forms 
of life (pp. 227 ff.). The slave and even the hereditary 
dependent, the serf, gain their livelihood not in the form 
of wages, but as a free gift from their lord. The contract 
is a new legal relationship, originating from the agreement 
of one free man with another. The oldest form of contract 
is the wage contract, according to which a piece of work is 
to be performed by the one party to the agreement, and a 



162-3] Forms of Intercourse 199 

certain return made therefor by the other. The contract 
of barter, whose purpose is the exchange of goods, whether 
of the necessaries of life or of any other objects of value, 
presupposes more complex conditions of living. The 
primitive form of wage is again the direct bestowal of the 
three necessities of life. It still reminds us of the prototype 
of the wage proper, the support guaranteed to the slave and 
the serf. But the free craftsman, who has separated himself 
from the household of the feudal lord, and has only his own 
earnings to look to, is obliged to assure himself against need 
in his days of enforced idleness. From this point on, there- 
fore, the amount of wages is fixed, not by reference to what 
is necessary to support life during the continuance of the 
work, but by a far more complex calculation, which takes 
account of the quality of the work, the difficulty of obtaining 
it, the dispensableness or indispensableness of its products, 
and so on. Here begins the conflict of interests : the wage- 
earner trying to get as much, and the employer to pay as 
little as possible. Not that these motives ever wield exclusive 
sway ; generosity, sympathy, heedlessness and many other 
incentives of human action are present to counteract calcu- 
lation and greed of gain. All these motives are lai^ely 
influenced by the changes which the form of wage under- 
goes. 

The most important of these changes is the first : that 
which substitutes for the direct bestowal of all the necessaries 
of life one single object, whose nature is such that everything 
else can easily be obtained for it by way of exchange. In 
minor contracts the object in question is usually ^ai>r, which 
can readily be measured out in small quantities as required 
In larger transactions, the same purpose is served by cattle^ 
whose transportability renders them especially suitable for 
commercial purposes. Hence the estimation of a man's 
wealth, or of large payments, in terms of cattle droves is 



200 Custom and the Moral Life [^^3-4 

often continued into an age that is fully familiar with other 
means of exchange.^ Chief among these — when once a 
sufficient amount of them has been amassed — stand the 
precious metals. They combine the advantages of both the 
original means of exchange, grain and cattle. They are 
divisible as required, and admit of the easy transportation of 
large values. 

So long as wages consists in the bestowal of the immediate 
necessities of life, it has no means of rousing the workman to 
the full and strenuous exercise of his powers. And the 
introduction of the natural means of exchange makes little 
difference in this respect ; any considerable property in grain 
or cattle is still the exclusive privilege of the man of rank, 
and wholly out of the reach of the wage-earner. The use of 
the precious metals excites a keener desire for gain. Inas- 
much as they can neither decay nor be directly consumed, 
even the artisan, working for wages, acquires by their means 
that provision for the remote future which had hitherto been 
the prerogative of the landowner. Here too, therefore, 
good and bad results are found in intimate connection. On 
the one side are the moral injury that follows from the 
restless pursuit of wealth and the selfishness that is fostered 
by the acquisition of money; on the other are equally 
obvious advantages, — encouragement of individual talent, the 
care for the future that takes a man beyond his immediate 
interests, and the increased independence of the individual 
that comes with increase of possessions. 

This development of trade, consequent upon the develop- 

^ The Latin pecunia (from pecus) contains a direct reference to cattle as an 
original means of exchange ; and stipendium (connected wllh stipula^ a com- 
stalk) may perhaps indicate the use of grain as legal tender. The German 
custom of drawing lots with corn-stalks, and the Roman practice of the festuca 
at the liberation of slaves may also have their root in the same idea. Cf. Pictet, 
Ori^ines indo-europ.^ ii. p. 425. On the other hand it is possible that in Ihcse 
cases we simply have words derived from the same original root, as CURTIUS 
supposes. Gr, Etym, 5 Auri., p. 214. 



164] Forms of Intercourse 201 

ment of the means of exchange, has a very definite reaction 
on the division of labour. The increased opportunity for 
acquiring wealth, taken together with the growing struggle 
for independence, leads the artisan by slow degrees to direct 
his efforts upon tasks which in the preceding stage of social 
evolution were performed at home by mistress and maid- 
servant The desire to outdo others, too, tends to limit him 
to one special kind of skilled labour: a limitation all the 
more necessary since the number of workmen and the 
amount of work to be done are steadily increasing. Nor is 
this all. There is still one more advance to be made : the 
last step in this complex development where wages arise from 
labour and the form of labour is changed by the appearance 
of wages, and a step that occupies a long time in the taking. 
It consists in the extension of the idea of labour to cover 
work done not by the individual for the individual, but by 
the individual for the community. When this point is 
reached the idea of wages is well started on its way to 
honourable recognition ; it gradually shakes off the contempt 
that attached to its first origination, and still attended it 
even when the conditions of the offer and acceptance of pay 
had radically changed. Free labour had arisen out of slave 
labour; and the idea of dependence was thus associated 
with work done for wages, and made it seem unworthy of the 
dignity of a free man. We can readily understand that this 
idea of humiliation would appeal to the mind with special 
force whenever a form of work that had hitherto been done 
without payment came under the head of paid labour. Thus 
the Greeks felt it to be a degradation that the Sophists 
should take money for instruction in philosophy. And 
the Romans of a much later time thought it dishonourable 
to receive payment for any intellectual work or public 
service. The example of the Greek teachers slowly under- 
mined this idea ; but its after-effects have not wholly 



202 Custom and the Moral Life [164-5 

disappeared even at the present day. A certain support 
is always lent to it by the thought that the value of in- 
tellectual labour and public service cannot be estimated in 
money, that the payment made \s not the equivalent of the 
work done. Really, this idea of the significance of pay 
is a survival from the primitive times of trade by barter. 
The payment made in wages can never be the equivalent of 
the product of work, but merely a substitute for the necessities 
of life requisite to the accomplishment of it. This view 
is borne out by the original form of the wage-contract, in 
which the wages consists in the direct bestowal of the neces- 
saries of life required by the free workman during the 
continuance of his labour. On the other hand, however, 
primitive wages falls also under the general heading of barter 
or exchange. The artisan supplies the indispensable house- 
hold utensils and farm implements ; the landowner repays 
him by furnishing the means of livelihood. An exchange of 
this kind presupposes the equivalence of pay on the one side, 
and product of labour on the other ; and so the idea neces- 
sarily arises that work and wages are of equal value. 
Where for any reason this idea cannot be entertained, there- 
fore, the acceptance of payment is felt to be discreditable. 
The minstrel who, by the recital of his poem, adds to the 
pleasure of the feast receives a gift of honour, not pay. 
State commissions and municipal offices are looked upon as 
honorary positions, to which only the wealthy can aspire. 

It is truly a revolution in ideas that has changed this 
primitive view, which restricts the idea of work proper to 
the manual labour expended upon the production of the 
sheer necessities of life, into our modern way of thinking, 
which regards the ' wages ' of the artisan, the * consideration ' 
offered to the poet and author, the * salary ' of the official and 
even the sovereign's civil list as all alike compensation for 
work done. The different names for different forms of 



i6s-6] Forms of Intercourse 203 

payment — salary, consideration, etc — unmistakably suggest 
their origin from the free gift. In every case the course 
of change, as we should expect from what we know of 
the origin of wages, has been from below upwards. At 
first the inferior official, whose position is scorned by 
the wealthier aspirant, receives a modest salary, and the 
wandering minstrel and the * occasional ' poet place their art 
at the service of the rich man for a stipulated sum. And 
so the process continues, until the system of salaries and 
remunerations has extended to all stages of all professions. 
The old class-distinction between a higher kind of work that 
took no payment and a lower kind done for the sake of pay 
gives way before the struggle of needy talent to win recog- 
nition in the world. Whereas the standard of compensation 
within a given community — though subject, within certain 
limits, to irregularity and fluctuation — was originally very 
much the same for all forms of labour, it now varies with 
every variation of social position. 'Wages,' in some form, 
furnish the richly-spread table of the high dignitary and the 
scanty loaf of the day labourer. As pay is not the equivalent 
of work done, but a substitute for the necessaries of life 
that the doing of work requires, its amount is regulated, in 
the first instance, simply in terms of these necessaries, and 
not by regard to the value or extent of the work itself. The 
minister of state receives a higher salary than his secretary, 
the professor is better paid than the day labourer, not because 
the work done diflers in intrinsic value, but because certain 
work necessitates a more expensive manner of living. Here 
again, however, we have confirmation of the rule that the ends 
attained are not the same with the impelling motives. No 
administrative organisation, however elaborate, could cope 
successfully with the problem of determining amount of wages 
by amount of the necessaries of life which the nature of the 
work demanded. The adjustment follows of itself from the 



204 Custom and the Moral Life [166-7 

conditions of living. The higher forms of labour presuppose 
years of preparation, the continued use of numerous and 
complicated instruments, and therefore a greater expenditure 
of life and life's energy. But these same conditions mean, of 
course, that the capacity for the higher forms of labour is less 
often found, and therefore more highly prized ; and that it is 
only the prospect of a livelihood generous enough to repay 
the expense incurred in the acquisition of the necessary skill 
and competency that rouses emulation in the higher fields. 
There can be no doubt that the balance between work done 
and the necessaries of life essential to its doing is never 
exactly struck. The needs of the moment, the vagaries of 
taste and fashion, popular prejudices, and what not, are often 
enough of greater weight for the estimation of the higher 
forms of work than the intrinsic value of the product. At 
the same time, this self-regulation of motives can lead in 
course of time, as nothing else can, to an independent 
appreciation of values, manifesting itself in all sorts of com- 
pensatory arrangements, introduced for the most part under 
the protection of the state and primarily intended for the 
requital of public services. Even now we regard it as an 
abuse if the state is guided in the payment of its officials by 
considerations of supply and demand rather than by an 
independent estimate of the mode of life demanded by the 
office ; and no one who has insight enough to read the future 
in the light of the past will doubt that the adoption of the 
same standpoint in matters of private contract is simply a 
question of time. For here, as everywhere, the state cannot 
confine itself to just dealing in its own business matters : its 
first duty is to see that no injustice is done by the individuals 
who enjoy the advantages of its protection. 

The influence of this development in ethical regard can 
hardly be exaggerated. Originally a means of utilising the 
strength of the poor and the oppressed to minister to the 



167-8] Forms of Intercourse 205 

needs of the powerful, wage-payment has become a vehicle 
for the distribution of goods, the aim of which is to assure 
every man in the mode of life that accords with the character 
of his work. The generalisation of the wage-principle has 
ennobled work and wages both ; and by breaking down the 
barrier between the master who need not work and the 
dependent who must, has grown to be one of the most power- 
ful means of promoting social equality. True, equality, even 
in the most ideal human society, can never be anything more 
than an equality of the outward conditions of the competition 
for work and wages. The different levels of work, and the 
corresponding differences in the value set upon it, will always 
retain their significance. And even this equalisation of the 
external conditions of competition is an ideal to which human 
society may approximate by slow degrees, but which it will, 
perhaps, never entirely attain. For it is a necessary result of 
that increasing care for the future, which is so intimately 
connected with the development of the more perfect forms 
of the wage-contract, that the wages received is not expended 
outright for immediate support, but in part transformed into 
permanent property^ for the future maintenance both of the 
wage-earner himself and of his descendants. In the conse- 
quent accumulation of capital we have a never-failing source 
of inequality in the conditions under which different men set 
out upon the path of life. It is made easier for some, harder 
for others, to procure the instruments of remunerative work ; 
while a small minority are enabled to live idly upon the fruits 
of the labour of earlier generations, or, through it, upon the 
labour of their contemporaries. 

It would be a most serious blow to individual freedom, a 
blow that would paralyse one of the most powerful incentives 
to human activity, should we attempt by violent means 
to abolish this source of inequality, on the plea that a man's 
own merit or demerit should determine his position in life. 



2o6 Custom and the Moral Life [i68 

But the more progressive a society, and the more energetic 
its members, the more evident becomes the working of that 
mechanism of self-regulation which here, as before, gradually 
removes all injurious consequences. Inequality of bodily 
and mental powers will always lead to difference in the value 
of the work done, a difference whose effects transcend the 
limits of the individual life. But the quicker the waves 
of the social movement, — the quicker, f>., the rise or fall 
of the individual according to the measure of strength that 
is meted out to him, — the more dependent are the favours 
of fortune upon the character of him who receives them. Of 
high import when found together with talent and ability, 
they soon lose their power without such reinforcement 
Fortune is a factor that can never be eliminated from human 
life. If its material form should be abolished, it would still 
remain in those endowments of character which, as things 
are, tend constantly to produce inequality of material 
possessions. It would be depriving life of a part of its most 
valuable contents should we do away with that struggle 
of individual talent which cannot be maintained without 
the stimulus of material success. It is true that this has 
no moral value of its own. But as there is for man no 
intellectual truth and no aesthetic enjoyment save as they 
are mediated by the ideas of sense, so also there is no 
morality save as mediated by motives that are originally of 
a non-moral character. The effect outruns the motive, but 
is thereby itself by slow degrees transformed into motive. 
That egoistic motives may be eliminated in the struggle 
of interests, this struggle must evidently have begun : and 
for its beginning the egoistic motives are the one thing 
necessary. 

The labour which originated in the compulsory work of 
the slave and the bondman, and developed into the skill 
of the free artisan, has gradually been elevated and extended 



i68-9] Forms of Intercourse 207 

until it now includes every form of useful activity that is 
devoted to private or public interests. Not only has its 
average value been enhanced in this process; the slightest 
task accomplished in the struggle for the necessities of daily 
life has been ennobled. It has its place in the vast complex 
of active forces, in which not merely the inevitable struggle 
for existence, but everything that man does — his endeavour 
after the highest ideal and his effort to obtain the most 
material of material good things — is manifested in the form 
of labour. In this way a standard has been set up whereby 
we estimate the value of labour not by the character of 
its results, but simply by the relation which these results 
bear to the duty undertaken. And this moral common 
measure of the value of human achievement is helping 
little by little to give practical effect to an idea that first 
took root in religious soil, — the idea of a moral equality of 
mankind, independent of the outward conditions of living. 

It must not be supposed, however, that this extension of 
labour to all the various departments of life ennobles merely 
the lower forms of work. True, it colours the humblest 
actions with the thought of fulfilment of duty in the service 
of life ; but this same thought does not penetrate the higher 
forms till after they, too, have been brought under the general 
head of labour. The chieftain of the heroic age r^ards a 
battle as an agreeable exercise of his powers, and not seldom 
plans a hostile inroad from mere love of danger and adventure. 
The head of the patriarchal state regards it as a pious duty 
to hand over his inheritance of land and people to his son 
undiminished or, if possible, increased ; but the thought of a 
duty that transcends these considerations of property is 
present to him only in dim and uncertain outline. The 
germs of loyalty, of fidelity to the duties of one's station, 
are here still latent, enveloped in the personal feelings of 
love for home and race. Not until the development of 



2o8 Custom and the Moral Life t>69-7o 

custom had gone so far that labour was raised to the dignity 
of free service, and then extended to every form of useful 
activity, did the ideal of a moral community, where activity 
and a loyal discharge of duty are the conditions of life, 
become a fundamental and all-pervading principle. 

The highest form of human activity is now not simply 
an agreeable exercise of the bodily or mental powers, but 
— like the humblest work that ministers to the necessities 
of life — a conscientious fulfilment of duty. But it has not 
therefore lost the pleasurable effect that constituted its old- 
world attraction. On the contrary, it has communicated 
something of its own attractiveness to the lower forms of 
labour, in direct proportion as these have grown to 
be free manifestations of men's powers, instead of the 
grudging outcome of fear and coercion. This pleasurable 
effect, which makes work enjoyable and changes coercion to 
inclination, brings to birth a new form of human activity: 
work gives rise to play, 

ib) Play. 

Play is the child of work. There is no form of play that 
is not modelled upon some form of serious employment 
which naturally precedes it in time. For work is one of the 
necessities of life. But since in working a man gradually 
learns to enjoy the exercise of his powers, work itself 
becomes a matter of free choice, and the pleasure which 
it affords incites him to repeat it, in such form that the 
burden and danger are reduced to a minimum and, if possible 
nothing but the enjoyment left. It is then easy to add to 
the original pleasure by a rapid alternation of different forms 
of activity. Play thus gives up the utilitarian purposes of 
work, and makes the enjoyment which is but a secondary 
consequence of its prototype its own chief aim. A further 
result of this change is an imaginative transformation of 



I70-I] Forms of Intercourse 209 

work, animated simply and solely by the new purpose of 
pleasure, and accomplished, for the most part, by the 
enhancement of pleasurable emotions due to their rapid 
alternation. 

From the earliest times there was one constituent of human 
labour the nature of which made it eminently suitable for 
repetition in less serious form. This is the ritualistic element, 
which in a primitive age enters into the most varied kinds of 
occupation, and soon raises itself to the position of a separate 
obligatory act Religious worship is closely associated with 
the love of ornament, and by thus awakening the aesthetic 
sense becomes a source of enjoyment which stimulates to its 
less serious repetition. It is in this way that the first class of 
games arises, the games which we may term from their origin 
ritual games. They are undoubtedly among the oldest forms 
of play, but have undergone very considerable changes in 
the course of time, — so that not only is the element of ritual 
which they contain in most cases entirely unrecognisable, 
but the games themselves have become greatly degenerated 
and divorced from their original purpose as games. Here 
belong, in the first instance, the games of cliance. Traces of 
the religious significance of the drawing of lots are still 
clearly preserved in popular superstition. Curious to lift the 
veil of the future, man believes that the lot drawn or the die 
thrown brings him a message from heaven : the gods, who 
control all things, must guide his hand in drawing and 
throwing. As the religious idea dies out, chance takes the 
place of divine guidance. The pleasure of alternate hope 
and realisation makes the questioning of fate an agreeable 
pastime ; and a new motive, the thirst for gain, soon lends it 
an additional attraction. 

Another group of these ritual games may be called, from 
their origin, ceremoftial gSLxnes. They are religious ceremonies 
secularised for purposes of amusement. Here belong the 
L p 



2IO Custom and the Moral Life [171-2 

dance, the march, and many children's games, in which the 
essential factor in the enjoyment is the pleasure aroused 
by regular rhythmical movements performed in unison, 
especially when accompanied by music or singing. Music 
itself is nothing but a game of this order, so highly developed 
that it has grown to be a form of art. True, the pleasure in 
dancing, singing and listening to music is so pronounced, and 
the impulse to express all the deeper emotions by their 
means — whether the aim be to intensify the feeling or to 
allay it — appears so early, that there is now but small hope 
of determining the point at which their secularisation began. 
The second important class of games is composed of work 
games. These are less serious repetitions of phases of human 
labour. The tasks copied are not those necessary for the 
satisfaction of the needs of daily life, but rather the labours 
whereby man strives to assure his hard-won gains from 
hostile rivals. Combat^ which calls out a man's full powers 
and gives a high distinction to the victorious contestant, was 
a form of serious sport in immemorial ages, and, like its 
peaceful counterpart, the chase, regarded not as work but as 
an agreeable exercise, the privilege of the free man over the 
slave labourer. Fighting in sport is without any doubt 
almost as old as fighting in earnest. The chiefs of the 
heroic age amuse themselves in the intervals of serious 
warfare with prize contests. The prize combat forms the 
nucleus of common national festivals, and is the principal 
attraction at every important memorial celebration, more 
especially at the burial of chiefs and heroes. The peculiar 
charm that lies in the joy of battle has led, further, beyond the 
prize combat — the true copy which not seldom has much of 
the fatal seriousness of its original — to all sorts of remoter 
and less dangerous imitations. Among these are, ^.^., all 
gymnastic and athletic sports, in which some one physical 
exercise is selected from the total sum required by actual 



172] Forms of Intercourse 211 

fighting, and made the object of friendly rivalry. Here 
belong, further, all games of the type of nine-pins and 
draughts, games of immense antiquity, in which stones are 
cast or wooden figures change their places in obedience to 
definite rules of combat. Thus the Odyssey tells us that 
the suitors of Penelope passed their time by help of a kind 
of draughts. The result of the game depends partly upon 
shrewdness and partly upon mere chance : both of them 
factors which combine with the rivalry of physical strength 
and dexterity to make real fighting so much like play. 

The gradually increasing value set upon the humbler 
forms of work is placed in a new light by the fact that the 
course of development of work and play takes diametrically 
opposite directions. Labour meant at first merely the work 
necessitated by the struggle for daily bread, and gradually 
widened to include the higher and freer forms of human 
activity. Play begins with these freer and more play-like 
activities, and gradually widens to include the humbler tasks 
of life : a sure proof that even the commoner forms of labour 
are now part enjoyment, and only part toil. The play im- 
pulse manifests itself in the most varied ways, and covers 
the most diverse forms of human activity, in children's games. 
The child does in play what he will some day do in earnest 
in his chosen profession, and what he sees others doing 
around him. He learns in play to find pleasure in work. 
Inclinations and talents gain opportunity for expression, and 
so the choice of a future occupation is made easier : an 
advantage which becomes the more important the more the 
child's natural endowments outweigh family tradition in 
deciding his career. Hence the games of childhood are no 
idle pastime, but rather one of the most important means 
of education ; means that we should choose and vary with 
constant reference to the harmonious development of body 
and mind. 



212 Custom and the Moral Life [173 

Now this special kind of play, which consists in a less 
serious repetition of the real work of life, does not by any 
means lose its value even when childhood, the * proper ' time 
for play, is passed and over. It simply changes its forms 
in accordance with the changed needs of life. Bodily exer- 
cise is of no importance to the mature man ; and mental 
gymnastics, too, has lost most of its value as moulding the 
intellectual faculties. All the more necessary is it that those 
who are engaged in the real struggle of life should have 
their minds raised above the trifles of everyday existence, 
and their character steeled against the influences that are 
always tending to change the pleasurable discharge of pro- 
fessional duties into a disagreeable routine. The need 
is met, fully and completely, in the field of art The 
ancients saw clearly that the enjoyment of artistic creation 
is as indispensable to the mature mind as play is to the 
child, and ought therefore to be as universal. We moderns, 
oppressed by a theory of life that finds in work nothing but 
toil and struggle, have let this truth escape us. Thousands 
are to-day cut off from the elevating influences of art by 
necessity, and thousands dispense with them from choice. 
It is to be hoped that all this will change, and that dramatic 
art in particular — the art which copes most directly with the 
problem of exhibiting the serious side of life in less serious 
form, purified and perfected in the refinery of artistic ex- 
pression — will soon regain the place in popular estimation 
that it once actually possessed. Language has good reason 
for terming the finished product of dramatic art a *play.' 
For we may say more truly of the drama than of any 
other form of art, that its object is the less serious repetition 
of the affairs of real life, and thus closely akin to the object 
of children's games. On the other hand, its power of com- 
bining the critical experiences of a lifetime into an artistic 
whole makes it a means of moral education which reacts 



173-4] Forms of Intercourse 213 

upon our personal attitude to the problems of life, ennobling 
labour and purifying motives. 

To make the parallel still more complete, the objects 
of artistic presentation have in the course of centuries under- 
gone a change whose details show an exact accordance with 
the extension of play to the various departments of life. 
Art, like play, begins with the higher things of life : the 
exaltation of the deeds of chief or hero, the depiction of the 
tragic overthrow of powerful dynasties, are at first the only 
subjects which it deems worthy of interest, or calculated to 
raise the mind above the round of daily duties. It is not 
until ancient civilisation has passed its culmination, and the 
wealthier classes of society are surfeited with overabundance 
of enjoyments, that art steps down now and again into 
humbler circles, where men have not been touched by the 
luxury of their social superiors. But idyllic poetry, which 
owes its origin to this search for contrast, was usually so 
far removed from things as they are that the life it portrayed 
could not be accepted even as an idealisation of reality. It 
was left for the present age to spread the glamour of poetry, 
little by little, over all departments of life. Modern art has 
found a moral and aesthetic value in every form of earnest 
discharge of duty, and, itself the result of a changed view of 
life, has thus helped on its part to extend and establish the new 
order. For the artistic exaltation of the tasks of life is of 
infinitely greater service than the acknowledgment of their 
practical import to awaken a sympathetic interest in others' 
lives and to enhance the value set upon human labour as such. 
This extension of aim, which is equally characteristic of all 
the forms of art, has not seldom received explicit recognition 
upon its moral side, — oftener in poetry than elsewhere.^ 

^ It must suffice here to remind the reader of the motivisation of Diderot's 
domestic drama Le Jils naturel^ and of Gustav Freytag's first romance, SoU und 
Haben^ where the author expressly sets himself the task of ' paying the German 
people a visit at their work.' 



2 14 Custom and the Moral Life [174-5 

This is the conclusion of a development whose earliest 
stages are lost in the mists of mythical antiquity. The 
aesthetic sense was first exhibited in the adornment of images 
of the gods, and in ceremonies of religious worship which 
were accompanied by song and dance. All art is, therefore, 
religious in origin. But it has gradually taken to itself 
every department of life; so that the most potent of the 
arts — epic and dramatic poety, and various branches of the 
plastic arts — have now made the work of human life, in all its 
manifold forms, their special subject And in this evolution, 
too, art is a copy of the life which it portrays. For the 
beautifying of life and the deeper moralisation of its tasks 
have everywhere had their source, as the history of custom 
plainly shows, in religious ideas and the ceremonies of 
religious worship. 

(c) Polite Manners: Personal Deportment. 

The expressions gesittet (mannerly) and sittlich (moral), 
closely as they resemble each other in sound and form, really 
stand very much in the relation of outside to inside, of clothes 
to the man beneath the clothes. 'Mannerly' is what is in 
accordance with social custom ; ' moral ' is what accords 
with the universal norms of morality. Hence, by 'polite 
manners' we understand the conduct of an individual life in 
accordance with the rules laid down by custom, as shown 
especially by personal deportment in face of the outward 
changes and chances of life, and by considerateness in inter- 
course with others. The forms of social intercourse, which 
we shall have to speak of later on (pp. 216 ff.), form part of 
* polite manners ' in this wider sense of the phrase ; so that 
we can divide the topic under the two heads of personal 
deportment and beftaviour to others. 

There is nothing that shows the influence of civilisation 
upon the individual so plainly as his attitude to the vicissi- 



175-6] Forms of Intercourse ^15 

tudes of life. Primitive man expresses his joys and sorrows, 
all the emotions of the moment, without reserve or attempt 
at self-restraint Homer's heroes make their pain known by 
loud outcry ; and even in the Attic period the tragic poets try 
to awaken the sympathy of the spectators by the lamenta- 
tions of their heroes. Nevertheless, the principle of modera- 
tion in all things had by this time begun to exert a certain 
influence upon personal deportment.^ But, as Lessing has 
remarked in the Laocoon, the idea that the dignity of man- 
hood requires a firm bearing in all the changes and chances 
of life, and especially a tranquil endurance of physical pain, 
played an incomparably greater part in the Roman mind 
than in the Greek. It is from Rome that the fundamental 
rules of personal deportment received the negative stamp 
which is characteristic of them at the present day. To avoid 
anything that might too strongly attract the attention or 
arouse the feelings of others, and therefore to show an 
unmoved front in good and evil fortune, to repress joy as 
well as pain, and to control the passions, — this is the maxim 
which custom now bids us follow. It makes no demand 
for apathetic indifference, whose unnaturalness would be 
shocking; but for a restraint of emotion, not carried far 
enough to throw doubt upon the existence of natural 
feelings, but yet sufficient to shield others from impressions 
that might disturb their equanimity. Once originated in this 
way, however, the idea of polite manners soon acquires a 
wider range. Not only can thoughtless words and unbridled 
emotion offend us : every mode of unaccustomed behaviour 
— so great is the power of habit over us — will be felt as 
offensive. Hence polite manners, in the wider sense, forbid 
not only what is materially displeasing, but also what is 

^ For evidence of this feet see L. Schmidt, Ethik der Griechcriy ii. pp. 418 ff. ; 
for the same characteristics in the Homeric age, cf. BucHHOLZ, op, cU,y iii. 
pp. 344 flf. 



5i6 Custom and the Moral Life [176-7 

formally objectionable ; things that in themselves would not 
offend us, but that by their discrepancy with the ordinary 
code of social demeanour draw upon them an undue 
measure of attention. The man who dresses in an entirely 
different way from his contemporaries and social equals, and 
the man who takes from the dish with hand instead of fork, 
are just as 'unmannerly* as those who burst into loud 
laughter at their neighbour's awkwardness, or talk obtrusively 
on every occasion of themselves and themselves alone. 

(d) Forms of Social Intercourse : the Form of Salutation, 

While personal deportment is always determined by con- 
sideration for others, still, the phenomena in which it is 
shown are of a purely individual character. Pleasure and 
pain may be felt by the isolated individual : though the 
expression of emotion would then, in all probability, be 
different from what it is in society, since regard for society 
would, of course, be unnecessary. It is this, on the other 
hand, that forms the distinguishing mark of those forms 
of polite manners which are expressed in one's demeanour to 
one's fellow-men, and which would disappear altogether if 
there were no intercourse with others. In personal deport- 
ment consideration for others is indirectly, in the forms of 
social intercourse directly involved ; it constitutes, indeed, 
their sole motive, and finds adequate expression only in 
forms of outward demeanour. Of especial importance 
among these — they may vary to an extraordinary degree 
under varying circumstances — are the forms whereby man 
conveys to his fellow-men the sentiments of respect, of 
kindliness and of friendship. 

The most general method of expressing these feelings is 
by salutation. The root-meaning of the salutation, and a 
meaning which stands out clearly in its most colourless as in 
its most pronounced forms, is respect for one's neighbour. But 



177] Forms of Intercourse 217 

with this there may be combined all sorts of secondary 
ideas : friendship, kindliness, condescension, humility, etc. 
Now it is plain that the most constant element in salutation 
at the present day, the bow^ cannot be adequately explained 
from the feelings which now accompany it. Here again, 
therefore, it is necessary to go back for explanation to the 
conjectural origin of the custom. It has been attempted, 
from the genetic point of view, to account for the forms of 
greeting as survivals of the gestures whereby a man indicated 
his peaceful intentions. In an age when the stranger in the 
path might easily be a deadly enemy, it would be advisable 
in chance encounters to show one's friendly intent by gesture. 
Thus the offering of the hand would signify that it held 
no weapon ; the uncovering of the head would show defence- 
lessness, etc. Very many forms of salutation have been 
explained in this way: the Chinese custom of raising the 
hands, the crossing of the hands over the breast that charac- 
terises the followers of Islam, and the custom that prevails 
to-day in the East and in the dominions of African despots 
of the prostration of the subject in presence of the ruler. 
All these forms of salutation have so much in common, that 
they incapacitate those from whom the salutation comes for 
defending themselves or attacking others.^ 

Plausible as the explanation is, however, we must 
remember that the actual outcome and the original aim of 
an action do not necessarily coincide, and that their 
coincidence in the history of custom is extremely rare. 
Of course, this does not exclude the possibility that effects 
which follow a given action with a certain degree of con- 
stancy may afterwards, as occasion offers, be numbered 
among its motives. And this may have happened in the 
present instance; but there can be no doubt that, if it has, 
it is only by way of one of the 'manifold ramifications of 
which every primitive custom is capable. 

^ JHB&INO, Zwtck im Richt^ il pp. 640 ff. 



2i8 Custom and the Moral Life [178 

There is one form of salutation in particular, a form of 
very high antiquity, which entirely precludes any such 
interpretation as that given above. It is that of bowing 
down in the house of God or before his image. The 
attitude of prayer is an attitude of salutation, only that 
the customary token of respect has been raised to the 
expression of the deepest reverence and humility. And 
the same thing holds of the forms of salutation in which 
one man humbles himself before another, but the thought of 
evidencing peaceful intentions is as remote as it can well be : 
as when in the East, ^^., the subject casts himself upon the 
ground before the ruler, or in the old Greek days the fugitive 
embraced the knees of his unknown host to implore pro- 
tection. Now it is a rule of universal application in the 
history of custom, that where we find related usages showing 
all degrees of intensity the most intensive, those in which 
the strongest feelings are displayed, are the most nearly 
original. The further course of development is governed 
by the law that the feelings gradually grow weaker, and 
therefore their expression more moderate ; so that in course 
of time new motives may find a place alongside of the old. 
If we apply this rule to the present case, we must grant that 
the sign of religious veneration bears all the marks of 
primitiveness. The form of salutation which comes nearest 
to it is that in which one man humbles himself before 
another. Indeed, this is oftentimes hardly distinguishable in 
mode of outward manifestation from the attitudes of religious 
self-abasement. And we find as a matter of fact that the 
sign of abasement before an earthly ruler has not seldom 
turned back again to become the sign of religious veneration. 
Reverence for one's fellow-man, if carried beyond due 
bounds, will lead of itself, in virtue of the close affinity of 
feeling, to his deification. 

Beginning with the prostration of the subject before tlie 



178-9] Forms of Intercourse 219 

ruler, we have, now, in a progressively graded series, the 
subordinate's salutation of the powerful functionary, the 
artisan's modest greeting of the man of position, the bow 
exchanged between social equals, and finally the condescend- 
ing nod or wave of the hand with which the prince replies to 
the lowly inclination of his servant. Pale and colourless as 
this last expression of respect may seem, nevertheless its 
difference from the obeisance of the subject to whom it is 
vouchsafed, and even from the expression of that deepest 
humility which man feels only in the presence of his God, 
is in the last resort merely a difference of degree. 

A confirmation of this theory of the religious origin of 
salutation is to be found in the significance of the forms of 
words employed in greeting. Even to-day their religious 
reference is, in most cases, plainly discernible. They are one 
and all prayer formula^ more or less obscured and curtailed 
by the progress of time.^ The prayers are as a rule offered 
for the person accosted or saluted, but may in some cases be 
addressed to him : so, e.g., the plea for protection, the humble 
obeisance before the ruler, and always and especially the 
religious supplication. In this last the customary relation 
between gesture and words of salutation is reversed ; the 
spoken prayer is the important thing, while the attitude 
merely indicates the feelings which accompany it 

This peculiarity of the forms of words used in salutation 
is plainly not very favourable to the theory that the salutation 
itself is an evidence of peaceful intentions. It is a long step 
from the assurance of friendly intent to prayer; it is a 
much easier passage from prayer to the tokens of reverence 
and respect and friendship and kindliness, — a graded series 
of related feelings for whose expression the gestures and the 

^ Jhering, too, explains certain forms of words, in which the religious reference 
stands out with especial clearness (Pax vobiscum, Gctt set mit Dir [God be with 
you], Adieu, etc ) in this way, but does not extend the explanation beyond them. 
Op. cit., p. 694. 



220 Custom and the Moral Life [179-80 

words of greeting are still used to-day. Customs of so 
primitive a growth as salutation do not arise by way of 
reflection ; and if now and again reflection takes possession 
of existing customs, it never has the power to extend them 
beyond the limited purpose that they subserve, and so to 
secure their continuance. Nothing but an original feeling is 
strong enough to produce expressions so concordant; and 
nothing but the continuity of feeling, persisting intact amid 
all change, can assure the varying forms of expression their 
constancy of character. We greet an acquaintance whom we 
meet to-day with words and gestures that repeat, in weakened 
form, the words and gestures wherewith in a remote antiquity 
man humbled himself before his God : and the reason is that 
the feeling aroused in the two cases is, in the last analysis, 
one and the same. As humility passed into reverence, 
reverence into respect, and this again into friendship and 
kindliness, the gestures of salutation were moderated step by 
step ; while the form of words changed from the prayer 
addressed to the person saluted to the prayer offered for him, 
and was finally transformed into a simple formula of good 
will, whose only mark of origin lay in its linguistic ex- 
pression. 

There is, however, one form of salutation which not im- 
probably had a purely human origin, — the haftd-clasp. But 
here, again, the primary significance is not the assurance of 
peaceful intentions, but pledge and compact.^ The mutual 
clasp of the right hand or, on especially solemn occasions, of 
both hands is so natural a symbol of the bofid which is here 
to hold man to man, that we can readily understand its wide 
diff'usion, particularly among the Semitic and Indo-European 
peoples. At the same time, the hand-clasp, too, has its 
religious import. It is the right hand that is employed in 
symbolic confirmation of the oath ; the oath-taker lays his 

^ J. Grimm, Deutsche RechtsaUerthumery 2 Ausg,^ p. 138. 



i8o-i] Forms of Intercourse 221 

right hand upon the object that he holds most sacred : the 
sword-hilt in heathendom, in Christian times the crucifix or 
the reliquary. The Jew, whose whole conception of religion 
was that of a covenant between God and man, made the hand 
stretched forth from the cloud an indispensable attribute of 
Jehovah, when in despite of the Mosaic command he made 
himself an image of his God. Hence even if the hand-clasp 
was originally the sign of certain human relations, we shall 
still hardly be wrong in supposing that the sacredness of 
the promise which it ratified had its root in this religious 
reference ; so that the gesture may have been felt as at once 
the symbol of compact and of religious vow. Then, here as 
elsewhere, the two meanings grew gradually obscure, until in 
the ordinary form of salutation the hand-clasp has become a 
general sign of simple friendliness. 

{e) The Ethical Significance of the Forms of Social 

Intercourse. 

We do not need here to enter in further detail upon the 
various phenomena which bear witness to consideration for 

others over the whole range of social intercourse.^ The forms 
of salutation may stand as a typical instance, differing only 
in greater antiquity from many other forms of courtesy. But 
this means, of course, that the development of these other 

^ JiiERiNG has given a very discriminating account of all these phenomena in 
the second volume of his Zweck im Recht, The only point upon which I feel 
bound to differ from him is his endeavour to trace the origin of all customs to a 
knowledge of their social utility. Such a procedure leads inevitably to the 
substitution of our own ways of thinking for those of primitive man ; although 
the facts to be explained are, as a matter of fisict, wholly inexplicable from the 
modem standpoint. No one could invent the forms of salutation to-day, any more 
than he could language or the state. In other words, Jhering seems here to have 
transferred to the domain of historical ethics something of the error of the old 
theories of natural law, which he himself criticises elsewhere with so much 
penetration. His analysis of the forms of social intercourse is admirable, so ftur 
as it relates to motives and their consequences at the present day, but pays far too 
little attention to the actual development of the phenomena in history. 



222 Cusiom and the Moral Life [181-2 

forms dates, as a rule, from a later period ; and the late 
origination is rendered possible, in its turn, by the fact that 
all of the customs in question constitute means of expressing 
similar feelings. We begin our letters with an assurance of 
esteem, and close them, just before subscribing our name, with 
an expression of respect ; we give our friend the precedence 
as we leave the house together; modem languages use the 
plural form of address, * your,' * you,' Z4r, Sie, etc, instead of 
the simple 'thou,' Du^ etc., while the Chinese, if he speaks 
of himself in conversation, endows himself with the humblest 
attributes that he can think of: and these things are one and 
all translations of the more or less lowly obeisance of salu- 
tation into another form of symbolism better suited to the 
particular occasion. Some of them, therefore, may quite 
well originate at so late a period that the primary motives of 
the custom are not directly operative in their production. 
Indirectly operative, however, they are and must be, for no 
new forms arise that are not felt to be the fit and proper 
supplements of the old. The development of custom is like 
the growth of a tree that is always sending out new shoots ; 
these receive their nourishment, in the first instance, only from 
the branch on which they have grown, but are none the less 
really connected through branch and stem with the root 
itself. In the case before us the root is formed by religious 
feelings and ritualistic ideas, which stand in an extremely 
close relationship to the feelings of humility, reverence and 
respect, the foundations of all the customs now under 
discussion. 

As exhibited in the forms of social intercourse, these 
feelings are very certainly not the feelings of primitive man. 
In the savage state, man has no consideration for his fellow- 
men ; least of all, the consideration which shows itself in the 
mark of respect voluntarily paid to an equal. On the other 
hand, it is wholly inconceivable that the rules of social 



1 82] Forms of Intercourse 223 

intercourse should have come into being unless the gernois 
of their future development had existed from the first. Now 
the earliest motive that humbles the will, that causes it to 
bend before a stronger power, is fear of the forces controlling 
the course of nature and human destiny. The attitude of 
submission induced in this way is then carried over to 
human relationships. First of all, it is adopted towards 
those members of society who are distinguished by some 
special power and authority; then comes by slow degrees 
to be taken up towards equals ; and is finally assumed, to a 
greater or less degree, towards man as man, without regard 
to rank or position. So arises the fundamental rule of social 
intercourse : to treat one's neighbour with respect, and show 
reverence where reverence is due, without derogation from 
one's own dignity ; but always to put oneself as little forward 
as circumstances will allow. 

Custom does not always observe the limits indicated in 
this rule. It cannot always strike the balance, between self- 
respect and respect for one's neighbour. A tendency to 
exaggeration is inherent in the very nature of courtesy. 
In bidding us respect the dignity of man as man, the rules 
of politeness cannot fail to conflict at times with our moral 
estimate of a particular individual. And as we are thus 
obliged in many cases to regard the conventional expressions 
of respect and courtesy as forms which have far outrun their 
contents, it is natural that we should cease to expect any 
dcfiniteness of relation whatsoever between form and 
contents in the matter of polite usage. Fortunately, habit 
blunts our sense of the exaggeration, and so makes it harm- 
less. What is looked upon by one age as right and proper 
may, therefore, appeal to a later time, when the habit has 
died out, as simply ridiculous. Thus the 'most obedient 
humble servant,' the in Demtith ersterbender Dicncr und 
Knecht of the letters of the last century seems to us to be 



224 Custom and the Moral Life [182-3 

tasteless exaggeration ; and it is possible that future genera- 
tions will speak of our prodigal use of 'faithfully' and 
' sincerely/ of Hochachtung and Ergebenheit, in precisely the 
same way. This power of habit, which makes it the silent 
corrective of formal exaggeration, keeps the inner meaning 
of the forms of social intercourse approximately unchanged 
over relatively long periods of time. It is only the great 
epochs in the development of civilisation that show any 
considerable difference in this regard. We have already 
mentioned the three principal stages : in the first, the signs 
of respect are shown only by the subordinate to his superior ; 
in the second, they are also current between equals ; and in 
the third, regard is had by all to all. 

This extension could not have taken place had not the 
original motive been gradually transformed and associated 
with new motives. The earliest motive is fear. As man 
first fears his gods, then reverences, and finally loves them, 
so it is fear that bends the back of the slave when he appears 
before his master. Only under the influence of milder 
customs, when a bond of attachment has grown up between 
all the members of the same household, is this feeling of 
fear moderated to the feeling of respect. And now comes 
the change. Fear has lost its force ; so that if respect is 
to be extended to equals, and even to inferiors, new motives 
must arise to take the place of fear. One of these, evidenced 
in persofial bearing, is found in the desire to repress all show 
of egoism in order not to derogate from one's own dignity. 
As respect originates from fear, so from the effort to maintain 
personal dignity there gradually arises a desire not to make 
oneself disagreeable in intercourse with others by the 
obtrusive assertion of one's private interests. The restraint 
that a man imposes upon himself by this repression of his 
personal feelings is not the result of reflection ; he does not 
argue with himself that the most agreeable intercourse 



183-4] Forms of Intercourse 225 

demands from everyone a certain measure of self-restraint : 
this is the result, not the motive of the custom. On the 
other hand, the unpleasant sensations which fall to the lot 
of the man who is always putting himself forward will 
naturally serve, from the very first, effectively to regulate 
the intercourse of social equals. The effects of respect are 
thus originated before respect itself has become the actual 
motive of conduct But the effect is gradually transformed 
into a motive ; though it does not oust the earlier and lower 
motive, the wish not to offend others by the obtrusion of 
one's personal concerns. By degrees, however, this is itself 
modified : it receives a specific colouring, imprinted on it by 
the rule of social intercourse ; self-restraint is felt to be right 
and proper less because its opposite may lead to unpleasant 
conflicts than because obtrusiveness offends against custom. 
Although the modified motive is not intrinsically so strong 
as the original desire, it is nevertheless more effective. The 
primary motive is not always present ; it gives way only too 
easily under the pressure of egoistic interests. The heroes 
of the Iliad and the Nibelungenlied, heroes as they are, not 
seldom lose all consideration for others, both in word and 
deed, when the storm of passion is upon them. But custom 
is ever on the alert, and the power of custom grows greater 
and greater the more it permeates individual habits of 
action. Then, when once the symbolic expressions of respect 
have found general acceptance among the rules of intercourse 
of social equals, there is nothing to prevent their further 
extension, in suitably moderated form, to intercourse with 
inferiors. The general motive of respect for our neighbour, 
supported as it is by the natural impulse to give some sign 
that we have noticed the mark of respect paid us, is enough 
to assure the spread of the custom. This is why the 
language of courtesy distinguishes the salutation from its 
acknowledgment. But as the salutation itself may consist 

I. Q 



226 Custom and the Moral Life [184-5 

of marks of respect of all degrees, from the highest down to 
the nod which symbolises the bare fact that we have noticed 
the presence of another, the acknowledgment of the saluta- 
tion by gesture must naturally be another salutation. 

The ethical significance of the forms of social intercourse 
is told with the tale of their development. It is twofold. On 
the one hand, good manners in all its forms — whether as 
personal dignity or as courtesy in intercourse with others — is 
an indication of moral ideas: an indication whose value 
increases the more evenly balanced are the two components 
of individual demeanour, the maintenance of one's own 
dignity and the repression of personal interests. It also 
moderates the tendency to exaggeration inherent in the 
forms of courtesy. Secondly, however, good manners is one 
of the most important moral results that the progress of 
civilisation brings with it. It has its source in motives whose 
intrinsic ethical value is very slight. But the change of effect 
into motive, the psychological lever that moves the whole 
development, has meant a constant gain in moral value. And 
this again has a most important consequence, as little foreseen 
as was the other, yet from the standpoint of objective con- 
sideration hardly to be overestimated. It is this : that while 
the rules of good manners and of social intercourse possess 
at first merely a formal significance, their repression of the 
outward signs of inconsiderate selfishness, and their constant 
emphasis of regard for others as the norm of social demeanour, 
give them a lasting control over the inward disposition. More 
urgently, because more unremittingly, than sermons on 
morality and disquisitions on the moral law, they exhort 
every one of us to leave selfishness and respect his neighbour's 
rights. 

Here, again, it is the religious factors that constitute the 
most important of all the aids to moral evolution, whether 
found within or without the sphere of morality itself The 



185-6] Forms of Society 227 

motives of utility, to which we are apt to ascribe the highest 
value when we are measuring events by the standard of our 
own reflection, remain at first completely in the background. 
If they are operative at all, it is in a different way from what 
we know, — mostly in the form of fear : fear of the fatal con- 
sequences of divine anger at the violation of ceremonial rules 
and religious commandments. Every expression of social 
life is pervaded, in a primitive age, by the thought of that 
other world, supersensible and yet sensibly conceived, upon 
which man must own his dependence alike in good and evil 
days. The endeavour to represent the ideal world by like- 
ness and symbol within the world of reality called forth men's 
sense of the beautiful, and in a later age made it serviceable 
for the purposes of every-day life. Community of religious 
worship awakened pleasure in a common life, and through 
the regard for others that this life made necessary placed a 
bridle upon the selfishness of the individual impulses. The 
feelings of veneration and humility, rooted in man's fear 
of the divine power, were transferred to men whose physical 
and mental greatness rendered them admirable; and later 
still, under the influence of common living and common 
work, gave birth to the purely human impulses of respect 
and kindliness. And with the development of these moral 
impulses a moral contents is gradually instilled into iki^ forms 
of human society. Originated by the pressure of physical 
necessity, the social forms of life, under the influence of the 
individual forms and side by side with them, have passed out 
of the pre-moral into the moral stage of the life-history of 
man. 

4. THE FORMS OF SOCIETY. 

(a) The Family and tlu Tribal Union. 

As the family is the smallest of the associations that make 
up human society, it is ordinarily supposed to be that of 



228 Custom and the Moral Life [186-7 

earliest origin, and the tribe or clan and state or nation are 
thought to have grown out of it, as if it had widened in 
concentric circles. And as the family union is rooted in the 
universal natural impulses, the sexual impulse and the impulse 
of parental love, the theory seems at first sight obvious 
enough. Nevertheless it is not borne out by the facts. The 
farther we trace the history of the family the less secure do 
its foundations become, the less evidence do we find of an 
indissoluble marriage and of its prime condition, abiding 
conjugal affection. If the counter- theory put forward by 
certain anthropologists — the theory that agamy, a state in 
which marriage and the family are unknown, is the natural 
condition of man — is too sweeping in its generalisation, still 
there can be no doubt that the significance of marriage is far 
outweighed in the earlier stages of civilisation by that of 
other forms of social connection, and that its moral value is 
consequently far from high. Nor is that to be wondered at 
if, as is hiG[hly probable, the polygamous form of marriage 
preceded monogamy} Far more influential than the family 
in primitive times, and of far higher value in ethical regard, 
was the tribal tmioit. Even at the present day its social 
significance is greater than that of marriage among many 
savage races, and its original importance for the civilised 
peoples is proved by numerous survivals in language and 
custom. 

Many theorists besides Hobbes, in constructing a philosophy 

^ The hypothesis of an original agamic state, first proposed by J. J. Bachofen 
{Das Muiterrecht^ 1 86 1, Preface), and adopted later by English and German 
investigators like Lubbock, McLennan, Post and others, is merely an auxiliary 
hypothesis, employed by Bachofen to explain the phenomena of the mother-right 
(see infra^ pp. 232 ff. ). Since these phenomena, as we shall see later, can easily 
be explained in another way, the hypothesis is of doubtful value, although its 
rejection must not be taken as a denial of the occurrence of savage or decivilised 
societies to which the institution of marriage is unknown. Cf, the evidence 
collected on the point by Lubbock, Origin of Civiiisatian, 1889, P- ^1 and 
Post, Die Geschiecktsgenossensckaft der Urzeity 1875, pp. 16 ff. For the forms 
assumed by the primitive family, cf, L. H. Morgan, Ancient Society y 1878, 
pp. 383 ff.,498ff. 



i87] Forms of Society 229 

of law and of the state, have assumed that man once lived 
in an isolated condition. But apart from a few individual 
aberrations, occurring as abnormal phenomena in a highly 
developed civilisation, the assumption finds absolutely no 
support in fact The state of war that Hobbes makes the 
precondition of human society is doubtless a true enough 
picture of man's primitive state; but the war was always a 
war of tribe with tribe, never of individual with individual. 
Tribal feeling not only blocks the way to a more compre- 
hensive organisation, the formation of a state or nation : it is 
equally an obstacle to the narrower organisation of the family, 
checking the growth of any family feeling. The tribe, the 
sole guarantor of the little that there is of law and order, 
lays exclusive claim in return to the service of its members — 
or rather of its men. Where physical strength is the quality 
most esteemed, the value set upon the woman is exceedingly 
small. True, the wife gradually takes a higher place in tribal 
estimation ; but she does so only for the reason that she is, 
so to say, the living embodiment of the blood- relation ship 
which binds the tribesmen together. In ethical regard, then, 
the tribe is the original association. Diverging lines of 
development lead from it to the narrower circle of the family 
and the wider circle of the state. 

We have two strong pieces of evidence for this original 
subordination of the family to the tribe : the absence of 
definite terms to designate the celebration of marriage in 
primitive languages, and the relatively late appearance of the 
religious ceremonies that accompany it. The common 
vocabulary of the Indo-European peoples contains a whole 
number of expressions for the various degrees of relationship. 
It has words not only for father, mother, brother, sister, son 
and daughter, but also, with very slight variations of mean- 
ing, for the more distant relationships of brother-in-law, 
father-in-law and mother-in-law, nephew and grandson.^ 

^ PiCT£T, Origines^ iii. pp. 28 £ 



230 Custom and the Moral Life [187-8 

This is in accordance with the well-known fact that among 
the lower races the remoter degrees of relationship are, as a 
rule, much more exactly distinguished and specialised than 
they are among civilised peoples.^ The distinction is 
evidently far more necessary in a time when the individual 
family is still undifferentiated from the wider association of 
which it forms a part. The phenomenon is, therefore, a clear 
indication of the preponderance of tribal over family feeling. 
On the other hand, the lack of words for the family itself, for 
the institution of marriage, the marriage contract, the wedding, 
etc., shows how slight a value was placed upon the customs 
relating to the family proper. Even the languages of the 
Indo-European group have no common words of the kind ; 
and though it would, of course, be wrong to conclude from 
this that marriage and the family life were altogether unknown 
to our ancestors, we may reasonably infer that their moral 
significance was comparatively small. The same thing is 
proved by the absence or meagreness of religious ceremonies 
in connection with the act of marriage. Varied and numerous 
as are the phenomena of custom that embody religious ideas, 
the sanctity of marriage begins only with the beginnings of 
civilisation. This evidence is all the more convincing since 
primitive man attaches the religious sanction to everything 
that appeals to him as possessed of any high degree of value: 
e.g., to many of the events of life that stand in close relation 
to the life of the family, — adoption, the entrance upon man- 
hood, etc. True, we find certain marriage customs (Gebrailclie) 
widely diffused in primitive societies, survivals of which have 
come down to a later civilisation. But these are one and all 
«(7;/-religious in character. The most important of them is 
the constantly recurring pretence of a fight for the bride, a 
reminder of the old time when a wife was seized by actual 

^ Cf. the instances collected by Lubbock, Origin of dvilisation^ 1889, PP* 
162 ff., and Morgan, op, cit,, pp. 419 ff. 



188-9] JPorms of Society 2^1 

violence. The fight for the wife is again a plain indication of 
the low estimation in which she was held. It is but rarely 
that she herself is actively concerned in the struggle; 
generally the battle is waged with her relatives, as whose 
property she is considered. The same idea is evidenced in 
a second series of marriage customs (BraucAe), where mar- 
riage is conceived of as a matter of purchase. The wife 
herself is here looked upon as the object of merchandise, 
and the husband buys her of her parents for a certain 
consideration.^ The reverse custom, which assigns to the 
daughter on her marriage a portion of the common family 
possessions, a dowry, appears to date from a much later age, 
when family feeling had become a more potent factor in social 
relations. It is this feeling, too, that has gradually brought 
marriage under the religious point of view, and accordingly 
surrounded the celebration of marriage with various cere- 
monial acts. But it is significant that the religious ceremonies 
are not a development from marriage itself, but transferred to 
it by way of certain external connections. 

Nothing, we may be sure, contributed more to the estab- 
lishment of the separate family union than life within a single 
dwelling. This could not become a matter of regular 
custom, however, until the transition had been made to the 
settled life of the agriculturist Under the new conditions 
it was natural, when the wife was led into the common 
dwelling, to call in her name upon the tutelary deities of the 
house, now to be her gods as well as her husband's. The 
marriage celebration thus becomes a festival, and one of its 
incidents a common meal with common sacrifice. In other 
words : when once the older custom of the fight for the bride 
has been replaced at the marriage celebration by a series of 
peaceful ceremonies, the religious character of the rite is 

^ Waitz, op, cit.f ii. p. iio ; v. p. 144. Post, Anfdn^ dcs Staats-und RcchtS" 
UbenSf 1878, pp. 31 ff. 



i^2 Custom ahd the Moral Life [189-^ 

assured. It is the duty of the wife, as mistress of the house 
during her husband's absence, to tend the hearth fire; and 
this means that it is she who provides the daily sacrifice, and 
takes care that no particular of the worship of the household 
gods shall be neglected. So woman rises to the dignity of 
priestess of the house : a change of position which is of the 
greatest importance both for the increase of her own estima- 
tion and for the ennobling of marriage. Now it is the wife 
whose voice is listened to in all household emergencies; the 
mother who solemnly conducts her daughter to the home of 
the chosen husband, or receives the son's bride at the threshold 
of the parental dwelling. This is why the ancient Germans, 
Greeks and Romans made the tutelary deities of the house- 
hold hearth goddesses and not gods. Hence, although 
marriage is not primarily religious in origin, the elevation of 
the marriage celebration to an act of religious significance 
gave to the conjugal relation a moral contents which it had 
not before possessed. 

{b) Mother-right and Father-right 

This direct result of the elevation of marriage into the 
circle of religious ideas is not its only consequence ; there 
is another, indirect effect, whose value in ethical regard is 
equally high. The new view of marriage serves to destroy 
certain primitive ideas which, though adequate to the 
morality of a ruder age, would nevertheless in the long run 
oppose the complete and final moralisation of human 
conduct. Two ideas in particular — the one arising from 
primitive mythological conceptions, and the other from 
primitive notions of law — give way before it. The first of 
them makes woman, the second man the centre of the family. 
The two would, therefore, appear to be mutually exclusive ; 
but as a matter of fact, thanks to that capacity for joining 
contradictories which is the universal prerogative of mytho- 



190-I] Forms of Society 233 

logical thinking, may persist side by side for a considerable 
length of time ; while their after-effects upon custom and 
moral conceptions are closely interwoven. We are not 
called upon to decide here whether the idea which sees in 
the mother the living embodiment of family unity is in all 
cases the older of the two, — so that (as many historians of 
civilisation have supposed) the alternative idea, which makes 
the father the centre of the family group, always follows it 
in time.^ It is enough for our present purpose to recognise 
the fact that the motives from which the two ideas arose 
are originally parallel factors in the shaping of society, 
though later on they are to some extent blended and 
reconciled, probably under the influence of the religious 
sanction which, as we have seen, came by slow d^rees to 
attach to the marriage rite. 

The forms of marriage and of family life are thus 
originally determined by two distinct sets of ideas. The 
first and (at any rate, where the two occur in the same 
society) the older of these has its root in the idea of blood- 
relationship. It is an universal view among primitive races, 
and a view which continued into the heroic age of the 
civilised peoples, that the child is the child of its mother. 
It is dependent on its father, where the father is regarded 
as the ruling head of the family, but is not related to him 
by blood. These ideas are evidently suggested by the 
natural circumstances of birth and early nourishment, and 
will be especially persistent in societies where the husband 
leads an unsettled life, and resigns to his wife the tasks of 
protecting the dwelling and caring for the children, — />., 
among hunting and fishing populations. The conditions 
are not greatly changed, however, when agriculture begins 

^ So especially Bachofen, whose merit it is to have been the first to direct 
attention to the customs and legal conceptions constituting what is called 
'mother-right.' Cf, also Jul. Lippert, GtschichU der FamilU^ 1884. MORGAN, 
op, cU,^ pp. 343 ft 



234 Custom and the Moral Life [191 

to take its place alongside of the more primitive occupations. 
Where the struggle for maintenance or the pleasure of an 
untrammelled existence calls the husband away from the 
family dwelling for any length of time, or with any d^ree 
of frequency, the bond between father and son cannot be 
very strong, even if the notion of a more settled life has 
already become familiar ; so that the natural idea of the 
blood-relationship of mother and child has full opportunity 
to set its imprint upon all the forms of social conduct 
Now the freer the position of the husband, and the less he 
is bound to his dwelling-place by any permanent obligation, 
the more easily may it happen (particularly if there is a 
scarcity of women) that several tribesmen share the same 
wife : so that we have those phenomena of polyandry which 
certain of the older anthropologists declared to be impossible 
a priori. Impossible they certainly are not ; they have 
their natural source in the ideas of mother-right At the 
same time, the greater physical strength of man furnishes 
an obvious reason for the greater rarity of a form of 
marriage which gives the woman precedence in the family 
life. Its limitation is due, therefore, to the same cause 
that stepped in at a very early period to arrest the develop- 
ment of the mother -right altogether, and replaced it by 
the father-right. 

There are other customs, likewise derived from the mother- 
right, but concerning the relation of parents and children 
and not that of husband and wife, which have acquired a 
more lasting significance. Since by the letter of the mother- 
right only the mother is related by blood to the children of 
the family, it follows that the development of regulations 
governing property and ownership will bring with it the 
principle of female succession. The line of descent is pre- 
served in the daughter ; the child inherits from its maternal 
uncle, not from its father. A last survival of these ideas, 



1 9 1-2] Forms of Society 235 

and one that continues far down the centuries into times 
where the prevailing law had an entirely different character, 
is the importance assigned by ancient Grermans, Greeks and 
Romans to the mother, as protectress of the household hearth, 
and the parent who ' gives away ' the son or daughter of the 
house at the marriage celebration. The dutiful affection 
which in later ages binds the son so closely to the mother 
seems to be an after-effect of these original customs. How 
high in religious as in social estimation the bond of blood- 
relationship that connects mother and child stands above 
the sanctity even of the marriage bond is vividly illustrated 
by the Orestes legend. The Furies pursue Orestes, the 
matricide ; they spare Clytemnestra, the murderess of her 
husband, because he whom she had slain was not related 
to her by blood. True, the legend takes as its motive of 
action the vengeance of the son for violation of the marriage 
vow, and so far holds its course among the ideas of a later 
age ; but the older view forms its religious background, and 
the conflict of the tragedy is also the clashing of the thoughts 
of two different epochs. 

The second group of ideas that has determined the 
development of the family, the ideas clustering round the 
father-right^ is rooted in very different conceptions. Origin- 
ally, at any rate, it is not the thought of blood-relationship 
that suggests them, but the thought of possession. When 
once personal property had begun to be accumulated it was 
inevitable that the husband, in virtue of superior strength 
and more active share in its acquisition, should take the 
upper hand. His power of disposition over all the family 
belongings, movables and immovables alike, was then 
naturally extended in a rude age that had no regard for 
the value of the personality to include the members of the 
family itself. Wife and children are now regarded as 
chattels, the property of the man, to be disposed of as he 



236 Custom and the Moral Life [192-3 

pleases. It is he who gives its life to the new-bom infant 
by taking it in his arms and claiming it as his property. 
Just as he offers the first-fruits of the field and the firstlings 
of his fiocks as a sacrifice to the gods, so does he offer his 
children ; child sacrifice, and especially the sacrifice of the 
first-born, forms a part of sacrificial worship. 

The customs which express this idea of the father's right 
to possession are much more widely diffused than are the 
survivals of the mother-right The Indo-European and 
Semitic races in particular accepted the father-right at a 
very early period. Of the various occupations followed in 
the lower stages of civilisation, that of nomadic pasturing 
is especially favourable both to the development of rules 
for the protection of property in general, and to the specific 
establishment of paternal authority. It binds a man more 
closely to his tent ; and the frequent struggles with hostile 
hordes make it easier for him to display and utilise his 
physical strength. But the nomadic life, in favouring a 
close union of families of the same descent, also conduces 
to the supremacy of the tribe over the single family. Above 
the direct authority of the father, therefore, stands that of 
the head of the family at large ; and the more firmly the 
patriarchal order is established, the greater is his power of 
disposition over family property, even to wives and children. 
When the transition is made to a settled manner of life, 
and the individual family separated out from the wider 
group, the regulative influence of the patriarchal order ceases, 
and the father-right of possession holds practically without 
restriction. The various changes that agricultural life brings 
with it all serve to strengthen the paternal authority. The 
more exact distinction of individual property increases each 
man's self-reliance; and the ownership of slaves accustoms 
him to the thought that he is lord even of life and limb 
within his own immediate circle. Polygamy is now a fore- 



193-4] Forms of Society 237 

gone conclusion. Justified from the standpoint of property 
and encouraged by slavery, it has at some time or other 
prevailed among all the peoples acknowledging the father- 
right 

{c) The Moral Aspect of Family Life. 

It was but very slowly that the wife raised herself from 
the menial position into which she had been forced by the 
husband's right of possession. So far as we can determine, 
several influences worked together to assure her final eleva- 
tion. The first step, which the Semitic peoples took earlier 
than the Aryans, consisted in the extension of the idea of 
relationship from the mother to the father. Both parents 
were thus placed on an equality as regards their relation 
to the children ; and this was a first step towards the acknow- 
ledgment of a certain legal equality as well. Not that very 
much was accomplished : for the idea of descent from the 
father, once arisen, might easily lead from the idea of mother- 
ri^^ht to the opposite extreme ; as it apparently did, in very 
early times, among the Egyptians. The second step was 
taken under pressure of necessity. The possession of women 
among the polygamous peoples soon became the exclusive 
privilege of wealth. Restriction to a single wife was the rule 
with the poorer classes. But, further, it was not long before 
the well-to-do of the community also found it advantageous 
to content themselves with one chief wife, and to take her 
handmaids as concubines : a restriction which, like polygamy 
itself, was naturally suggested by the institution of slavery. 
Finally, the more firmly the wife was able to establish her 
new-won rights — by her own merit and by the respect which 
she commanded from children and husband — the more surely 
were the concubines reduced, by slow degrees, to the level of 
mere servants : until at last Christianity came, with its effort 
to do away with even this difference between rich and poor. 
Permanent success was possible, of course, only because 



238 Custom and the Moral Life [194 

ancient civilisation itself had travelled far beyond the theory 
of possession, the source of the older father-right, and 
replaced it by the idea of mutual rights and duties. But 
the change of view had been brought about rather by force 
of circumstance, unwittingly, than with any distinct con- 
sciousness : witness, e.g.^ the relatively low esteem in which 
the marriage relation is held even by the philosophers of 
antiquity. Practical life, here as so often, outran theoretical 
construction. When once the exaggerated value set upon 
physical strength had given way to a recognition of the 
mental side of the personality, of the value of common 
sympathies and interests, the new views, for which society 
had been prepared by the separation of the individual family, 
could not fail to gain adherents : despite all Plato's attempts 
to call back the old patriarchal days of tribal government in 
his ideal picture of the state that was to be. 

The peculiar feature of the new view in ethical regard 
was its retention of both the older ideas, those of blood- 
relationship and possession, so modified and amplified that 
their blending involved no contradiction. The idea of 
blood -relationship was modified by extension to both 
parents alike ; the idea of property by the moral elevation 
of wife and children. The wife is now her husband's 
property only in the sense that her sympathies and 
interests are his. Such possession differs from possession 
in the material sense not only in value, but also and 
more especially in the fact that its dependence upon the 
personality makes it absolutely inalienable. At this point, 
further, the modified ideas are also amplified : their contents 
are enriched by the thought of duty. Duty was recognised, 
to a certain extent, by the old legal conceptions. When 
the father took the child in his arms he was taking upon 
himself, symbolically, the duty of bringing it up. But of 
our modern reciprocal duties — duties of husband to wife 



194-s] Forms of Society 239 

and of wife to husband, of parents to children and of 
children to parents — there was as yet no sign. They 
could not arise so long as the mother-right persisted ; the 
marriage bond was too slack and too easily severed. And 
the father-right was no less an obstacle ; its recognition 
of the rights of property was wholly one-sided ; submission 
was the first duty of the wife, while the husband was 
allowed complete freedom. Hence the idea of mutual duties 
on the part of husband and wife could not arise except 
from the consciousness of their common duties. The affec- 
tion of both parents for their children, and the respect of 
all the children for both their parents, gradually gave the 
marriage-relation a moral value of its own, aside from and 
independent of the duties of bringing up the children. 

The development of this deeper moralisation of family 
feeling, guided on the one hand by parental love and on 
the other by filial piety, can be traced with exceptional 
clearness in the history of Hellenic civilisation. The care 
lavished by parents upon their children, the parental pride 
in well-brought-up sons, the respect paid by the younger 
generation to parents and ancestors, the active faith that 
brothers and sisters show each other in times of danger 
and necessity, — these are the traits that Greek poetry 
and Greek history, from the earliest times, emphasise as 
most conducive to the highest social morality.^ Herodotus 
tells us that Solon, in his conversation with Croesus, extolled 
the Athenian Tellus as the happiest of mortals, because 
he had many and excellent children and grandchildren, 
all of whom outlived him. And far down into the Attic 
period the possession of children is looked upon as enviable 
good fortune, the lack of them as a serious affliction ; 
and the right bringing up of children, more especially of 
sons, as one of the first duties of parents, and a duty 
^ Cf, Leop. Schmidt, Ethikder Grieehen, iil pp. 97, 133 ff. 



240 Custom and the Moral Life [195-6 

the loyal fulfilment of which commands the greatest honour. 
The reverent affection of children towards their parents 
is continued beyond this life in the worship of the dead, 
neglect of which overwhelms the offender with obloquy 
and disgrace. Antilochus, who in the fight with Memnon 
stakes his own life for that of the veteran Nestor, and iEneas, 
who carries his father Anchises on his back from among 
the ruins of fallen Troy, are mythical prototypes of self- 
sacrificing filial affection. In Athens any man who struck 
his father or mother, or refused them food and shelter, 
forfeited the right of speech in the public assembly. On 
the other side, the ethical significance of marriage itself 
is comparatively slight ; although the extreme Spartan idea 
that its value lay merely in the production of children did 
not find general acceptance. In spite of many exceptions — 
we have, e,g,^ in the legends of Ulysses and Penelope and 
of Hector and Andromache instances of a more ideal form 
of the marriage relation — the wife is still held in but little 
estimation, as is plainly shown in the fact that friendship 
between men is held more sacred than the duties of married 
life. We have the classical example of this in Socrates, 
who in the hour of his death bids the weeping Xantippe 
depart, that she may not disturb the conversation of the 
men. 

The feeling of filial piety, which leads by slow degrees to 
the higher conception of the family, appears very con- 
spicuously in the reverence for dead ancestors, which is 
evidenced much more strongly in the earlier stages of 
civilisation than in the later. The relation of children to 
their parents here takes on a religious colouring, which 
cannot fail to react upon life itself, purifying and intensifying 
filial affection. Even to-day it is a familiar experience that 
those who have lately lost a relative by death are constantly 
expecting to meet him here or there in the places that he 



196-7] Forms of Society 241 

was wont to frequent; and in primitive times the idea that 
the dead continue among the living commands unquestioned 
belief. One of its most prevalent forms is the idea that the 
dead body, or the shade of the dead man, feels as he would 
have felt any honour or dishonour done him after death. 
The survivor holds converse with the dead man; furnishes 
him with the necessities of life ; honours him by festivals, to 
assure his favour and assistance, etc.^ In the legends of the 
heroic age burial is always spoken of as the right of the dead 
man, and its omission injures him as much as it injures the 
survivors who have neglected their duty. Priam offers a high 
ransom and imperils his own life to obtain from Achilles the 
dead body of his son Hector. Sacrifices are burned with 
the bodies of the dead, and prize contests and festivals 
accompany the burial of prominent men. But in course of 
time the original view, which regards these duties as essen- 
tially duties performed to the dead themselves, undergoes a 
very significant change. It is not the vengeance of the dead, 
but of the gods, the protectors of the dead man's peace, that 
is now feared. The spot where an unburied corpse lies is 
unhallowed ground. And the religious motive is quickly 
reinforced by considerations of morality. Death puts an 
end to every quarrel. The dead cannot defend themselves 
against the approach of evil ; so much the graver, then, is 
the crime of him who visits injury upon them. Hence while 
a ruder age spares the dead man from fear of his revenge, an 
age of more refinement honours him for the opposite reason, 
that he cannot now revenge his wrongs for himself. The 
originally selfish motive grows gradually unselfish, and the 
change takes place under the influence of the change in 
religious motives, whereby the primitive worship of the dead 
is transformed into the thought of a divine government of 

^ Cf. Waitz, op, cit,j ii. p. 193; iii. pp. 196 ff. Ratzrl, o/. cit., i. p. 341, 
etc Tylor, Printiiwe Culture^ 1 89 1, L pp. 426 ff. And sec supra^ pp. 78 ff. 

I. R 



242 Custom and the Moral Life [197-8 

the whole universe, including the dead with the living. Not 
that in this case either the motives are entirely unselfish ; 
fear — fear of the vengeance of the gods who protect the dead 
man's peace — still holds its own alongside of sympathy with 
defencelessness and filial affection for kindred. This mixture 
of feelings is portrayed by a master hand in Sophocles' 
Antigone, There can be no doubt that in her religious and 
moral attitude Antigone more nearly represents the feeling 
of the poet and of his time than that of the heroic age. 
The relation of the living to the dead here depicted cannot 
but suggest the relation of the host to the helpless fugitive, — 
who like the dead is conceived of as standing under the 
immediate protection of Zeus. And this conception itself is 
merely the mythological form in which man's moral repug- 
nance to an act of violence wrought upon a defenceless 
enemy finds its primitive expression. 

{d) The Development of the Feelings of Sympathy and of 

Filial Affection, 

In view of all these phenomena, it is hardly necessary 
to make the explicit statement that an adequate explanation 
of the development of the family can be found neither in the 
original sexual impulses, which man has in common with the 
animals, nor in the need of shelter, which presses more impera- 
tively upon him than upon the lower creation. The latter, in 
particular, must be considered as a result, something that has 
to be brought about by other causes, before it can itself 
operate as motive. Man's tendency towards companionships 
his liking for the comrade who resembles him in language, 
in appearance and in habits of life, represents a primitive 
extension of the feeling for self from self to the environment; 
and the tribal union, the consequence of this primitive social 
impulse, is therefore the oldest social organisation. The 
pleasure and pain felt by one's companion are one's own 



igg] Forms of Society 243 

emotions, grown objective: they are also powerful instru- 
ments in the awakening of one's own pleasure and pain. 
Now, when expression of emotion in another is felt as an 
objectified disturbance of one's own subjective state, the 
desire will necessarily arise to do for him what one would 
wish to have done for oneself; /.^., to increase his pleasure 
and lessen his pain. At this point, therefore, a new factor 
steps in to direct the development of the primitive tribal 
union. Sympathy impels a man to render active aid to his 
companions; the aid rendered enables them to attain their 
end ; and this success is the source of new and more inten- 
sive sympathetic feelings. Gratitude on the part of the 
beneficiary, and the pleasure of doing a kind action on the 
part of the benefactor, bind the two more firmly together. It 
is a truth of old-world experience, still true at the most 
advanced stage of civilisation, that the second of these 
emotions is stronger than the first. Gratitude is all too 
easily tainted by the envious feeling which the benefactor's 
superior position suggests ; but the consciousness of having 
successfully aided another to carry out his plan of life 
becomes a separate and pleasurable motive to action, 
intensifying the original feeling of sympathy with the fortunes 
of a comrade. This new motive enters with peculiar force 
into the relation ol parents and children. The more truly 
a father can say that his son's capacity is the work of his will, 
and the more truly a child is the creation of his parents — in 
a higher sense than by the mere fact of birth — by training and 
education, the more closely are they united by the bonds 
of mutual affection. But the development of this relation 
demands a prudence and foresight that come only with a 
considerable degfree of mental cultivation. Primitive man 
holds his comrade, who resembles him more nearly in 
physical strength and character of mind, to be of more con- 
sequence than the untried child or the veteran whose years 



244 Custom and the Moral Life [198-9 

unfit him for the business of life. Hence other motives are 
necessary, if care for the future and loyal memory of the past, 
the mainsprings of filial and parental love, are to arise. And 
other motives are at hand : the ideas of blood-relationship 
and of possession set their imprint upon the earliest forms of 
family life. They suggest the first beginnings of a family 
union at a time when other motives are entirely wanting. It 
is only after the establishment of the individual family by the 
combination of the two originally hostile motives of blood- 
relationship and of possession, and only after the accordance 
of a religious sanction to the whole round of household tasks 
and duties, that the secondary motives, the prime factors 
in the moral elevation of family life, are given a free field for 
operation. Hence that which a mature civilisation would 
take to be the first condition of development is shown to 
have been the last in the historical series of motives : and 
it is from the community of labour in the bringing up of 
children, which owes its origin to the influence of the 
secondary motives, that there finally arises the consciousness 
of mutual aid and benefit, which lifts the union of husband 
and wife from the sexual to the moral sphere, and thus 
enables it to achieve the noblest purpose of family life. 

We see, then, that the development of the family from the 
tribal union is the effect of the gradual differentiation of that 
original feeling of sympathy, in which a man is simply pro- 
jecting beyond himself the impulses of self-preservation and 
self-advantage. One of the most important instruments in 
the elevation of this feeling, and an instrument which actively 
co-operates with the conditions above described, is the con- 
tinual conflict in which it is involved with the original feeling 
for self. We have, again, only to appeal to legend, poetry 
and history for overwhelming evidence of the struggle. The 
maxim that it is better to suffer than to do an injustice is not 
innate in the human mind. Acceptance of it comes slowly 



I99-200] Forms of Society 245 

and laboriously, after prolonged conflict with the impulse to 
self-preservation. We must, however, again remind ourselves 
that no explanation of the fact that there was a conflict is 
possible, except on the hypothesis that the impulse to abate 
the sufferings and share the joys of one's fellow-man is rooted 
in an original endowment of the human mind. It may, 
perhaps, be that feeling for others grew more independent 
of selfish considerations only as, by slow degrees, a third 
motive — the interested desire to put one's fellow-man under 
obligation — was superinduced upon the little differentiated 
motives of sympathy and feeling for self For it might then 
happen that, having to choose between his own and his 
friend's suffering, a man should be persuaded by the new 
motive to decide against his own interest. But granted 
that the desire to put one's fellow-man under obligation had 
once led to this result, then the pleasure attending the act 
of mastery over self could become an independent motive, 
enabling the originally weaker impulse to gain the victory in 
the future without help from egoistic promptings. It is only 
by imagining some such struggle between different impulses 
that we can understand how motives, each of which taken 
alone is egoistic in tendency, can nevertheless produce a com- 
bined result that is free from egoistic taint The egoistic 
factors in the sum of motives have cancelled one another, so 
that only the purified impulse remains. We cannot expect, 
of course, that this shall henceforth show itself always, or 
even very frequently, in its purified form. 

The human mind is swayed at all times by a number of 
conflicting emotions, and the outcome of the conflict is 
not always the same. It will hardly ever happen, therefore, 
that a single impulse is so strongly predominant as wholly to 
suppress the effects of all the rest At the same time, the 
existence of this now unselfish motive, alongside of other 
and selfish promptings, is sufficiently proven by the fact that 



246 Custom and the Moral Life [200-1 

with the pr(^essive purification of the moral consdousness 
its supremacy in the control of conduct is more and more 
earnestly demanded 

The direct evidence of this origination of the moral 
impulses from germs which, though themselves non-moral, 
contain the promise of moral development is to be found 
in the manifold expressions of the moral consciousness, at 
different stages of its evolution, that have been preserved to 
us whether in history and poetry or in the explicit form of 
maxims of right living. The Homeric heroes are always 
ready to assist a comrade. Friend sacrifices strength and 
even life for friend, son for father, brother for brother. But 
the motives allied for these actions are one and all the 
motives of a naive egoism. To help a comrade is honour- 
able, but (and this is far more important) also useful ; for 
unless one is ready to help others, one has small prospect of 
finding help oneself in the hour of danger. The chief reason 
for avoiding injustice is to avoid reproach. It is truly a long 
step from these primitive conceptions — which though not 
wholly untouched by unselfish motives are still directed 
upon external ends, utility or distinction or good report — 
to the attitude of mind which finds expression in the phrase 
of Antigone in Sophocles' tragedy:^ "To join in love, not 
hatred, is my nature," or to that summed up in a verse of 
Menander's: "Life is not living for thyself alone."* But 
words like these would not be possible if the impulse to 
unselfish sacrifice were entirely foreign to the human heart, 
or were merely a veiled form of egoism. Any such 
hypothesis is guilty of a confusion of the primary con- 
ditions under which conduct originated with the actual 
motives to the performance of action : a confusion which 

' Antigone^ I. 523 : oihw, avt^0€i¥, dXXd ffv/i^CKeiw #0ur. 
' ToDr* itrrl t6 t^i^ /xii vtavrtfi i9fp fUmp, (Mbinbkb, Com, Graec, Fragm,^ iv. 
p. 356.) 



2oi] Forms of Society 247 

goes hand in hand with another and very common error, 
whereby the moral consciousness, despite the emphatic 
protest of the history of civilisation, is declared incapable 
of development, or at least the most important law of its 
development — the law of the unlimited formation of new 
motives from given effects — entirely overlooked. 

{i) The State and the Tribal Union, 

Aristotle remarks, and in so doing shows himself to be far 
in advance of the theories of society set forth in later times, 
that although the state is, as a matter of historical develop- 
ment, the last term in the series of human associations, the 
final and supreme community, it is nevertheless implicit in 
the relation of man to his natural environment, and therefore 
logically prior to the individual.^ In direct opposition to this 
view, the representatives of the contract-theory of modem 
natural law, however much they differ in other respects as to 
the aims and duties of the state, all agree in the hypothesis 
of a natural condition (* state of nature ') to which the state 
was unknown, and accordingly assume, tacitly or explicitly, 
that the state is not a natural association but an artificial 
creation. 

In this theory we have the reflection of a standpoint 
which, favoured by external circumstance, has for centuries 
dominated the minds of men : the standpoint of modern 
individualism. Individualism, as its name implies, regards 
the individual as the sole legitimate end of morality; in- 
ferring, because the state and the law and order of the 
state exist for the individual, that therefore they are the 
voluntary creation of ^^ individual. The idea is borne out 
by certain analogies, which are sufficiently impressive if 
attention is directed exclusively upon similarity of ultimate 
object, and not upon original causes and motives, (i) The 

> PolUus, i. 2. 



248 Custom and the Moral Life [201-2 

first of them emphasises the relationship between the state, 
on the one hand, and the * association ' or 'society ' or ' union/ 
founded for the pursuit of public or private aims, on the 
other. The objects of these organisations are oftentimes 
identical with that of the state ; they assume the care of 
certain public interests which would otherwise be looked 
after by the state. Public schools, the means of com- 
munication, religious worship and even public safety have 
at various times fallen within the scope of the voluntary 
association. Why then, it is urged, should not the state be 
regarded as a supreme and most comprehensive union of the 
same kind, devoted to the furtherance of all public aims that 
are indispensable (or at least highly beneficial) to the interest 
of the community at large ? And certainly, if we look only 
at the end ultimately attained, we cannot offer any very 
strong objection to the argument. The only question is 
whether it accords with the actual facts of historical 
development (2) The second analogy appeals to the fact 
that one state stands to another very much as individual 
citizen stands to individual citizen within the same state. 
But peace between different states is assured by treaties, i.e., 
by contracts; and the commercial relations obtaining between 
nations in time of peace, the legal protection afforded by 
one state to the citizens of another, etc., are also regulated 
in large part by some form of contract. If, then, the idea 
of the state is bounded below by that of the * association ' 
and above by that of the alliance of states, and both of 
these depend upon agreements and contracts, there is a very 
strong temptation to look at the state itself from the same 
point of view.^ 

* To indicate how important a part has been and still is played by these 
two analogies in theories of the state, I need only refer the reader to two 
arguments, dating from entirely different times, and written also from entirely 
different standpoints. The first is that of Thomas Hobbes {Di Cvuc^ cap. v.), 
the second that of R. voN MoHL {Encyklopadie. der Stoat swissenschaf ten , 2 Aufl., 



202-3] Forms of Society 249 

Really, however, the purpose subserved by a social institu- 
tion IS never more than one side of its essential character ; 
the other, and not less essential side, consists in the outward 
causes and inward motives which have led to its establish- 
ment ; causes and motives which, as a general rule, are far 
removed from the ultimate purpose, and show no approxima- 
tion to it until they are approaching the limit of their own 
activity. The ultimate origin of the state is as inaccessible 
to our observation to-day as that of the family. But while 
the naturalness of the sexual relation inclines us to r^ard 
the family as more primitive than it probably is, — or at any 
rate, than it is in the modern sense of a lifelong community 
of home and interests, — the objects aimed at by the state 
are so widely remote from the most immediate physical 
necessities of life that we are just as strongly inclined, at first 
sight, to accredit volition and reflection with a profound 
influence upon its first formation. The counter-argument 
from the social unions of animals is not a valid objection; for 
the forms of animal association that are at all permanent, 
and not (like the flocks of migratory birds) merely transitory 
in character, are based without exception upon the sexual 
relation. We may term them, if we will, enlai^ed families, 
but not states. The expression ' animal states ' contains one 
of those false analogies which are so frequent in animal 

§ 7, §§ I2ff.). Von Mohl, it is trae, does not yield unconditional acceptance to 
the old contract-theory : he admits that there are other H'ays besides that of 
contract in which a state may be formed ; €,g.^ by religious influence, by paternal 
authority, and by conquest. But he still thinks that the most legitimate mode of 
origination is by way of contract, and that the others have no abiding legal 
validity until ratified by the agreement of the citizens (or, to use Kant's 
expression, the "fiction of a contract"). Indeed, it is clear that if we identify 
the purpose of the state, as ordinarily understood, with the motives that were 
actually effective to produce it, the hypothesis of a contract is inevitable. The 
motives could not possibly have operated in any other way than through 
an agreement, whereby the individual gave up his originally unrestricted freedom 
for the constraining authority of the state. And this is precisely what the 
contract-theory, so ingeniously worked out by Hobbes, declares to have taken 
place. 



250 Custom and the Moral Life [203-4 

psychology, and whose effect sometimes extends beyond 
it and obscures our understanding of phases of human 
conduct^ 

In the absence of all facts which should serve as the 
point of departure for theory, two fictions have governed 
speculation concerning the development of the state. The 
one regards individuals as the elements which unite when 
a state is formed; the other looks upon \i[iQ family as the 
foundation upon which it grew up, We might parallel 
them with the antithesis of Q&r€i and 0ircre<, which Plato 
used long ago to express the divergence of opinion in 
regard to the origin of language. Where the individuals 
form themselves into a state directly for mutual protection, 
or for some other common purpose, the state has evidently 
arisen by arbitrary ordinance. This hypothesis leads at 
once, therefore, to the doctrine of the staite-contract. 
If, on the other hand, as the second theory holds, the 
family grows gradually of itself into a larger association, 
the development of the state is a natural development, and 
arbitrary regulation can have no more than a secondary 
influence upon its formation. 

The untenableness of the contract-theory is alone sufficient 
to give us a certain prejudice in favour of this second view. 
And the prejudice is not a little strengthened by the fact that 
the family-theory is by no means a mere fiction, as the 
contract-theory is, but finds distinct empirical support in the 
existence of patriarchal organisations of the state. Hence 
the origin of the state from the family, — the hypothesis which 
in ancient philosophy Aristotle set over against Plato's theory 
of its formation from an union of individuals, — is probably 
accepted at the present day by the great majority of those 
who are at all disposed to include the development of the 

^ Cf. the article on Animal Psychology ^ in my Essays, Leipdg, 1S85, 
pp. 186 ff. 



204-5] Forms of Society 251 

state in the natural development of society. But a closer 
examination sensibly reduces the weight of evidence which 
the theory obtains from the primitive patriarchal condition of 
civilised peoples, or from the organisation of the state among 
savage races to-day. On the one hand, we discover that the 
patriarchal constitution is very far from being the necessary 
and obvious beginning of the state that the adherents of the 
theory suppose it to be ; on the other, that the patriarchal 
organisations, where they occur, are not such as could have 
been derived from the individual family, as the theory 
requires. We have already seen (pp. 227 ff.) that the in- 
dividual family does not assume its permanent form until a 
later stage of development, when it is more sharply marked 
off from the sept and from the tribal union. But what are 
called 'patriarchal' conditions are phenomena of the older 
and undifferentiated form of the family. Since there is no 
fixed principle to limit the number of members of the sept, 
as there is to limit the individual family, it is only by 
pressure of external necessity, by the need of occupying 
new pasturage or remote hunting-grounds or distant arable 
land, that its division is brought about And when the 
division has occurred it naturally happens that the younger 
branch of the family still maintains connection with the 
older: a connection prompted by the consciousness of 
original kinship, and strengthened by the need of mutual 
protection. In such a case the leadership falls, as a matter 
of course, to the parent family, to which the younger offshoots 
are bound by the ties of filial affection and of religious obli- 
gation. These family alliances, which exist here and there 
to-day as they once existed universally among the tribes of 
the North American Indians, are obviously to be considered 
the first beginnings of the patriarchal manner of life.* Jewish 

^ WArrZy ^ ffir., iii. pp. 1 19 ff. Moroan , Ancimi Sodtiyt PP* 62 ff. Ratzel, 
ii. pp. 618 ff. 



252 Custom and the Moral Life [205 

history prior to the establishment of the kingdom depicts a 
similar stage in the social evolution of a nomadic people. 
The parting of Lx)t from Abraham (Gen. 13) is a typical 
example of the separation of kindred that must continually 
be forced upon a nomadic race by the external conditions 
of life. Many of the Arab tribes lived in like manner up 
to the coming of Mohammed ; and the religious and political 
movement which he inaugurated found a powerful support in 
the primitiveness of the form of society within which it ran 
its course.^ 

In view of the great importance which the sept must 
possess in the original tribal union, it is not improbable that 
patriarchal institutions, as here described, have played some 
part in the social development of all peoples, without exception. 
But in many cases they have been cut across by other and 
opposing influences at so early a period that their permanent 
effect upon social organisation has been very slight. Suppose, 
e,g,y that an event like the advent of Mohammed had occurred 
in prehistoric times. There would be absolutely no trace of 
the still more primitive patriarchal condition which his coming 
actually revolutionised ; and the state that he founded would 
consequently appear to have arisen, not by natural growth 
from the tribal union, but at once and in a moment, under the 
influence of a single powerful personality. How wide-reach- 
ing such an influence may be, especially if reinforced by 
religious motives, is sufficiently illustrated by the diffusion 
of Islam itself. Now we find as a matter of fact, among 
many primitive peoples at the present day, political con- 
ditions in which the influence of the sept seems to have 
entirely disappeared. In particular, wherever conflicts with 
neighbouring peoples have led to a closer union of several 
tribes which, though originally sprung from a common stock, 

^ Kremkr, GtschichU der kirrsckenden Idem des Islam, Leipcig, l868, 
pp. 309 ff. 



205-6] Farms of Society 253 

have had time to forget their kinship (e^.^ the despotic 
Negro states), or the internal struggles of heads of families 
and of parties have made a central authority essential 
{e,g,, many of the Polynesian islands), — in all such cases a 
monarchy has been set up, over and above the family 
alliances, sometimes allowing the older unions to persist 
under its general control, but sometimes abolishing their 
power in its own interest The despotic forms of govern- 
ment thus originated found just as much religious support 
as had been lent to patriarchal institutions. In the patri- 
archal state the religious sanction lay in an exaltation of the 
priestly functions universally assigned by custom to the head 
of the household. Under the monarchy the honour paid to 
the chief and his house, standing as they did above and 
apart from all the other associations of kindred within the 
community, rose to worship ; and myth, in obedience to this 
impulse, accorded the kingly family a divine descent And 
when subordinate chieftains or an aristocratic class intervened 
between the supreme ruler and the subject people, they too 
were naturally tinged with somewhat of his mythological 
glory ; the disposition of human power was interpreted as a 
divine regulation.^ 

(/) The Development of the Forms of the State. 

These phenomena, taken altc^ether, make it practically 
certain that the development of the state from the original 
tribal union must be referred to the intercrossing of two 
different conditions, (i) The one consists in the natural 
growth of the sept, and so leads to patriarchal institutions. 
These fall into a graded series, beginning with the village 
community (the original sept), rising from that to the district, 
and from that again to the nation, whose unity is only 

* Waitz, op, cit,, ii. pp. 126 ft, iv. pp. 165 ff. Ratzbl, i. pp. 157 ff., ii. 
pp. 193 ff. 



254 Custom and the Moral Life [ao6-7 

political, and consequently by no means so close as that 
of the earlier associations. The formation of a state pro- 
ceeds thus hy peaceful methods. But its progress is seldom 
entirely undisturbed : as a general rule, the consolidation 
of the higher terms of the series is assisted by factors 
belonging to the second mode of origination. (2) This is 
predominantly the warlike mode. Favoured by external 
circumstances, a personality that is distinguished from the 
common herd, whether by physical strength or by mental 
endown^ent, acquires unusual influence, and so attains to 
supremacy first of all within a particular tribal union, and 
then in many cases over a number of originally alien tribes. 
It is, of course, not impossible, but it is very improbable, 
that power of this kind — a personal power founded upon 
personal characteristics — should be achieved in times of 
peace. The motives best suited to produce such a result 
would be religious motives ; but even these would probably 
have no permanent effects unless reinforced by success in 
the aflairs of war and policy. We must, however, suppose 
that as the sovereignty of the individual is scarcely ever 
so complete as to destroy utterly, root and branch, the old 
tribal constitution ; and as this, in its turn, never has oppor- 
tunity to develope freely, without exposure to danger from 
outside ; — we must suppose that, under these circumstances, 
neither of the two modes of state formation is anywhere 
to be found entirely isolated from the other, but both sets 
of conditions are so commingled that we can speak at most 
of a preponderance of this or that factor in a particular 
instance. The two are seen, perhaps, in most perfect 
equilibrium among the Indo-European races. Even peoples 
so early separated as the Hindoos and the ancient Germans 
have practically the same organisation in this respect: a 
constitution graded into village community, district and 
tribe; in the lower terms of this series a practically un- 



207-8] Forms of Society 255 

changed patriarchal system; and then the consolidation 
of the tribe into an elective monarchy, instituted under 
stress of war, but limited by the power of the lesser chiefs. 
Finally, as a consequence of the great migrations, comes 
the union of several tribes under some one man who, by 
force of his personality, has usurped supreme authority.^ 
The monarchies of Greece in the heroic age show a similar 
combination of the two influences, with the balance in 
favour of the patriarchal element It is noteworthy that the 
memory of the patriarchal condition is preserved in langus^ 
even after its real significance has passed away. Homer 
calls his kings * shepherds of the people/ and likens the 
mild rule of Ulysses to that of a father. The Russian 
Tsar has this title at the present day; and its use is 
paralleled by the fact that the last survival of the patriarchal 
system is to be found in the constitution of the Sclavonic 
village.* 

This intercrossing of conditions leads to the most diverse 
forms of social evolution, the formation of the state varying 
with the special historical situation. In one case, as, e^.^ in 
India, the distinction of conquering race and subject popula- 
tion may be the determining factor. The race difference 
is carried over, as it were, to the classes formed within the 
conquering race itself, and so the influence of the monarchy 
lessened by its subordination to the law of class distinction. 
In others, as, e,g.^ in Greece and Rome, the mutual jealousy of 
the tribal chiefs leads to the overthrow of the monarchy and 
the foundation of an aristocratic commonwealth. Later, 
when public offices are more evenly distributed over the 
municipal burgess-roll, the aristocracy gradually gives way 
before the struggle of the masses for power ; and finally the 

' Cf, ZiMMBR, AUindisches Leben, pp. 158 fil Grimm, Dmtscki RHhtsalitr- 
tkumer^ pp. 229 fif. 
' Klbmm, AUgitimm CuUurgtsikkkti^ x. pp. 153E 



256 Custom and the Moral Life [ao8 

inevitable reaction from democracy ends in the establishment 
of a despotism. In others ^ain, as, e,g,^ among the Teutonic 
and Sclavonic peoples, the great migrations work towards 
the early consolidation of great empires. The conditions 
of migration, absolutely incompatible with the republican 
organisation of municipalities on the pattern of the Greek 
and Roman townships, lead to the formation of absolute 
monarchies, within which first of all individual associations, 
cities and classes, and later on the masses of the population 
seek to obtain power by a system of self-administration and 
representation. Now, different as the course of development 
is in these different cases, two features are common to all 
alike. The first consists in the state's tendency to expansion. 
The tendency may be carried too far, as, e,g.^ in the Roman 
empire and the empire of Charlemagne ; in which event the 
reaction follows, and the unwieldy mass, no longer adequate 
to the aims of statehood, breaks down by its own weight 
But despite all these disturbances, it is a general rule that the 
size of states has steadily increased. The second consists in 
the constantly growing effort to transcend the egoistic tenden- 
cies which arise at the arbitrary prompting of the individual 
will, and in the correlate of this, — the more and more explicit 
formulation of the aims of the state in terms of the cofnmon 
weal. Here again the trend of evolution meets with many 
an obstacle, and suffers, many a set-back. But its direction 
is clearly visible ; for while an earlier age did not hesitate to 
rank personal or dynastic or party interests as aims of the 
state, at a later time such heterogeneous motives, even if they 
are still effective, dare not openly avow themselves, but 
are forced to hide under the cloak of the common interest 
Both features, the tendency to expansion and the substitution 
of the general for the individual good, are as characteristic of 
the development of mental as they are of material civilisa- 
tion. The growth of the state, provided always that it is not 



2o8-9] Forms of Society 257 

so excessive as to imperil stability of organisation, means 
also the increased security of its members, and control 
of more abundant means for the satisfaction of their needs 
and the unfolding of their powers. It was only by a con- 
junction of especially favourable conditions that a state 
of the size of the Athenian Republic could attain even 
temporarily to that fulness of life which sets it, in the light of 
history, above the greater empires of antiquity. A recurrence 
of such conditions has become more and more impossible as 
communication and the means of communication between 
nations have increased. But legal protection and security 
against all kinds of danger are assured the more certainly by 
the size and power of the state, the more these blessings 
inure to the advantage of all its citizens, without respect 
of persons or classes. 

We thus see in the two ends of state development a law 
of social evolution which seems to find direct explanation 
in the objects attained by it Nevertheless, it would be 
altogether wrong to regard these objects as the causes of the 
development Convincing proof against such an hypothesis 
is furnished here, as before, by the fact that the earlier stages 
know nothing of those which shall come after them, and 
that consequently the objects achieved can never have 
been objects of conscious pursuit until they were in some 
measure actually attained. 

{g) The Feeling of Community in Nation and State, 

Two psychological forces or motives are at work, from the 
earliest times, in the formation of political institutions. The 
one is the feeling o{ filial affection, which passes beyond the 
family and the tribe to the larger associations that grow 
out of them; the other is the selfishness inherent in the 
ultimate element of every community, the individual. The 
aflectionate obedience which a son pays to his father is 

I. s 



258 Custom and the Moral Life [209-10 

extended to the chieftain of the tribe; and the chieftain, 
in virtue of his position as head of a sept, adds to the 
general feeling of sympathy which binds every man to his 
fellow-men something of the peculiar care that a father 
feels for his children. It may happen, owing to the pre- 
dominance of opposing factors, that these emotions are not 
very clearly evidenced, even where the patriarchal form 
of the tribal union has been preserved; but we have no 
reason on that account to question their primitiveness ; they 
are, like the primitive tribal feeling, ingrained in the nature 
of man, and the origination of the tribal union itself would 
be unintelligible without them. Moreover, it is evident that 
the various forms of selfish impulse to which they gradually 
give place all tend towards the breaking down of the 
primitive patriarchal form of association. The rivalry of 
selfish interests will naturally begin to show itself most 
plainly in cases where, owing to the growth of the com- 
munity, personal influence, the distinction won in battle or 
in the affairs of peace, determines the choice of the supreme 
ruler. It is a fact of extreme importance that under such 
conditions religious ideas are able for a long time to ward 
off the dangers that must follow from an unbridled struggle 
of egoistic impulses. A halo of divine honour rests upon 
the head of the ruler, and something of its reflected glory 
gilds his whole family. The hereditary succession of princes, 
the strongest bulwark of law and order in a rude society, 
is thus based upon a feeling of filial affection clothed in the 
religious form. The day comes, however, when the jealous 
demands of rival chiefs shake the established system — the 
system which has passed from the natural family union 
into the larger community — to its foundations. Hence it is 
the second point of departure in the formation of states, the 
power attained by the individual whether as the result of 
ability in war or of distinction in time of peace, which does 



2IO-II] Forms of Society 259 

most to kindle the strife of egoistic interests, — and would 
suffer the conflagration to rage more fiercely than it actually 
does, were not the feelings of filial affection developed by 
the conditions of the patriarchal state carried over from 
the old order to the new. For many a year to come they 
serve to check and counterbalance the destructive influences 
of unbridled selfishness. 

After the primitive feelings of filial affection have dis- 
appeared other feelings of like contents step in to fill their 
place. Thus the transition to agriculture and permanent 
dwelling-places gives birth to lave of homey which finds its 
religious expression in the worship of the household gods, 
and in which the affection felt for members of one's own 
sept is carried over to impersonal objects. The emotion 
deepens and broadens in proportion as the material goods 
increase which native soil and home life afford the house- 
holder. When Ulysses and Phoenix approach Achilles, who, 
angry at the injustice done him, is holding aloof from the 
battle of the Achaeans, and seek to win him back again, we 
can read between the lines of their admonition the silent re- 
proach that he has forsaken his comrades in the hour of need ; 
but of more weight in the eyes of the Homeric heroes than 
this appeal to tribal feeling is the assurance of rich presents. 
Nothing but a feeling which touches him as nearly and as 
strongly as his own injury, — sorrow for the friend slain and 
desire to revenge his death, — is able to efface the memory 
of personal mortification. In this instance we can see the 
unconscious action of a force that aids materially in the 
development of unselfish impulses : the compensation and 
self-regulation of egoistic tendencies. Egoism works its own 
undoing ; its effects are self-destructive. Achilles, harassing 
the Trojans from revenge, fights for the Greeks without any 
intention on his part to assist them. But since he gets fame 
and honour, not for this selfish motive, but for the help which 



26o Custom and the Moral Life [an 

he brings his comrades in their peril, result of action is 
gradually transformed to object of action, replacing the 
original motive in his own mind ; and the new motive 
once present, the old love of home and kindred is revived. 
At Athens, in the Periclcan age, a fit of pique like that 
of Achilles would have been held dishonourable in a hero ; 
and his friends, instead of promising him gifts, would have 
admonished him of his duty to the fatherland. At that time 
the aspiration for honour and distinction far outweighed 
ill general estimation all other and more selfish motives. 
True, this aspiration is still intrinsically egoistic ; but as the 
objects actually achieved all make solely for the common 
good, while the advantages secured by the agent are practi- 
cally all ideal, like posthumous fame, the egoism leads against 
its own nature to unselfish results. This inherent contradic- 
tion between ultimate end and original motive had aroused 
reflection in very early times ; as we see, e.g., in the 
constantly recurring controversy as to what form of state 
constitution is best suited to produce willingness to self- 
sacrifice on the part of the citizens.^ However divergent 
may be the answers to the question, all sides accept it as 
a self-evident fact that the determining factors are to be 
sought in egoistic motives. But when, in spite of this agree- 
ment, we find so radical a difference of standpoint that some 
give the preference to Sparta, on account of the hardship and 
unattractiveness of her mode of life, while others, like 
Pericles, award the palm to Athens on precisely contrary 
grounds, we cannot but suspect that divergence of opinion 
means unsoundness of underlying theory. As a matter of 
fact, it is surely as improbable as anything can well be that 
the soldier on the field of battle, before he gives his life for 
his country, considers with himself whether it would be worth 
while to live at home after loss of the most valuable things 
* L. SCHUIDT, Etkik dtr Grittken, ii. p. 330. 



.2] 



Forms of Society 



261 



he has in hfe, or more generally whether life there is worth 
the further living at all. At the same time, the fundamental 
thought in all these naive discussions cannot be controverted. 
No one sacrifices himself for others, or for the state to which 
he belongs, unless he is thereby seeking his own self-satisfac- 
tion. For the warriors of the heroic age the desirable things 
— aside from the direct pleasure in the exhibition of physical 
strength — were booty, power and fame ; and fame in its 
turn rested in large part upon the extreme valuation of 
physical strength. In an age of greater refinement all other 
motives were subordinate, at least in the nobler characters, to 
the aspiration after honour and fame; and the mea.sure of 
honour paid was governed by the value of individual conduct 
as promoting the common good. The practical ethics of this 
stage in social development follows the maxim: "Act un- 
selfishly from selfish motives." But the gradual fulfilment of 
the egoistic motives with a more ideal contents, and their 
final renunciation of all materiahstic aims, pave the way for a 
higher form of the moral law : " Act unselfishly from un- 
selfish motives," — i.e., for a coincidence of ultimate end and 
motive which lifts the whole realm of ends into a more ideal 
sphere. Naturally, it is true, the state is very largely limited 
to the prosecution of those material tasks which are only 
possible with community of law and community of labour. 
But from the ethical point of view, these tasks are transformed 
by slow degrees into means which have as their final end the 
establishment of an ideal moral community. 

This whole development would have been impos.sible had 
not unselfish impulses taken their place from the very first in 
the group of impelling forces. It is the unselfish impulses 
that are left behind after the compensation and self-regulation 
of the egoistic motives have taken place, and that, growing 
in power and varying in contents with the growth of the 
community itself, win the final victory over the fickle and 



262 Custom and the Moral Life [212-13 

self-contradictory tendencies of egoism. This does not mean, 
of course, that egoism is wholly rooted out. Egoistic im- 
pulses, whether furthering or opposing the common ends, 
constitute a factor in social developments whose influence is 
never entirely lacking. But they must bow to the ideas that 
have wrested their supremacy from them, to the view that state 
and law exist to protect the common possession of all the 
citizens. 

Of especial importance for the subordination of egoistic 
interests to common ends are the transformations of the 
primitive tribal feeling, — the root of all the impulses which 
gain the victory for unselfish motives in the struggle of con- 
flicting forces. When the civitas widened out into a state 
that embraced whole countries, (i) the old vivid consciousness 
of direct kinship necessarily died out. Its place as a correc- 
tive of centrifugal tendencies was taken by (2) that conscious- 
ness of membership in a powerful state which found such 
proud expression in the words Civis Romanus sum. And the 
rise of national literatures, in the beginning of the modern 
era, has introduced yet another intellectual force of the same 
order: (3) that of a common national consciousness, an 
expansion of the original tribal feeling, based like its proto- 
type upon community of language, custom and views of life. 
We are tempted to-day to reverse the causal relation of these 
factors. We are apt to regard a common language and 
common customs as a permanent possession, which pre- 
supposes the consciousness of common nationality. And 
this theory holds, in general, for the ancient world ; but it 
breaks down utterly when applied to the origin of the modem 
nationalities, which had to create their common language for 
themselves before they could look to it to furnish the basis of 
a common national consciousness. All the great national 
languages as we have them to-day have been worked out of 
an almost infinite number of dialects, some one of which has 



213-14] Forms of Society 263 

generally succeeded in triumphing over its rivals. But the 
common language once formed, the literature written in it 
becomes the most important means of diffusing a common 
view of life. Language has, therefore, had much more to do 
with the creation of the modern state than the reaction of 
the state upon language has had to do with sameness of 
speech. The few exceptions do not disprove the rule : they 
simply show that language is not able of itself, in the absence 
of other conditions, to produce political organisations of the 
extent of our modem states, but that it merely marks out the 
boundaries within which, the other conditions granted, a feel- 
ing of common nationality can arise to take the place of the 
tribal feeling of primitive times. The new feeling is richer 
than the old ; and the disproportion of contents increases, the 
higher the value set upon the intellectual goods whose acqui- 
sition is made possible by a community of language. The 
intensity of this value compensates for the absence of the 
multifarious personal relations which enter into the tribal and 
family feeling ; and the impersonal character of the national 
consciousness, called to life as it is by community of intellec- 
tual goods, further enhances the ethical value of the emotions 
which compose it, ridding them entirely of the egoistic 
factors that are never completely eliminated from the personal 
emotions. All the material and intellectual advantages which 
we owe to the soil on which we have grown up combine to 
form a total impression, whose intensity measures the inten- 
sity of the moral appreciations that bind us to the political 
community to which we belong by birth. The more perfectly 
these emotions have freed themselves of personal reference, 
the more intimately do they blend with a feeling of duty, 
which, like its associates, travels from a personal to an im- 
personal stage. Primitive man can be sympathetic, helpful, 
even self-sacrificing, when his comrade is in danger: he is 
incapable of an action whose results will not benefit someone 



264 Custom and the Moral Life [214-15 

of his acquaintance, still more of conduct that does not aim 
to assist any individual whatsoever. An Homeric hero is 
ready at any moment to stake his life for honour and fame ; 
but to defend a dangerous post unheeded, and with no pros- 
pect of distinction, — to do what every common soldier who 
is not a coward does to-day, — would perhaps have seemed in 
Homeric days to be mere folly. 

The reader has missed the meaning of the above dis- 
cussion if he sees in it an eulogy of the morality of modem 
times as compared with that of earlier ages. The question 
whether or not man as personality has been made better by 
civilisation is a question with which we are here in no way 
concerned ; it will occupy us in the following Chapter. Here 
we have been dealing, not with moral factSy but with moral 
ideas. The moral value of the personality is relative; it 
varies with the stage of development to which moral ideas 
have attained. The member of a modem civilised com- 
munity who pushed his interests with the na]fve and heedless 
egoism of the savage would be acting more immorally than 
the savage. Many an act which in the eyes of the Homeric 
heroes was permissible, or even commendable, appears repre- 
hensible to us to-day. Judgment of the moral value whether 
of the individual or of society depends not upon the absolute 
value of their disposition and action, but upon the relation of 
these to the stage of moral evolution already achieved. In 
this sense, and in this sense only, has our discussion shown 
that the development of moral ideas, despite much vacilla- 
tion and frequent intermption, has been upon the whole 
continuous, and that its course gives evidence at every point 
of the operation of laws that regulate mental occurrence. 
The superiority of the man of the present day over the man 
of an earlier age lies, therefore, not in the fact that he w, but 
in the fact that he can be better ; or, if we prefer to clothe 
the moral law in its imperative form, in the fact that he 



215] Forms of Society 265 

ought to be better than his predecessors. And, if anywhere, 
it is in the state^ amid the interaction of the countless mental 
forces upon which the maintenance and development of the 
state depend, that the is and the ought^ though they can 
never become wholly synonymous, may run their course 
most nearly side by side. This is the reason of the immense 
ethical significance which the development of state organisa- 
tions possesses for all the other forms of common life. The 
system of law imposed by the state upon its members is a 
code of norms in which fnorcU ideas find expression along 
with the other ends of statehood. By its means the moral 
laws that are most indispensable to the life of the community 
are brought to clearer consciousness, and the individual pro- 
tected against acts of violence which are also offences against 
the moral conscience. 

(Ji) The Origination of the Legal System, 

Law is the collective name for the regulations imposed by 
the state upon all the members of society that come under 
its authority, and voluntarily respected by it in its own 
relations to these members and its intercourse with other 
states. Hence it is self-evident that law cannot be prior in 
time to the state : an axiom which is violated by all those 
theories in the philosophy of law that base the state upon 
contract, i>., upon a legal transaction. As the state 
gradually arose from the original tribal union, so did the 
norms of law arise from those of custom. State and law 
are, therefore, closely-related products of the common life, 
and neither of them can, logically or chronologically, 
precede the other. 

Many mistaken ideas have been entertained with regard to 
the primitive condition of man ; but none is more erroneous 
than that which holds the state of nature to have been a state 
of unrestrained freedom. The savage is a slave of custom. 



266 Custom and the Moral Life [215-16 

His conduct is governed by the minutest rules in every 
department of life, — rules whose non-observance is generally 
regarded as an offence against religion, and visited with social 
contempt, proscription or acts of bodily violence.^ The 
fashions of self-adornment and of clothing, the manner of 
eating and a host of superstitious usages are determined by 
custom as strictly as (oftentimes, indeed, more strictly than) 
the holding of property or the pursuit of the murderer 
incumbent on the family of the murdered man. And this 
state of affairs continues long after the formation of the state 
has begun. The state, as we have seen, arose not so much 
from the necessity of enforcing the rules laid down by 
custom, as from the need of defence against the attacks 
of enemies ; a need which either occasioned a number of 
tribes of the same stock to unite together under one supreme 
head, or made it possible for a chieftain of warlike ability 
to wrest the supremacy from his fellow chiefs. It is natural, 
therefore, that a part of the power which custom gives the 
head of the family over the other members of it should 
devolve upon the supreme ruler of the state. When disputes 
break out between individual members of a tribe, the supreme 
ruler is now the obvious arbitrator, as a judge who can, 
if need be, compel respect for his decision by force. If 
the form of government evolved is a despotism, the power 
of the ruler extends beyond these limits : he becomes himself 
the representative of a legal system : though this, while it 
expresses his personal ideas, varies all too easily with the 
moods of an irresponsible egoism, and is adequate only 
in unusually fortunate cases to the requirement of an orderly 
and impartial administration of justice. Hence it is 
characteristic of despotic states, even among primitive 
peoples, that anarchical conditions recur and recur again 

* Cf. the list of fects bearing upon this point collected by Lubbock, Origin of 
Civilisation^ 1 889, pp. 448 ff. 



2x6-17] Forms of Society 267 

as if with a kind of uniformity.^ It is very different where 
the power of rival chieftains sets definite bounds to the 
power of the supreme ruler. Not only is a check placed 
upon his general influence over the various lesser communities 
within the state, but the custom soon grows up that in cases 
of dispute between individuals or septs concerning property 
or other legal rights the most prominent of the subordinate 
chiefs have a word to say in the decision. This is the 
condition of affairs, e,g.^ in the Hellenic monarchy which 
Homer describes to us. And the restriction of sovereignty 
may go a step further : important questions may be settled, 
after the princes have consulted together and declared their 
opinion, by the whole people; while, as a corollary from 
this extension of the power of the individual, the decision in 
questions of less general moment (more especially adjudica- 
tion as between individual contestants) is handed over to the 
lesser organisations of district or municipality. This was the 
rule, e.g.^ with the Teutonic races.* 

It is at this stage of social development that we come 
upon the formation of a system of law in the true sense 
of the word. Certain norms have been separated out from 
the main body of the rules of custom and placed under the 
direct protection of the state and its organs. Their recog- 
nition is secured partly by the ofHcial promulgation of 
instructions and judgments, and partly, where this is 
insufficient, by the employment of force. At the same 
time, the state makes acknowledgment that it is itself bound 
by the same rules as its citizens. Both these things are 
necessary for the establishment of a true system of law. 

* Waitz, Anthropologic der Naturoolker^ iL p. 147. 

' BucHHOLZ, Homerische Realien^ iL i, pp. 66 flf. Grimm, Deutsche 
Rechtsalterthiimer^ 2 Ausg., pp. 745 ff. It is true that the Homeric state was 
administered in part by the agora or popular assembly. But the people are called 
together only in doubtful cases and at the option of the princes, and their power 
is merely advisory. Cf. BucHHOLZ, op, cit., p, 24. 



268 Custom and the Moral Life [217-18 

Despotism represents only one side of it, the constraining 
power of the state over the individual ; it shows the legal 
system in its beginnings, not in its completed form. But 
even when law is well started on its development in these 
two directions, it is at first (as we might expect, remembering 
its origin from custom) unwritten law. The constant factors 
in it consist primarily of certain public institutions, which 
enable the individual to seek and find justice, and the state 
to maintain the integrity of the legal system that has won 
its acceptance. What is law and what not is largely deter- 
mined, in the individual case, by reference to existing 
customs. On the basis of many like cases there grows 
up a legal usage ; and this, when it has attained stability 
enough to serve as binding precedent, becomes the law of 
use and wont, common law. Finally, as the need gradually 
arises of giving explicit sanction to the common law regula- 
tions, of formulating in writing what has so far been carried 
in memory, we have statute law. This very soon developes 
a motive force of its own : on the one hand, it enlarges 
the borders of the provinces of law already recognised ; 
on the other, it creates new provinces, and so constantly 
widens the sphere of the l^jal system administered by the 
state. This latter tendency is comparatively little checked 
by the opposing tendencies which make for the removal of 
certain groups of interests from the jurisdiction of the state 
law. 

In these material extensions of the domain of law we can 
trace, far more plainly than in the history of its formal 
development outlined above, an uniformity which is of the 
highest significance from the ethical as well as from the legal 
standpoint The fact that the changes take place under the 
most varied conditions in practically the same order con- 
stitutes them one of the most important pieces of evidence 
to the original similarity of moral endowment or disposition. 



2 1 8] Forms of Society 269 

It is well known that Roman law developed the norms of 
private justice (more especially the rules that govern the 
holding and administration of property) with marvellous 
completeness; while it left public law and even the penal 
code in a fragmentary condition. The modems have travelled 
far beyond Roman law in these two respects : but there is 
still one department which has not received adequate codifica- 
tion, — international law. Thus the growth of the legal system 
among civilised peoples illustrates the working of a principle 
which seems to be universally applicable, the principle that 
the growth of law proceeds by slow d^^ees from the 
narrowest to the widest sphere of social life. Law begins 
with the regfulation of the conduct of individuals to one 
another, and extends from the individual to the family. 
At a later stage, all the constitutional and administrative 
machinery that had previously been matter for common law 
is made definite in the form of statute law. And, finally, 
treaties and alliances between states constitute the first 
beginnings of an international legal system. 

(J) The Punitive Power of the State. 

Penal law occupies a noteworthy place in the develop- 
ment of law in general. Its character assigns it both to 
the province of private law and to the wider domain of 
the law of the state; for crime is an attack upon the 
system of public law sanctioned by the state, while, in 
most cases at least, it also infringes the personal rights of the 
individual. Hence our sense of justice has in its develop- 
ment taken account of both aspects of criminal conduct 
What first attracts attention, however, is injury to the 
individual ; and crime is accordingly placed, in the primitive 
stages of social evolution, in the same cat^ory with disputes 
between individuals, — naturally enough, seeing that the most 
widespread crime of ancient times, murder, almost always 



270 Custom and the Moral Life [218-19 

follows from a personal quarrel. In those days the state 
entrusted its vengeance to the injured man or his kindred : 
its own part consisted, at the most, in effecting a speedy 
close of the family feud by the enforcement of certain 
limiting rules. 

The peculiar course here taken by legal evolution furnishes 
another instance of the primitive power of religious motives. 
With the holding and administration of property these 
motives have very little to do. It is, therefore, in regard to 
property that the need of a state sanction was first felt ; and 
the materials for it lay ready to hand in the original condi- 
tions of patriarchal or despotic government Even so primi- 
tive a matter as the division of the property which originally 
forms the common possession of a whole sept appears in the 
light of a legal procedure, primarily incumbent upon the head 
of the family, and later on, when his rights are transferred 
in large measure to a higher authority, devolving upon the 
representative of the supreme power. With criminal con- 
duct the case stands differently. In so far as it results in 
injury to other members of society, they are entitled to 
*take the law into their own hands.' The householder is 
free to take the life of the housebreaker whom he catches 
in the act of crime ; the kinsmen of the murdered man 
wreak blood-vengeance on the murderer, or, perhaps, are 
content to exact a ransom in its stead. But in so far as 
crime is an offence against religious and moral norms, its 
punishment is in the hands of the gods. Their anger strikes 
the guilty, either in this world or in the world to come. 
We must admit that the feeling of moral guilt comes only 
by very slow d^rees to attach to the transgressions which 
a more refined moral sense r^ards as especially heinous. 
Even in Homeric times it is only under aggravated circum- 
stances, e.g.^ when committed against a blood-relation, that 
murder is looked upon as a serious crime; though, on the 



2I9-20] Forms of Society 271 

other hand, lack of filial afTection, disregard of the duties 
owed to guest and suppliant, and perjury, while they are 
not exposed any more than murder to punishment by 
human hands, call forth a much severer condemnation, — 
obviously because they wear upon their foreheads the mark 
of religious delinquency. We can easily understand that an 
age hardened by constant fighting should view the crime of 
man-slaying with more lenient eyes. It was no sense of the 
moral guilt of murder, therefore, that obliged the state in 
course of time to take the sword of blood-revenge from 
individual hands and itself to assume exclusive right of 
punishment: the action was taken, as the historical origin 
of the penal code attests, simply in self-defence. The 
custom of blood-revenge was a continual menace to the 
public peace, and the possible expiation of the crime by 
weregild ox poena — also regulated in the first place by custom 
— a very insufficient safeguard. Hence the endeavour to 
control the play of forces in the state by aid of a more 
settled system had, of necessity, to make a beginning with 
the suppression of the feuds of blood-revenge that were 
raging between sept and sept. The state first of all took 
it upon itself to act as mediator — settling, what had formerly 
been a matter of private agreement, the amount in which 
the homicide was to be mulcted — and then gradually 
assumed the exclusive right of punishment Any attempt 
on the part of the individual to take the law once more 
into his own hands was thenceforth treated as a punish- 
able offence. 

We cannot doubt, then, what the origin of the words icoivfi 
and pcBfia indicates,^ that the state acquires its punitive power 
by redemption of the right of the individual to demand 
satisfaction for injury inflicted upon him. But its taking 
over by the state necessarily put an altered meaning upon 

> CURTIUS, Gri€ch, Etymobgk^ 5 Aafl, p. 472. 



272 Custom and the Moral Life [220-21 

punishment in general. The primary aim of the state in 
the prosecution of crime was the maintenance of its legal 
system ; the indemnification of those who might have been 
injured by the criminal act was a secondary matter. Hence 
the idea of punishment, and therefore the exercise of 
punitive power, were extended to meet every sort of 
offence against the law, however remote the question of 
compensation to individuals injured. And as, on the other 
hand, the duty of indemnification was plain in many cases 
where no real crime had been committed at all, punishment 
came by logical necessity to be entirely separated from what 
had originally called it into being. The state, with its 
punitive power, was now the true and lawful successor of 
religion in the infliction of penalty for crime committed ; but 
the duty of reimbursement for injury was still acknowledged, 
though as a matter for itself, independent of punishment 
proper. The two original factors that made conduct criminal 
were thus brought together again : the general element of 
moral guilt, and the special element of injury to an 
individual. In the primitive stages of law the former 
involves no damaging consequences within the civic com- 
munity, but the second alone calls for accommodation, — in 
which again, however, the state does not at first interfere; 
so that inadvertent and even justifiable homicide is ordinarily 
atoned for as fully and strictly as intentional murder. No 
step in the development of the idea of the state is more 
important for the moralisation of the objects upon which 
the state is directed than this assumption of punitive power. 
In lifting the right of punishment above the clash of personal 
interests, the state acknowledges for the first time that there 
are moral ends of statehood, ends which must be achieved 
for their own sake, and not on account of the injury or the 
advantage which accrues by their means to the individual or 
the majority. True, the state prosecutes crime as a violation 



22i] Forms of Society 273 

of the external moral law which it has to guard : on their 
subjective side the moral and religious results of criminal 
conduct lie always beyond the sphere of its authority. But 
the punishment of crime is a self-acknowledgment on the 
part of the state that it is a moral institution. The thought 
that this upholding of law and order is indispensable for the 
security of the individual is not of decisive moment, whether 
for the first origination of the punitive power or for its 
subsequent maintenance. Not for its origination ; for the 
motives here at work were derived from a still lower range 
of selfish interests ; the dominant idea was simply that of 
finding some form of compensation which should be less 
dangerous than individual revenge. And not for its main- 
tenance; for the important question when crime is to be 
punished is not the danger of the deed, but the guilt of 
the doer. On the other hand, this development of the 
punitive power of the state, which has run a good part 
of its course in the full light of history, furnishes a very 
striking illustration of the birth of new ends from what 
were originally heterogeneous motives. 

{k) The Origination of New Departments of Law, 

The example set by the state in its assumption of the 
punitive power was of consequence for the whole further 
development of the legal system. It was by this action that 
the state first came to a knowledge of its own essential 
nature as a community ordered by the moral law, and so 
entered upon the path which has led to the greater and 
greater extension of its sphere of activity. True, its duties 
were differently envisaged by the rationalism of the eighteenth 
century : the period of the * Enlightenment ' defined the 
ideal end of the legal system as the restriction of the 
authority of the state to the barest necessities of social life, 
the protection of person and property. But this view arose 



274 Custom and the Moral Life [221-2 

partly from the conditions of the time, the fear of irre- 
sponsible absolutism, and partly from a wrong understanding 
of the idea of freedom. It is not the individual will that 
can set bounds to despotic power, but a system of law 
administered by the state ; and the result will be the more 
surely accomplished the more this law permeates all the 
various departments of life. If the state, in an endeavour 
to avoid interference with individual freedom, withdraws its 
protection from the weaker members of society, there is every 
chance that the despotism of a great man will be replaced by 
the more intolerable despotism of little minds. Mistakes of 
this kind are harmless, or perhaps even salutary, so long as the 
danger of abuse of power by the rulers really outweighs the 
others. But the development of the legal system carries with 
it a refutation of the whole rationalistic standpoint We 
must notice, in the first place, its extension to two depart- 
ments with which it originally had nothing to do. On the 
one hand, it takes under its charge a great number of interests 
which can be adequately provided for neither by the individual 
nor by the private association. Thus there can be no doubt 
that the modem state has even now successfully competed 
with private enterprise in the provision and superintendence 
of the facilities of commercial intercourse; and how far 
development may proceed in the same direction in the future 
it is impossible to conjecture. On the other hand, the state 
has taken upon itself more and more to regulate the labour 
contracts entered into by its citizens; it recognises the duty 
of seeing that unjust advantage is not taken of the individual 
employ^. And to these two we may add, secondly, a third 
class of legal norms, which though of secondary derivation 
are not on that account of less importance : the regulations 
intended for the protection of the legal system itself. Here 
belong the ' constitutional ' laws, — laws especially formulated 
to assure the control of public finance and of government 



222-3] Forms of Society 275 

by representatives of the people ; the participation of these 
representatives in legislation ; the regulation of official 
administration, and more particularly that of ministers of 
state, by disciplinary laws and the principle of responsi- 
bility ; and, finally, the independence of the judicature. 

The distinguishing feature of this development is the 
conscious apprehension and systematic execution of determincUe 
purposes. The state is incomparably in advance of any 
other form of social institution as regards coincidence of 
motive and result in the attainment of certain of the good 
things of life. And this fact has lent support to the belief 
that we may predicate of the state, more truly than of any 
other association, a complete identity of final ends and 
original motives. Really, however, the belief is doubly 
erroneous. In the first place, the conscious prosecution of 
ends does not appear until a definite stage of development 
has been reached : at the time when the legal system is in 
its first beginnings the results attained far outrun, as a 
general rule, the intentions from which they took their 
source. And in the second place, the congruity of end 
and motive in the further course of development never goes 
beyond proximate ends, never extends to the remote ends 
derived from these, however logically and necessarily the 
ultimate results may seem to ensue when viewed in retro- 
spect by the student of history. When the state commuted 
blood-revenge into fine, its purpose was merely to arbitrate 
between disputing parties : consciousness of the political 
and moral significance of the punitive power came to it 
gradually, after it found that power in its possession. The 
princes who gathered about them for the first time repre- 
sentatives from the states that composed their empire, in 
order to obtain grants of money for war or for some other 
general purpose, took this initial step towards the foundation 
of a representative system without the least presentiment 



276 Custom and the Moral Life [223-4 

of the tremendous consequences that were to follow from 
their action. It is, no doubt, true that the modern state is 
no more the work of blind chance than the body of a 
living creature with all its many members is a mere chance 
aggregation of parts. But just as the mature organism is 
contained in the embryo, so is the germ of later political 
development concealed in the first beginnings of the state. 
The glance of retrospect can trace the uniformity that 
inheres in the whole process ; the eye that seeks to pierce 
the future can never see beyond the proximate stages of 
the coming development. Still, the horizon widens as the 
distance already travelled increases. There is one connection, 
in particular, in which history renders valuable service in 
dispelling our illusions. The human mind is always inclined 
to judge the unknown by the known. As regards the past, 
this error is being slowly corrected — though far more slowly 
than one is apt to think — by the growth of historical know- 
ledge. As regards the future, its refutation is impossible; 
and so the vast majority of mankind imagine that the 
future will in all essential respects be a copy of the present. 
Only the chosen few who have gained from history more 
than a mere knowledge of the facts are sensible that the 
changes to be brought forth by the future will not be less — 
nay, that they will in all probability be far greater — than 
those of the past, seeing that it is of the very nature of 
mental evolution continually to multiply the germs from 
which proceed new moral and intellectual developments. 

(/) The Ethical Significance of the Legal System, 

The fact that conscious anticipation of end attains in the 
life of the state to what is, at all events, a far higher level than 
that reached along other lines of social development con- 
stitutes one of the principal factors in the ethical significance 
of the state. Other social institutions — the family, commerce, 



224] Forms of Society 277 

the various forms of social intercourse, etc. — further the 
moral life rather by the results to which they lead than by 
the motives from which they originate. The state, on the 
other hand, is in all its parts the scene of activities directed 
upon a conscious end. The legal system, in particular, may 
be regarded as the realisation of a system of ends possessed 
either directly or indirectly (through the ideas of common 
moral work and of equal moral rights contained in the 
reference to the common weal) of the highest moral value. 
Hence the state is the supreme educator, the teacher of an 
intelligent and moral discharge of duty. In every sentence 
of the penal code there speaks the voice of an objective 
moral conscience ; the norms of private law are urgent 
exhortations to the exercise of just dealing and the observ- 
ance of contract ; the laws aiming at the protection of the 
legal system itself bring home to every citizen his duty 
toward the community. The ethical contents of the ordinary 
rules of custom is a hidden germ that comes to light only 
when stripped of its non-moral envelopes ; but in the legal 
system of the developed state the germ has forced its way 
to open expression, or, rather, is veiled so slightly. that the 
moral significance of the legal injunctions, though not 
explicitly formulated, is still their natural and obvious 
presupposition. If the veil is there, that is because the 
immediate end of legal norms is, of course, their practical 
consequence ; so that only the effect of the end needs to be 
expressed, and the motive to the end may be passed over in 
silence. No law in the penal code states why particular 
actions are punished ; no constitutional statute discusses the 
question why the enforcement of law, the conduct of govern- 
ment and the administration of justice are hedged round by 
certain safeguards. 

It follows, then, that the moral norms contained in the 
legal code arc there expressed not directly, but only indirectly. 



278 Custom and the Moral Life [224-5 

They tell us, as a general rule, not what is the aim of the 
legal system of the state, but by what measures it is to be 
administered and safeguarded. To the question what their 
moral contents really is, no cut-and-dried answer can be 
given : the contents changes with the development of the 
legal system itself. The mere fact that the state exists is an 
indication oT one thing and of one thing only, — community 
of life. This holds of all states alike, however imperfect 
their organisation. But the precise form that the community 
is to take raises a question which has been answered in very 
different ways by the different organisations of the state that 
have appeared in the course of history. There is, however, 
one feature which is common to the whole development, and 
which we may, therefore, probably regard as the determining 
factor : at any rate, it represents a tendency which is taking 
more and more definite form in the legal systems of the 
modern state, and which was gradually working its way to 
the front in the political theories of antiquity, though much 
obscured by national prejudices. It is the demand for 
equality before the law ; and behind it stands its obvious 
presupposition, the demand for equality of 7noral rights. It 
need hardly be said that neither the one nor the other implies 
the actual equality of men. On the contrary, it is just 
because natural endowment — more especially moral endow- 
ment — is so different, and because the postulate of the moral 
equality of all is therefore involved in a constant struggle 
with opposing forces, and particularly with the egoism which 
disregards the rights of others, that the task set to the 
system of law is extremely complicated, and capable of but 
very gradual accomplishment. But the way is paved for 
ultimate success in the fact that the state, through its laws 
and institutions, is expressing a conscious recognition of the 
duties owed by the individual to the community. The legal 
system of the state is the surest bulwark against selfishness. 



225-6] Forms of Society 279 

That selfishness has helped to build it up cannot be doubted ; 
for the resolution of the struggle of conflicting interests in a 
condition of approximate equilibrium may quite possibly 
satisfy the bare terms of the demand for equal rights. But 
that the struggle of interests has been the sole, or indeed 
the prime motive force in the achievement of the final result 
is an hypothesis that is psychologically impossible. The 
saying ex nihilo nihil fit holds in the realm of mind as 
certainly as in that of matter. Egoism can no more give 
birth to public spirit than hate can give birth to love. 
Such a thing can seem possible only from the standpoint 
of a theory of reflection, which credits mankind with a 
foreknowledge of ends that it neither now possesses nor 
ever has possessed. 

The motive which originally bends the will of the indi- 
vidual to a superior will is not any shrewd anticipation that 
to give up some small part of his own freedom will advan- 
tage him more than the unbridled struggle of selfish 
interests, but rather obedience to a command that is 
respected as divine, filial affection towards the head of the 
family, and loyalty to the strong men of the tribe. Only 
by slow degrees, as these feelings, in which is latent the 
germ of what will some day be public spirit, clash with all 
the selfish impulses in society, does the law emerge that 
conduct which opposes the ends of statehood must finally 
give way to conduct which furthers them, the harmful to 
the helpful ; and only after this result has actually occurred, 
in numberless separate instances, does a later stage of 
development attain to a knowledge of the ends heretofore 
pursued from other motives. And now the legal system 
has reached the point when laws are formulated with full 
consciousness of this end ; when the law pays back its 
debt with interest to the original unselfish impulses that 
gave the first promptings toward a social order, — raising 



28o Custom and the Moral Life [226-7 

higher and higher in popular esteem the blessings secured 
to every individual by the legal system. Now this popular 
estimate, like the whole moral life of man, is the resultant 
of two different factors. On the one hand, each of us 
appraises the moral aspect of community of life, from his 
own personal point of view, as something in which he 
himself takes satisfaction, and by which his individual 
efforts are assisted. On the other hand, however, each of 
us also regards the blessings secured by the legal system 
as valuable in virtue of their significance for everyone else, 
for humanity at large. This second side of the general 
estimate, originally pent up in the indefinite tribal feelings, 
is constantly widening its range and increasing its value. 
Reactions occur : the means which an advanced civilisation 
offers for the pursuit of egoistic interests are varied and 
abundant. But in the development of the consciousness of 
justice, as expressed in the legal system of the state, we 
have a power that can put an effectual veto upon the 
sinister theory which sees in these pernicious side-results 
the true index of the moral condition of the time. 

Finally, then, the common consciousness of the state 
paves the way for a last and most general form of moral 
union, which has no parallel in community of legal institu- 
tions, but just by reason of its independence of any such 
outward constraint possesses a peculiar importance. This 
is the union of humanity ; an union which has freed itself 
in ever increasing measure from the union of the tribe 
or the family or the state. Based upon kinship of common 
nature, without regard to the closer relation of common 
descent and common customs, it is the last and the most 
comprehensive of all the unions in which man is bound 
to his fellow-man. 



227] Humanistic Forms of Life 281 

5. THE HUMANISTIC FORMS OF LIFE. 

{d) The General Development of the Humanistic Feelings. 

Our modern ideas of humanity, and the feeling which 
they embody of love for all mankind, of 'philanthropy' 
in the literal sense, are utterly foreign to the savage mind. 
The emotions aroused , in primitive man by contact with 
a member of a strange tribe are little more than oscillations 
between the extremes of fear and contempt If any other 
feeling is set up, it is the feeling of sympathy. The sight 
of bodily pain is always and everywhere the most efficient 
means of awaking sympathy. In some cases, however, 
where it is not checked by other and more passionate 
motives, this sympathetic feeling may express itself, even 
on comparatively slight occasions, in good-natured services, 
hospitality and liberality.^ 

The idea of humanity was very imperfectly conceived by 
the moral consciousness of the civilised peoples of antiquity. 
The GretV philanthropia refers rather to the special relations 
obtaining between individuals who are bound to one another 
by definite obligations, the Latin hufnanitas rather to forms 
of outward behaviour in the intercourse of man with man, 
than to the attitude of mind which we designate to-day 
as humanity, — ^the love of all mankind. Here, as so often, 
the words have undergone a change of meaning in accord- 
ance with the changes of the moral consciousness. There 
are two features of ancient life in particular which show the 
limited outlook of primitive customs. The first is the 
absence of any humanistic r^ard for men of alien descent ; 
the second the recognition of the right of reprisals as 
governing individual intercourse, and the consequent ap- 
probation (within certain limits) of the emotions of revenge 

* For individual traits of this kind see Waitz, o/. ci/,, ii. p. 217 ; iii. p. 165 ; 
vL pp. 105 ff. 



282 Custom and the Moral Life [227-S 

and anger. Nevertheless, a gradual change of ideas was 
taking place even within the ancient civilisations, — largely 
at the incentive of poetry and philosophy, which exercised 
an unmistakable influence on the popular consciousness. 
Philosophy especially, instead of following the lead of public 
opinion, stood forth as guide and director on the path 
towards purer and more universalistic ideas of humanity. 

In the heroic age of Greece and Rome, as also of the 
Teutonic peoples, it was an axiomatic principle that cities 
and villages taken in war, with all that they contain, are 
the property of the conqueror. The men are put to death ; 
the women and children distributed along with the rest of 
the booty, and dragged into slavery. True, it was also held 
an honourable thing, especially among the Greeks, that 
moderation should be observed in the treatment of the 
vanquished ; but this behaviour was not a duty in any 
strict sense of the term, much less a right that could be 
claimed by the defeated enemy. Moderation redounds to 
the honour of the victor rather because of the self-possession 
which he thereby exhibits than because of the forbearance 
which he exercises ; while it is further accounted the part 
of the wise man, inasmuch as only he who shows mercy 
in the hour of success can count on forbearance if the 
fortune of war should turn against him. But mercy must 
never be carried so far that injustice suffered remains un- 
avenged. To accept insult or, still more, bodily violence, 
without retaliating in kind, is deemed a sign of dishonourable 
weakness down to far later times. Even the philosophers do 
not rise at their highest above the idea that to take no heed 
of little injuries is the mark of a great mind. Thus the 
explanation of the * nothing too much* {p,ifi\v ayav\ the 
highest maxim of the seven sages) put into the mouth 
of Chilon runs as follows: *If men revile thee, forgive, but 
if they entreat thee evilly, be avenged upon them.' And 



228-9] Humanistic Forms of Life 283 

the saying of Thales is very like it : * Bear with thy neigh- 
bour in small things.* Aristotle, too, thinks that quietly to 
allow oneself or the members of one's family to be ill-treated 
is a kind of slavery, although immoderation in anger is 
blameworthy.^ All these utterances are plainly in accord 
with the feeling of the national consciousness. On the other 
hand, Plato maintains, in quite general terms, that it is 
better to suffer injustice than to do it ; and the Stoic ethics 
of a later day repudiates anger unconditionally as an ignoble 
passion. The diversity of standpoint may be partially ex- 
plained from a change in the moral consciousness of the 
period ; but there can be no doubt that in their definition 
of praiseworthy conduct the Platonic and Stoic doctrines 
were far in advance of public opinion at the time of their 
promulgation. 

Without some change in the ideas of humanity, however, 
these doctrines would have been hardly possible. There 
were two principal causes that led up to it, friendship and 
hospitality^ — forms of personal relation, through which the 
more general humanistic idea gradually attained to maturity. 

(^) Friendship. 

The part played by friendship in the ancient world, and 
especially in Greece, is known to have been very large. 
It reaches its apotheosis in the legends of Theseus and 
Peirithous, Achilles and Patroclus, Orestes and Pylades.* 
This picture of the two friends, which recurs in the most 
various contexts of mythical history, is at once a copy and 
an exemplar of actual life. The restriction of friendship 
to two befriended characters reveals the intensity of a feeling 
which, in the Greek mind, stood higher than the ties of 
family. How universal was the esteem which the relation of 

^ Nichom. Ethics^ iv. ch. xi., xii 

• L. Schmidt, Etkik der Grieckm, ii. pp. 337 flf. 



284 Custom and the Moral Life [229-30 

friendship commanded we may gather from Aristotle's 
penetrating discussion of it; a discussion which is tinged 
with a quite unusual admixture of personal feeling, and 
whose realistic colouring stamps it unmistakably as a theory 
based upon the views of life prevalent at the time.^ Hence 
we can understand why Socrates advises his disciples to 
consult the oracle before they conclude a friendship : his 
desire by this means to give it a religious sanction is in 
full accord with its importance in popular estimation. The 
trait is all the more characteristic in a society where entrance 
into the marriage relation was practically independent of 
all religious reference. 

There can be no doubt that friendship owed a great part 
of the ideal value thus early set upon it to the fact that 
it, more than any other relation between man and man, is a 
matter of free choice. It is but comparatively seldom that 
marriage allows anything like the same freedom : class 
interests, questions of property and the influence of other 
wills are here of incomparably greater weight, especially at 
the lower stages of civilisation, than they are in the case of 
friendship; and the fact that the bond of friendship is so 
much more easily dissolved rather helps than hinders its 
idealisation. The friendship that finds no further support in 
mutual affection dies a natural death. Marriage, which at a 
very early date assumed the form of a legal relation, cannot 
be dissolved without at least an explicit declaration of the 
original contracting parties ; and the act of declaration is 
ordinarily hedged about with various external difficulties. 
As for motive, it is true that the Greeks, and some of 
the best Greeks, like Socrates and Aristotle, have not failed 
to emphasise the utility of friendship : comradeship in time 
of danger, and the mutual help that friends extend to 
each other on all sorts of occasions. But the high estimation 

* Xknophon, Memor,y ii. 4-6. Aristotle, Nuhom, Ethics^ viil and ix. 



230-I] Humanistic Forms of Life 285 

of friendship for its own sake, and the joy felt in the mere 
possession of a friend, aside from any such secondary con- 
siderations, are clear proof, even in the absence of an express 
avowal of the fact, that unselfish motives have always entered 
into the feeling of friendship. The utilitarian motives are 
the motives most easily discoverable, and therefore the 
motives that a first reflection always hits upon. The deeper- 
lying motives may, of course, be felt instinctively, and thus 
given an artistic presentation ; but so long as the under- 
standing, all too apt to read its own calculating reflection 
into the objects upon which it is directed, remains confined 
to mere external analysis of the effects of conduct, it has no 
standard whereby to measure them. Hence it is not without 
significance that the first philosophical attempt to grapple 
with the problem of friendship which has fully succeeded 
in transcending the earlier and more superficial standpoint — 
the discourse of love put into the mouth of Socrates in 
Plato's Phaedrus — takes on the poetic form. Even the more 
sober discussion of Aristotle, however, is very far from 
limiting itself to an appraisal of the material advantages 
of friendship; on the contrary, he declares that moral 
companionship in and for itself is the highest good. Hence 
he calls no friendship moral except that which obtains 
between friends of moral character. Such a friendship is 
the most effective means of furthering the moral growth 
of the individual. 

Although friendship, too, is generally confined within the 
bounds of social equality and similarity of occupation, still 
the range and freedom of the feelings that bind friend 
to friend constitute it the natural middle term between the 
association formed under the narrowest conditions of human 
life and the association founded upon the general relation- 
ship of man to man within the human race, — between the 
tribal union and humanity. Philia is the propaedeutic to 



286 Custom and the Moral Life [231 

philanthropia ; it teaches us to respect our fellow-man, not 
because he is our kinsman or because the habits of a 
common life demand it, but simply because he is a man. 
There is, however, one obstacle to the development of this 
last and highest phase of moral and social obligation which 
is not surmounted by friendship as such, and which 
long persisted as a bar to human progress: the natural 
repugnance that man feels towards ever)^hing strange, and 
more especially towards strangeness of speech and custom 
and outward appearance in his fellow-man. Here the 
mediating office of friendship is undertaken by another 
form of social relation, which in the earlier stages of 
civilisation does important service in preparing the way 
for the larger love of humanity, and later, when it has 
fulfilled its mission, either disappears or acquires an entirely 
different meaning. This relation is that of hospitality. 

(r) Hospitality {Gastfreundschaft), 

The combination of words in Gast-freund (guest-friend) 
is in itself indicative of a change in the moral consciousness 
of the centuries ; for the Gast {guest^ from the same 
root as the Latin kostis) is the enemy and the stranger 
both. Among the Romans hostis kept the meaning of 
enemy, and was sharply contrasted, as the distinction in 
idea grew plainer, with the hospes or guest on the one 
side, and the peregrinus, the stranger who is neither friend 
nor enemy, on the other. The Greeks continued to designate 
stranger, guest and host by the single word xenos^ which 
lost much of its original meaning as its application extended. 
The citizen, in the more primitive stages of society, can 
never play host to his fellow-citizen. But every house 
affords the homeless stranger, so long as he remains in it, 
the same shelter and protection that it gives its proper 
inmates. In the Greek world this high regard for hospitality 



231-2] Humanistic Forms of Life 287 

goes back to the very earliest times. ^ The Odyssey counts 
Ulysses' unrivalled hospitality to the coming and the 
departing guest as one of his chief virtues. It is a matter 
of duty to minister to the stranger's needs and show him 
honour, but to refrain from asking his name until all 
obligation towards him has been fulfilled. And in this we 
have much more than an outward respect for the feelings 
and personal wishes of the guest The self-restraint of the 
host, standing, as it does, in such striking contrast with 
the open speech of the heroic age, must be considered, 
further, as expressive of the idea that the relation of 
hospitality in itself, without regard to person or descent, 
is in some sort a guarantee of law and order. 

The development of this custom of hospitality, however, 
like that of so many others, shows clear traces of the 
influence of religious ideas. The person of the guest is 
sacred, because he is considered in the same light as the 
fugitive who sues for protection. Indeed, there is a sense 
in which the stranger who seeks the shelter of the house 
may be said to realise both the conditions under which 
the relation of suppliant and protector may arise: the 
personal^ since he confides himself unhesitatingly to the 
protection of the master of the house; and the religious^ 
since the house itself is consecrated ground, and a violation 
of the house-peace a religious crime. Injury to a guest 
is therefore classed in the same cat^ory with disregard 
of the right of protection enjoyed by the suppliant who 
takes refuge directly in the temple of a god. The con- 
nection between the two ideas has its source in the worship 
of the household gods, whose images sanctified the part 
of the house in which they were set up. A further bond of 
union between hospitality and religion lay in the admission of 

^ Cf, L. Schmidt, op, cU.t pp. 325 ff. Buchholz, ffomerische Realms ii. 2, 
pp. 38 if.; iii. 2, pp. 361 ff. 



288 Custom and the Moral Life [232-3 

the guest to the household meal : the common meal is, in 
ancient times, inseparable from the common sacrifice, which, 
as an expression of a common religious attitude, puts the 
stranger on an equality with the members of the family. 

In primitive times, this religious aspect of the idea of 
hospitality largely preponderates. Even in the Homeric 
poems, the violation of the guest-right is considered not so 
much as an injustice done the guest himself as a crime 
against the gods. But the personal bond knit under the 
auspices of these religious ideas could not fail in course of 
time to acquire a value of its own, and a value which steadily 
increased with the progress of civilisation and the growth 
of intercourse between tribe and tribe. The duty of 
hospitality now has a moral and social as well as a religious 
contents. In the general consciousness, it is true, the moral 
elements were probably never entirely separated from the 
religious ; but, at any rate, the separation was effected in 
individual minds. Otherwise, the philosophy of a later age 
could not have made universal hospitality a duty altogether 
apart from any religious reference. Moreover, intercourse 
was carried on for all manner of commercial purposes even 
in the most remote antiquity; and the gradual increase of 
commerce must have meant the increasing influence of 
practical motives to the exercise of hospitality as between 
the nations engaged in its pursuit^ 

Nevertheless, the idea of an universal humanity, so far 
as it existed in the ancient world, was the possession of 
individuals only. The national prejudices and egoistic 
interests of the popular consciousness were at all times 
strong enough to debar it from general recognition. It is 

* R. VON Jhering, Die Gastfreundschaft im Alterthum, In the Dmische 
Rundschau^ xiii., 1 887, pp. 357 ff. In speaking of the importance of commerce 
in this connection, Jhering accredits the Phccnicians with the greatest influence 
upon the development of hospitality, and brings up weighty evidence in support 
of his position : pp. 382 ff. 



233-4] Humanistic Forms of Life 289 

one of the indisputable services of Christianity to have 
made the humanistic idea, in the form of an ethical and 
religious requirement, the common property of its followers. 
The current changes in political and social conditions were 
all favourable to this humanistic tendency of Christianity. 
While the circumscribed limits of the ancient communities 
offered an insuperable obstacle to the free development 
of the feeling of humanity, the foundation of political 
oi^nisations of a far more comprehensive character 
necessarily produced an opposite effect, and imported a 
more humanistic contents into the feeling of statehood. 
Still, the course of development was exceedingly gradual. 
There were at first two different standpoints within 
Christianity itself: the narrower national or Jewish-Christian 
view, and the more liberal conception championed by the 
apostle Paul. And even when the broader view had 
won the day, the humanistic ideas embodied in the 
practical morality of Christianity suffered continual check 
from the ever more insistent belief that a special measure 
of the divine favour was the portion of all who accepted 
the Christian doctrine. ' This belief left room, perhaps, 
for sympathy with those of another faith ; but it furnished 
an equally valid pretext for the cruelty of religious perse- 
cutions. The consciousness of common faith was now 
as great a hindrance to the development of a larger 
humanity as the common tribal feeling had been in the 
earlier days of the race. But the surmounting of all those 
obstacles which national limitations of language and custom 
had opposed to the diffusion of humanistic ideas was and 
is so stupendous an achievement that these other short- 
comings, though perhaps for the time being worse than 
the evils which they superseded, must wholly disappear in 
the light of a more comprehensive survey. They simply 
illustrate the general principle that moral progress is 
L u 



290 Custom and the Moral Life [234-5 

always the resultant of opposing forces, so that occasional 
disturbance is inevitable. The course of development is 
then brought back to its original channel by the action 
of some new force : a factor of the sort in the modern world 
is the constant growth of intercourse between nations. 
Here, as elsewhere, it often happens that the ends actually 
attained in the course of history are subserved by motives 
of originally widely different aims. When hatred of the 
unbeliever, combined with aspiration after an indefinite ideal, 
and, on occasion, with many another motive that had but 
slight connection with the matter in hand, roused western 
Christendom to the enthusiasm of the Crusades, there was 
no one who foresaw that the enterprise would kindle a vital 
interest in the peoples and countries of the far East, 
an interest that should not die out until the great age of 
discovery had come. Intellectual interest thus took up and 
carried on the work begun by fanaticism ; and is followed, in 
its turn, by the efforts of an humanity that is slowly rising to 
the height of purely humanistic enthusiasm. This develop- 
ment moves step for step with the development of a new 
form of humanistic activity, which, originally derived from 
the old-world hospitality, has grown to be its true representa- 
tive in our modern civilisation, — charity. 

{d) Charity. 

In the earlier stages of social development, where there 
are no stereotyped differences of property to call forth the 
oppressive feeling of poverty, the growth of charity is 
entirely rudimentary. It is displayed, as the custom of 
hospitality shows, only by occasional and purely individual 
actions. But if at first there was no incentive to charity 
in the ancient world, we must declare also that when the 
incentives were both strong and abundant, the subjective 
conditions for the development of a more perfect humanity 



235] Humanistic Forms of Life 291 

were wholly lacking. In Rome, e.g,y it was not till the days 
of the empire, under the manifest influence of that feeling of 
personal responsibility for the common weal which autocracy 
always awakens in nobler natures, that any the most scanty 
provision was made for the poor or sick or helpless citizen. 
The best reigfns, those of Nerva and Trajan and Marcus 
Aurelius, are signalised by charitable measures. But there 
was need once more of religious motives, if the exercise 
of humanity was not to spend itself simply in occasional 
expressions of sympathy, if the sacrifice of self for others, 
without regard to difference of class or race, was to rise to 
the height of a moral duty, more binding upon man than 
any other save self-abasement in the presence of God 
himself. Humanity in this highest sense was brought into 
the world by Christianity. Although many of the features 
of Christianity had here also been anticipated in Judaism, 
still the Jewish virtue of compassion never shook off the 
chains of tribal feeling, while Christianity enjoins the love of 
all mankind as a duty which stands above all other duties, 
excepting only those toward God himself. 

The first form in which Christian charity finds expression 
is care of the sick. In the earliest Christian communities this 
ministration wears the guise of direct personal aid to one's 
neighbour in his afflictions ; but even in the first centuries it 
took on a more extended character, under stress of the vast 
diffusion of epidemics in the Eastern countries. The two most 
important features of the development are the establishment 
of houses for lepers, and the formation of religious societies 
whose members devoted their lives exclusively to nursing the 
sick. Charity is now losing its older individual character in 
two ways: first, by the equipment of institutions for the 
care of large numbers of infirm and afflicted persons ; and 
secondly, by the union of those who undertake or superintend 
the duties of nursing into corporations organised solely for 



292 Custom and the Moral Life [235-6 

this one purpose. It is very sigfnificant that for centuries long 
these charitable efforts were put in execution by the orders 
of religious knighthood^ brotherhoods recruited from the ranks 
of the noblest families. The word xenodocheum, the name 
given to the earliest public institutions for the care of the sick 
{cf. the English xenodochy\ still retains a trace of the origin 
of charity from the old-world duty of hospitality. 

The second great expression of Christian humanity is the 
establishment of missions. Ever since the more universalistic 
view of the Christian faith triumphed over the narrower 
Jewish conception, missions to the heathen have been among 
the most important of religious interests. And although the 
zealous missionary may usually have had the conversion 
of the heathen more at heart than the high work which 
he accomplishes for civilisation, the end attained must 
of necessity, here as elsewhere, ennoble the motives that 
prompted to its attainment, and the example of unselfish 
devotion to an ideal task produce the most profound effect 
When we hear to-day, as we sometimes do, that enthusiastic 
missionaries owe their success before everything else to the 
impression which unselfish discharge of duty cannot but 
make even upon barbarous natures, we gain some notion 
of the immense influence which the same example must have 
exercised in the past upon more highly endowed and still 
unspoiled peoples. 

The charitable orders of the Christian Middle Age paved 
the way for the gradual emergence of the forms which 
humanistic efforts are beginning to assume in modern society 
and will certainly assume still more overtly in the future. 
For the need and the impulses to its satisfaction are as yet 
very far from congruent. The more complex conditions of 
civilisation, and the exposure of the individual to greater 
turns of fortune, whether for good or ill, that follows in their 
train, have served to spread the evils of poverty and want at 



236-7] Humanistic Forms of Life i^^ 

the present day perhaps more widely than ever before ; while 
at the same time the diffusion of education has made the poor 
man more sensitive to his inferior position than was ever the 
case in the past Now it is one of the fairest privileges of 
individual ownership, as well as one of the weightiest reasons 
for its existence, that it affords free choice of charitable 
activity. In this way it not only renders possible a certain 
compensation of the differences in material prosperity that 
spring from the different conditions of life, but is also 
peculiarly adapted, by the personal form in which its acts 
of humanity are performed, to exert an ennobling influence 
upon the moral character of benefactor and beneficiary alike. 
But even now, and especially amid the distractions of life 
in large cities, the practice of personal charity has to contend 
with ever-increasing difficulties, while its lack of system leads 
inevitably to results which present a sharp contrast to the 
genuine effects of individual humanity. Hence the work 
that is adumbrated in the corporative charitable institutions 
of Christianity will without doubt be carried out in the 
future on a larger scale and in more constraining form by 
the state. The loss to the individual, when society rather 
than he himself is the fountain-head of humanistic endea- 
vour, will perhaps prove all the greater gain to the cause 
of humanity itself Our present system of administration 
has in various ways made a first beginning in the direction 
of these humanistic forms of social activity. And no man 
of insight can doubt that the most important problem of 
the present day, if full justice is to be done to the humanistic 
tasks that confront society, is the increase of the material 
and moral efficiency of the state. 



[237-8 



CHAPTER IV. 

THE CONDITIONS OF MORAL EVOLUTION IN 
SAVAGERY AND CIVILISATION. 

I. MAN AND NATURE. 

THAT the character of man, on its intellectual side, 
depends upon the influences exercised by his physical 
environment is so obvious an hypothesis, that philosophers 
and historians have often tried to demonstrate the moulding 
of national character by natural surroundings and its effects 
upon the history of the race. That man's moral character 
is also subjected to these physical influences cannot be 
disputed, although there may very possibly be divergence 
of opinion as to their actual importance. From the stand- 
point of morals, however, they evidently fall into two 
essentially different groups. The first is objective : it consists 
in the physical conditions under which human life is set by 
nature. The second is subjective: it consists in the effects 
which the contemplation of nature produces upon the human 
mind. The natural conditions of life have the ascendency 
in the lower stages of material civilisation and mental 
culture : their influence gradually diminishes as the means 
increase whereby human inventiveness renders life more 
secure from external dangers, and less dependent upon 
favourable or unfavourable circumstances of soil and climate. 
The mental effects, on the other hand, the direct impression 
made upon the human feelings by the contemplation of 
nature, increase in proportion as mental development and 

294 



238] Man and Nature 295 

training increase susceptibility. So it comes about that the 
second group of conditions to some extent replaces the first. 
Nature appeals to primitive man almost wholly through her 
influence upon his material welfare ; she can make further 
appeal to the civilised man through the medium of his 
aesthetic sense. 

{a) The Natural Conditions of Life, 

Nature's earliest and most palpable influence over human 
life lies in the demands that she makes upon the physical 
and mental capacity of the individual, by placing him under 
the necessity of working for his bare livelihood. No curse 
could ever have proved itself so rich a blessing as the curse 
recorded in the biblical story of creation : " In the sweat 
of thy brow shalt thou eat thy bread." Man has grown 
to be a moral being ; and he owes this growth not least to the 
fact that for him the earth is not a paradise. If objective 
proof of this truth be required, it is strikingly afforded by 
the fact that wherever man can support life without labour 
on the natural fruits of the soil, and climate does not make 
clothing and shelter an urgent necessity, — as, ^.^., in many 
of the South Sea islands, — morality lags far behind all the 
other forces and factors that make for civilisation. The 
virtues of sympathy and neighbourly kindness have arisen 
always where the stem necessity of existence makes every 
man the rival and competitor of every other, not where 
nature gives each one an abundance of all that he requires. 
Moreover, the special trend of moral civilisation under 
different circumstances gives clear evidence of the influences 
exerted by physical environment on the conduct of life. 

The lowest stage of primitive savagery is the stage of 
hunting: the life once led by all, and still led by some of 
the indigenous tribes of North America. The hunter has 
probably no permanent dwelling-place; he kills the game 



296 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [238-9 

that supports his life when and where he can find it. What- 
ever comes into his possession serves only to meet the need 
of the moment ; the whole character of his life inhibits care 
for the future. The skin of the slaughtered animal affords 
a scanty clothing ; the wood of the forests through which the 
chase leads furnishes the rude hut to serve as shelter. The 
dangers encountered in the constant war with animals, and 
the war with strange tribes that so easily grows out of it, 
build up the feeling of loyalty to comrades; and with their 
natural consequences of hardihood, of indifference to pain 
and peril, make instances of heroic sacrifice of not unusual 
occurrence. The habit of solitary watching, the long hours 
in ambush for the game, steel the hunter in perseverance, 
and at the same time indispose him for noise and chatter 
in his intercourse with others. Endurance, constancy, loyalty, 
reserve, equanimity under the vicissitudes of fortune, — these 
are, therefore, the moral characteristics which nature stamps 
upon man at the lowest stage of civilisation. 

One step higher stands the nomadic life. The nomad is 
condemned, even more irrevocably than the hunter, to lead 
a wandering existence without any permanent home ; 
pasturage for the herds that furnish his means of livelihood 
is more quickly exhausted than the game-supply of the 
hunting-ground that surrounds the hut of the hunter. Hence 
it is the broad steppe-lands, like those roamed over by the 
nomadic Mongolian tribes of Central Asia, that seem to 
be foreordained by nature for the nomad life. But nomadism 
also means a greater permanence of common life and a 
closer union of each man to his fellows, while it further 
leads to an expansion of commercial and social relations. 
And this development naturally has its moral side. The 
social virtues most in esteem are loyalty towards the tribe 
and, more especially, obedience to its chiefs : as compared 
with these, the more individual moral qualities of the pre- 



239-40] Man and Nature 2gy 

ceding stage, close discretion and heroism in misfortune, 
retreat into the background. At the same time, however, 
cunning, craft, fraud and falsehood appear : the never-failing 
blemishes upon peaceful intercourse between different peoples, 
in part of alien descent 

The third and highest stage of this primitive evolution, 
as determined by the influences of natural environment, is 
reached with the beginnings of agriculture. Work is now 
for the first time strictly regulated and persistent. At the 
same time, man is chained to the plot of ground that he 
cultivates. The motives to the performance of social duties 
are strengthened by a more highly perfected and more stable 
organisation of the state, and a better regulation of inter- 
course. True, the motives to much that is reprehensible are 
also reinforced. Where the domestication of animals for 
agricultural purposes is unknown, and man is entirely de- 
pendent on his own exertions for the cultivation of the soil, 
as among the peoples of the interior of Africa, the severity 
of the labour is a strong incentive to a distinction of classes, 
which puts the worker under the yoke of the beast of burden 
and makes the master a capricious despot. If the habit of 
using a fellow-man as a mere animal is in some measure 
checked by tribal feeling, the prisoner taken in war or the 
slave purchased from out of another tribe is all the more apt 
to be regarded as little else than a beast of burden, whose 
strength the master is justified in exploiting for his own 
purposes. Hence it is that slavery, which is unknown to the 
hunter and the nomad, is everywhere a concomitant of the 
beginnings of agriculture.^ The cradle of slavery, so fer 
as it exists at the present day, is still the interior of Africa 
with its primitive methods of agriculture. The idea of the 
Greeks and Romans, that any occupation whatsoever in- 

^ See above, pp. 196 f., for the discussion of slavery in its social significance, 
which supplements the present argument. 



298 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [240-1 

volving the labour prescribed by the necessities of life was 
unworthy of a free man, sprang from the same source. So 
firmly rooted was it in the moral consciousness of antiquity, 
that even the philosophers who paved the way for a larger 
humanity in the moral view of life — even Plato and Aristotle 
— declared slavery to be a natural, and, therefore, an ethically 
justifiable institution. 

There can be no doubt that from our modem standpoint 
we are right in censuring these opinions. At the same time 
there is nothing in the history of ethics better calculated to 
impress the fact upon us that in the general course of evolu- 
tion moral good is attainable only at the cost of temporary 
moral evils. It may be said that the ethics of the Greek 
world was foredoomed to imperfection, just because its whole 
fabric presupposed the antithesis of free work and slave- 
labour. But then it must be added that all the great in- 
tellectual achievements of ancient civilisation, everything, 
that is, that our own moral view of life owes to it, could 
hardly have been accomplished save under those external con- 
ditions which, as a matter of fact, brought them to the birth. 

{])) The Development of the Feeling for Nature. 

We have seen that man in his outward life is dependent 
upon nature, employing the means which she affords him 
and exposed to the dangers with which she threatens him. 
His inner world of ideas is similarly determined by natural 
environment. The influence of his physical surroundings 
is woven in with his whole mental being, as it finds deliver- 
ance in myth, religion and custom, and in cesthetic require- 
ments. But here, too, the influence of nature is not 
immutable. The same mountains and rivers and forests 
lie before the modem European that lay before his ancestors 
thousands of years ago ; but the effect which they produce 
is very different. In this change there is reflected a change 



241-2] Man and Nature 299 

in man's cesthetic view of the world, itself connected with 
a change in his moral apprehension of life.^ 

It has often been affirmed that ^^ feeling for nature is a 
product of modern civilisation, or at least that it did not 
arise while the life of the ancient world was in its prime, 
but like so many other anticipations of our modem attitude 
to things appeared only when the time of decadence had 
begun. Primitive man, it is urged, stands in this regard 
to the man of the present day just as the countryman 
who now passes indifferently by the beauties of a landscape 
stands to the educated townsman, who finds in them a 
source of keen enjoyment. But there is really no com- 
parison between the cases. We must never forget that the 
form of thought in which the primitive feeling for nature 
manifests itself, mythological thought, is entirely lost to us. 
It is from the mythological form of the feeling, which 
reaches back to the first beginnings of human civilisation, 
that the aesthetic feeling for nature with which we are 
ourselves familiar has been slowly and gradually evolved. 
The most important precondition of the development was 
the transformation of the nature-gods into moral powera: 
a transformation which resulted in their separation from 
nature and envisagement as powers, invisible, indeed, but 
omnipresent in the decrees of destiny and in the voice of 
conscience. In proportion as nature now lost her immediate 
and living reality did the human mind possess itself of her, 
to find its own subjective states reflected in her features. 
The impulse to project one's own feelings into the outside 
world, and then to let them react again upon one, is, therefore, 
characteristic of the whole development. The only difference 
is that in the mythological stage the impulse is unconscious, 
so that the feelings which stir man's soul in nature seem 

' Cf, A. BiBSB, Dii Entwicklung dts NaturgefUkls bei dm Gruchen ttnd 
Romem, 1882-S4. DU Eniwickluni; dts NcUurgefuhls im MUulalUr und in der 
NsuMtU. 1888. 



300 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [242 

to come forth from her, strange yet strangely familiar 
births of nature herself. When the magic of these ideas 
has slowly passed away, and their living reality paled, still 
the kinship of the emotions set up by certain phenomena 
of nature with moods arising from within, at the mind's 
own instance, cannot fail to win acknowledgment: nay, 
must appear all the more plainly now that it has shaken 
off the constraint of definite mythological personification. 
Nature dowers the poet with a wealth of simile and meta- 
phor, sensible embodiments of his own emotion ; each 
separate object taking on a new shift of meaning as his 
mood changes with the moment and the details of the 
scene group and regroup themselves before his ^y^s. Thus 
the aesthetic feeling for nature breaks free of the fetters 
laid upon it by mythological thought, constantly to create 
at its own sovereign pleasure myths which pass with the 
passing of the end that they have served and give place 
to other fancies. Now the impression that nature makes 
on man at each of these stages has its ethical aspect, and 
the development of these moral effects runs parallel with 
the development of the feelings that underlie them. 

In the mythological stage of the feeling for nature, natural 
phenomena are simply the objectification of subjective 
impulses. The immutable regularity of natural processes 
forms a powerful stimulus to a similarly regular disposition 
of the affairs of human life, and so reinforces the tendency 
to regularity of living that inheres in the physical constitu- 
tion of man (cf supra^ p. 172). External constraint is thus 
conjoined with an inner need of the mind, which finds in its 
own activity a resemblance to the processes of the natural 
world. The divinity which man had read into nature, he 
now takes from her; the acts of the gods are merely 
prototypes of human conduct. The order of nature becomes 



243] Man and Nature 301 

the type of ordered human custom ; so that the idea of law^ 
which unfolds its true meaning in human society, and 
whose reference back again to nature is the product of later 
reflection, is yet derived in the first instance from nature 
herself. This connection of the natural order with the 
ordinances of human custom is brought out with especial 
clearness in the religious theory of the Hindoos. Countless 
acts of symbolism express the feeling of a law and order 
that bind heaven and earth together. And to the living 
reality of a nature-feeling that sees in the elements and 
constellations powers of like nature with the mind of man, 
the earthly order and the heavenly are in essence one and 
the same. The sacrificial ritual, more especially, is modelled 
on the heavenly phenomena, in which the uniformity of 
nature is so deeply printed ; and then the steps in the 
sacrifice itself relegated to the heavens, and in the new light 
of natural processes constituted all the more inviolable laws 
of human conduct. Thus Agfni and Soma, the sacrificial fire 
and the sacrificial draught, are at first copies of the nature- 
gods ; while later the heavenly phenomena in which these 
nature-gods were embodied are contemplated and reverenced 
as acts of worship performed by the gods themselves.^ 

While these ideas, which find in the order of nature the 
prototype of the order of human life, gradually lose their 
living reality, something of the tendency implied in them 
long persists in that awe of nature which holds men back 
from violent invasion of her rights. We have in the Greek 
attitude to nature the best illustration of this feeling, with its 
combination of religious fear and aesthetic appreciation. The 
myths of Prometheus, Icarus and Phaethon are tales with a 
moral, showing how the desire to achieve heroic deeds leads 
the hero to destruction, if in his overweening blindness he 
refuses to respect the eternal ordinances of nature. It is in 

^ Abel Bbrgaignb, Kiligion vidique^ p. 224. 



302 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [243-4 

the same spirit that Herodotus condemns, e^,y the attempts 
of Xerxes to pierce the promontory of Athos and to join the 
two coasts of the Hellespont with a bridge of boats. As 
they are the same gods who rule over nature and over 
human life, a violation of the laws of nature is at the same 
time an offence against the moral laws of the universe; 
indeed, to him who reads between the lines the historian's 
belief is clear that disturbance of the one must of necessity 
lessen the power of the other.^ 

A widespread form of this awe of nature, though a form in 
which for the most part it was quickly ousted by the 
exigencies of life, consists in consideration for animals. 
The slaying of an animal is also, of course, an offence 
against the order of nature ; as is keenly felt where special 
developments of mythological thought have set particular 
animals in direct relation to the gods or, indeed, wherever 
the likeness of the animal to man in feeling and in conduct 
has impressed the human mind. It is probable that animal 
sacrifice contributed most in primitive times to overcome 
man's aversion to the act of slaughter. To take life for 
one's own ends is not allowable ; to take it for purposes of 
religious sacrifice is pleasing to the gods : and the flesh that 
had been dedicated to a god might also be consumed by man. 
Hence it is that certain religions of the modern world hedge 
round the slaughter of animals, even though it be for every- 
day purposes, with special religious ceremonies. In connec- 
tion with the feeling for nature, it is significant that the old 
repugnance to kill a fellow-creature persisted longest in those 
philosophical sects which made the appreciation of natural 
beauty an element of a mystical religious system. Thus 
the Pythagoreans and, at a later time, the Neoplatonists 
enjoined abstention from meat. Here the feeling for nature 
has become a source of asceticism. Far removed in its 

^ Cf, h, Schmidt, Ethik der Griuhen, iL pp. 80 ff. 



244-s] Man and Nature 303 

original motives from the usual conditions of ascetic living, 
it has fallen under the inevitable rule of the reaction of end 
on motive; and as its result is the result to which those 
conditions lead, itself springs in the last resort from ascetic 
promptings. So the visionary disciple of naturalistic pan- 
theism comes at last to practise his asceticism not from any 
feeling for the animal creation but solely for the blessings 
which he hopes his mode of life will bring. 

Mythological thought, in whose idea the eternal ordin- 
ances of nature are closely interwoven with the moral order 
of the universe, thus finds in nature an outward educa- 
tion in morality: just as the religious feelings form the 
earliest subjective motives to the moral conduct of life. 
In the naive consciousness, however, the two motives fuse 
again to produce a single total result When, therefore, 
philosophy or religion emphasises the imperfections of this 
stage of human evolution, the lack of intellectual culture 
and of unselfishness in the religious life, we must not forget 
on the other hand that the moral feeling and the feeling 
for the beautiful both alike had their roots in the soil of 
myth, and, so far as we know human nature, could not 
have grown up in any other ground. 

But this whole conception is gradually changed. The 
first step is taken when, in place of the indistinguishable 
blending of the natural and moral order of the universe, as 
we saw it in the original myth, the external order of things 
is felt to be merely a symbol, or perhaps the visible and 
tangible proof of the inward moral order. The change is 
directly coincident with the transformation of the nature- 
gods into moral powers. Hence the new feeling for nature 
freed from the shackles of the myth, and all the more keenly 
alive to the kinship of external impression and subjective 
mood, has by no means lost its old element of awe, its 



304 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [245-6 

shrinking from violent invasion of the natural order. On 
the contrary, the transition from the mythological to the 
aesthetic standpoint means an increased depth of feeling 
for the significance of the ordinances of nature as ethical 
prototypes, just as it does for the kinship between nature 
and subjective emotion. Though nature has lost her gods, 
the breath of divinity is not wholly gone out of her. Her 
godhead is but made more universal, freer from the externals 
of a faith that could not touch the heart Nature herself is 
still in very truth divine : only the separate things of nature 
are no more what they were, gods like unto men. The 
religious significance of this changed conception is every- 
where apparent in the poets and philosophers of the classical 
period, but most strikingly in Plato's TimaeuSy — that perfect 
example of a philosophic poem, where myth is reinterpreted 
in aesthetical symbolism. The creative spirit of deity 
has embodied the moral law in the order of the universe. 
Nature is therefore viewed, with more of consciousness than 
before, as a sensible manifestation of the divine, or — for the 
two are one — of the moral good ; and in virtue of the new 
thought thus read into her, reacts upon the sense of beauty, 
elevating and purifying ; all the more potently now that she is 
free of the gods made in man's likeness, whose irresponsible 
lawlessness rather stamped them the counterparts of human 
life than fitted them to be general ensamples of moral living. 
It is not without sigfnificance that this transition from the 
mythological to the aesthetical view of nature is coincident 
in time with the first beginnings of physical knowledge of the 
cosmic laws. Knowledge of natural law is the death-blow of 
mythological thinking, while it enhances the sublimity of the 
picture that is spread out to aesthetic contemplation. 

Nevertheless, scientific absorption in the problems of 
nature was accompanied by a new danger, and soon began to 
detract from the lofty view of nature that science itself had 



246] Man and Nature 305 

made possible. This danger arose from the rationalistic 
consideration of natural occurrence, which gradually coloured 
the effect that nature produced upon the observer, and thus 
did away with the ethical significance which the order of 
nature in its totality had formerly possessed for the human 
mind. The danger and its result were alike inevitable. As 
the first scientific apprehension of the reign of law in nature 
had meant transition from the mythological to the aesthetic 
and religious standpoint, so the exact development of 
natural science implied the gradual downfall of the new 
conception, the abrogation of the objective moral value which 
it still continued to ascribe to nature. Nature does not 
therefore cease to exert an ethical influence, by way of her 
aesthetical effects, but she exerts it only through the ethical 
ideas which a poetical imagination chooses to read into her ; 
and the poet is conscious of what he does, — so far conscious, 
at any rate, that he does not himself believe in the objective 
ethical value of natural phenomena. The day has gone by 
when the loss of the mythological elements in man's attitude 
to nature is more than compensated by its religious contents, 
all the purer for their exclusively aesthetic form. Nature has 
now lost, not her gods only, but her divinity. She reflects 
once more in all her changes, as she did in the age of myth, 
none but human feelings and passions : but since she reflects 
them as human, the imagination has as free a scope here 
as in the preceding stage, without the bondage of traditional 
ideas. 

So this last stage in the evolution of man's feeling for 
nature has something in common with both its predecessors : 
it shares with mythological thought the loving surrender 
of self to the individual natural object, and with the religious 
and aesthetic standpoint of a later age the subjective freedom 
of mental attitude. It stands higher than either, in that man 
now finds only himself in nature. He goes to nature that he 

I. X 



3o6 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [247 

may be moved by her in his own inmost being ; and when 
she does not of herself satisfy his desire, moulds her ac- 
cording to his needs. The awe of nature and the religious 
feeling inspired by the perception of natural law have both 
alike disappeared. And as nature must now subserve human 
purposes, the imagination which seeks for outward present- 
ations of its subjective moods is captivated rather by her 
charm and pathos than by simple beauty, rather by her 
terrible and startling aspects than by calm sublimity. 

The fullness of accord with nature which characterises 
man's present attitude to her has its peculiar ethical effects^ 
which owe their power over the human mind entirely to 
the directness and immediacy of this final union between 
inward feeling and object of outward contemplation. At 
the same time their purely subjective significance renders 
them as manifold and variable as human emotion itself. 
They can reinforce the moral impulses, and lend to the 
artistic presentation of ethical motives a living reality never 
before attained ; but they have nothing of that constraining 
power whereby the old idea of a world-order that embraced 
both nature and life could stamp its objective imprint upon 
the whole of human thought. Here, too, is proof of the 
greater freedom of the feeling for nature within its greater 
variety of form. In art the contrast of the present with 
the preceding stages of development is shown more 
particularly in the closeness with which the depiction of 
nature is interwoven with the exhibition of human feelings 
and passions. Sometimes the human mind, sometimes 
nature, is made the primum movens ; and sometimes both 
mind and nature, the inward and the outward, are so 
intimately blended that we cannot say which comes before 
or after the other. The strongest evidence of the power 
of our modern feeling for nature is to be found in the 
fact that in the modem world poetry and the plastic arts 



247-8] Man and Nature 307 

have ventured for the first time upon fields which, though 
they have never failed of ethical significance in real life, 
are only just becoming generally accessible to the work 
of poetic idealisation. The most important of these recent 
conquests of art is the passion of love. Love — the love 
which furnishes an inexhaustible theme to modem art, the 
dominant note of lyric poetry and romance — would be 
inconceivable without our modern nature-feeling, without 
that unmediated fusion of external impression and subjective 
mood of which Goethe's poetry affords so inimitable an 
example. And compare the ethical significance of love in 
modern poetry with the part that the love-god Eros plays 
in ancient art ! We find, perhaps, the first presage of the 
transcendent ethical power of the love motive in that 
wonderful dithyramb to love which Plato puts into the 
mouth of Socrates in the Phaedrus, Here, as so often, 
Plato is the happiest of all the ancient philosophers in 
his anticipation of the thought of future ages. 

The greater freedom and variety of form that characterise 
the feeling for nature, now that it is guided merely by 
subjective mood, has then as its first consequence the 
capacity of the feeling to adapt itself to any ethical motive, 
of whatever contents. But we must not overlook a second 
consequence : the remoulding of natural impressions in the 
interest of the subjective individuality, — a process that 
comports equally well with a preponderance of good or 
bad in the individual character. To the nature- feeling, 
grown subjective, there have been revealed connections 
between nature and the emotional life of man that were 
previously unknown ; but it has no understanding for 
the objective significance which accrued to the natural 
order of the mythological stage as prototype of the moral 
order of the universe. So it comes about that we find 
grave moral defects existing to-day alongside of the pro- 



3o8 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [248-9 

roundest appreciation of nature and the most delicate sense 
for the ethical bearing of certain aspects of human life. 
Petty egoism and self-sacrificing love, heartless cruelty 
and tender sensibility, are combinations more often found 
in a single character now than they were in the ancient 
world. Many such unions, indeed, are comparatively 
common, owing to the constant tendency of opposite traits 
to offset each other: the intermixture of extravagant 
sentimentality and bloodthirsty misanthropy exhibited in 
the character of Robespierre, e.g,^ is a genuine product of 
the modem enthusiasm for nature, — of that enthusiasm 
which finds food in nature for the feelings it desires to 
foster, but outside of its special domain of aesthetic enjoy- 
ment and one-sided development of the moral emotions 
has nothing of that awe of nature which in old days was 
the life-blood of a nature-feeling less intensive, perhaps, 
but certainly purer and more innocent. Here too, therefore, 
the advantages of increased freedom and greater range 
of development are attended by their own dangers, from 
which a ruder age was free. 



2. CIVILISATION AND MORALITY. 

{ft) The Idea of * Civilisation^ 

The word Cultur (culture, civilisation) is derived from 
the cultura agri^ the tillage and cultivation of the soil. 
The earlier and narrower meaning of the term points 
directly to the mode of origin of civilised society. For 
all civilisation begins with the transition to agriculture 
and a settled manner of life. At this point, therefore, the 
natural and cultural conditions of the moral life are in direct 
contact. But while the beginnings of civilisation follow with 
logical necessity from the change of outward habits of life, 



249-50] Civilisation and Morality 309 

they also presuppose a life of the mind which does not 
yield itself passively to environmental influences, but puts 
forth active effort to shape and mould them for human ends. 
Hence it is that the idea of civilisation, in its wider meaning, 
includes the changes set up by the gradual extension of 
man's control of nature and natural conditions over all the 
departments of life. Civilisation thus stands opposed to 
the primitive determination of man by nature as an active 
moulding of nature in the interest of the ends of human 
life. This effect of mind on nature is attended by profound 
reactive effects on the mind itself; the discovery of the 
means that shall serve for the conquest of nature implies 
continual enhancement and improvement of the mental 
faculties. So it comes about that in the last resort the 
term civilisation is applied to all these end-results of 
civilised activity, — to the intellectual, moral and aesthetic 
achievements of mental labour, — not less than to the better- 
ment of the material conditions of existence. The human 
mind has thus taken the place of nature as the object to 
be changed by civilisation. The cultura mentis is conceived 
of as a process analogous to the cultura agri ; and purely 
intellectual occupations, whose end is widely remote from 
any mastery of nature, enter the ranks of civilising influences. 
An investigation of the ethical effects of civilisation 
{Cultur) must set out first of all from the original meaning 
of the word. The regulation of property, the invention 
of tools and the perfecting of the means of communication 
are the most important factors in this primitive civilisation. 
Secondly, we must consider the mental cultivation which is 
their reactive effect, and which at the higher stages of evolu- 
tion furnishes the principal contents of the idea of civilisation 
in general. 



3 1 o The Conditions of Moral Evolution [250 



(^) The Regulation of Property. 

The earliest of all the conditions of civilisation is the 
development of an ordered system of ownership. The regula- 
tion of property meets us everywhere among the oldest rules 
of custom, and sets the most important problem to incipient 
legislation. The form of property which first obtains assured 
recognition is property in land. It is probable that in all 
rudimentary societies land is common property. The tribal 
group looks upon the land which it has brought under cul- 
tivation, and defended with common forces against enemies 
from without, as a common possession, a portion of which 
it assigns in usufruct to each of its members. This primitive 
condition — traces of which are still to be found here and 
there among savage and civilised peoples^ — undergoes 
change in two directions. On the one hand, the land 
assigned to the use of individual families gradually passes 
over into independent property; on the other, the intro- 
duction of class distinctions leads to the rise of a ruling 
class, who are at the same time property owners, and of a 
class of servants or bondsmen, to whom portions of land 
are gradually assigned in feudal tenure, and finally (as in 
the preceding case) pass over into independent property.^ 
The origin of private property by way of separation from 
the common possessions, and its slow emancipation from 
burdens and limitations that long attached to it, are 
accordingly features common to both developments. The 

* Cf, E. DE Laveleye, De la propriiti et de ses forms primitives, 1874. For 
phenomena of the kind in Polynesia, see Waitz-Gerland, Anthropohgie der 
NcUurvbUur^ vi. pp. 168, 792. On the possession of property by the village 
community in Russia, cf, voN Haxthausen, Die Idndliche Verfassung Russ- 
lands y Leipzig, 1866, and Eckardt's remarks on the same subject in Baltische 
utui russische CultursltuUen, pp. 480 ff. 

' Cf J, Grimm, Deutsche Rechtsalterthumer^ 2 Ausg., pp. 491 fF. W. 
Arnold, Zur Geschickte des Eigenthums in den detitschen Stddten, Basel, 1 86 1. 



251] Civilisation and Morality 311 

memory of the labours and struggles passed through for the 
attainment of private ownership in land is preserved in 
the list of privil^es and protective measures with which 
all the earliest legal systems hedge round the possession 
of land. Thus the Solonian code does not recognise 
personal property as a pern^anent possession, and is there- 
fore at pains to minimise the obligations connected with 
it ; while, on the other hand, it is much concerned for the 
protection and maintenance of property in land. And the 
property-census ascribed to Servius Tullius is based entirely 
on the presupposition that possession in land is the sole 
measure of the amount of a fortune. 

But the ancient world itself saw the gradual rise of a 
new form of personal property, whose growth was closely 
bound up with the distinction of classes, and more especially 
with the formation of a class of free artisans: the rise of 
private capital. Private capital — the surplus of the products 
of labour laid up in money or some other means of exchange 
— then attained to more and more importance. Roman 
legislation, in particular, was largely occupied with measures 
for its recognition and protection, and secondarily also with 
the prevention of its abuse. Now, when the time had 
arrived for the two forms of property — landed property and 
private capital — to come into competition under approxi- 
mately equal conditions of legal protection, it was inevitable 
that capital, with its capacity of employment in so many 
different fields and of almost infinite accumulation, should 
b^in by slow degrees to take precedence over its rival. 
And this shift of the centre of value in property, which 
is so characteristic a feature of modem society and has been 
furthered by the advance of material civilisation in other 
directions, is attended by the most wide-reaching ethical con- 
sequences. So long as property in land is that best assured 
by law, inheritance counts for more than an acquired fortune. 



312 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [251-2 

Indeed, the idea may quite possibly arise, as it did to so 
marked a degree in the best period of Hellenic civilisation, 
that an acquired fortune comes only with an occupation 
and position in life that are unworthy of a free man. This 
attitude is due to the continuance of tribal and family 
feeling, and on its own part is admirably fitted to infuse 
that feeling with new life and strength. The duty of filial 
affection to ancestors demands that each man safeguard 
his inheritance, and hand it over undiminished to his 
posterity.^ It is in this spirit that the aged Cephalus speaks 
in the beginning of Plato's Republic. He prides himself 
that he has struck the mean between a grandfather who 
"doubled and trebled the value of his patrimony" and a 
father who wasted his substance : " I shall be satisfied," he 
says, " if I leave to these my sons not less but a little more 
than I received."* Something of this view, partially inter- 
mixed with the yet older preference for landed property, 
has come down to our own day ; it shows in all the legal 
enactments on the one hand, and economies and retrench- 
ments on the other, which aim at preventing any division 
of the estate. But the main current of civilisation has 
tended more and more to emphasise the value of acquired 
property, and thus to give personal property the advantage 
over property in land in ethical regard as well. In old days 
men worked for the present ; now they work for the future. 
The Greek sought to show his loyalty to the traditions of 
his house in the use of his estate for personal and public 
ends ; the modern, who can more than satisfy the claims 
made by himself and society upon the proceeds of his 
labour, desires to assure provision for his children, not 
seldom animated by the thought that life shall be less 
laborious to them than it has been to him. That each of 

* L. Schmidt, Ethik der Gricchen^ ii. p. 39a 
' Republ.^ i. 4. 



^52-3] Civilisation and Morality 313 

these attitudes has its moral advantages and disadvantages 
no one will deny. We are not called upon to choose between 
them, for the march of civilisation can never be turned back. 
If the moral basis of ownership should undergo change in 
the future, as may reasonably be expected, this will not 
be because the old is becoming new again, but only 
because the new gives birth to something that is still 
new. The moral value of the ancient idea lies in its 
insistence on public spirit and filial affection ; the modern 
view is penetrated by a more living interest in the narrower 
circle of the family, — an interest which has grown in direct 
proportion as the range of civil and political communities 
has widened. We must, however, grant that the danger 
of an egoistic narrowmindedness is brought closer to us 
in modem times, and that the impulse given to the desire 
for acquisition, while it increases our capacity in the service 
of moral ends, at the same time carries with it serious 
moral danger. Covetousness, avarice, the exploitation of 
others* labour, fraud, the immoderate pursuit of pleasure 
and complete submergence in material interests are, without 
doubt, qualities for whose development modern civilisation 
has provided means just as abundant as for the exhibition 
of moral virtues. 

{c) The Invention of Tools, 

The invention of implements is very closely connected 
with the conditions of ownership and of the acquisition of 
property. Foremost among the instruments of labour, in the 
wider sense of the word, stands the domestic animal. The 
domestication and breeding of animals was one of the earliest 
'inventions,' if we may use the term, prompted by the change 
to an agricultural life. The beast of burden relieves man of 
work, and so lessens the difference between the free man and 
the slave. Though slavery continued long afler the use of 



3 1 4 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [253-4 

draught animals had been introduced, the lot of the slave was 
humanised from the first moment that he ceased himself to 
drag the plough over the field, or, as in ancient Egypt, to haul 
the stones for the great works of kings and nobles. In primitive 
times the animal is man's most dangerous enemy ; he seeks 
refuge from it in gloomy caverns, or on pile-built platforms over 
unhealthy lakes and swamps. At the dawn of civilisation the 
animal is man's greatest benefactor: it provides him with 
food, takes the plough from his hand and the burden from 
his back, and, what is perhaps more than either, spurs his 
inventiveness to the creation of tools and implements that 
shall enable him to utilise the brute strength of muscles 
to his best advantage. The waggon and the implements of 
agriculture are primeval inventions ; but where man has the 
use of none but his own strength, as is still the case to-day in 
many r^ions of the interior of Africa, they are found only in 
the most primitive form. It is the draught animal, with his 
greater strength for work, that puts even these earliest in- 
ventions to their full capacity. 

But far above any of the achievements to which mankind 
rose in long ages of civilisation at the suggestion of animal 
labour stands their present utilisation of the powers of 
inorganic nature^ — so truly a product of the most recent civili- 
sation that we can trace to-day no more than the first be- 
ginnings of those moral consequences which such a revolution 
must of necessity bring in its train. Not the animal only, 
but man himself has been driven from labour in fields that he 
has long been wont to occupy. And purely mechanical per- 
formance has been gradually followed by portions of that 
labour which an earlier age could not accomplish without the 
constant exhibition of intellectual powers. Modern machinery 
replaces not only the muscular strength, but also the intelli- 
gence of manual labour. The countless small sums of mental 
labour expended in old times upon individual production by 



254] Civilisation and Morality 315 

work of hand are saved once and for all by the inventive act 
which manifests itself in the construction of the machine. 
Individual labour is thus forced back again to the purely 
mechanical level ; only that, in contradistinction to the early 
days of civilisation, this mechanical work is itself reduced to 
the least possible amount. The intelligence and strength of a 
child, trained in a few easy manual exercises, are now sufficient 
under given circumstances to accomplish a difficult piece of 
technical work. Now is it inevitable that not only the external 
value, but also the moral valuation of work rise and fall with 
the demand that it makes upon individual capacity. Hence 
the technical advance of civilisation carries with it serious 
danger of a vast moral retrogression. If the draught animal 
long ago relieved the slave from the oppression of his lot, the 
machine threatens to make of poverty a new kind of slavery. 
None can be blind to this danger save those who will not see 
the blows that fall on another's back. But it would be pre- 
posterous, again, to try and save the situation by any vain 
effort to reverse the wheel of the world's progress. The 
dangers that come with civilisation can be met only by the 
further advance of civilisation. Some help may, perhaps, be 
gained from the perfection of the technical instruments them- 
selves. As they complete their task of man's liberation from 
mechanical work, the freer scope will there be for the ex- 
hibition of those intellectual powers which can never be 
wholly replaced by the powers of inorganic nature, and hence 
will never fail of their proper value. 

There is one direction (true, it is a matter of externals 
only) in which this ability of the machine to counteract 
its own disadvantages has long begun to show itself. The 
greater range of communication^ material and mental, which 
has followed from the utilisation of the motive powers of 
nature through machinery, is surely an advance on the road 
to emancipation. Here again, however, the best that is to 



3i6 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [254-5 

be done must remain for the moral character to do, as it 
makes its influence felt in the free social relations of man 
to man, and in state legislation ; for those older forms 
of moral bondage belonging to a stage of civilisation that 
we have well-nigh left behind us, slavery and vassalage, fled 
in their day also at the imperative command of moral duty. 

{d) The Improvement of the Means of Communication, 

Midway between the technical improvement of the instru- 
ments of livelihood and the ennobling of life by mental 
cultivation stand comnurce and communication. Both are 
entirely dependent upon the application of certain technical 
devices. Where primitive communication transcended the 
narrowest circles and the most transient relations, it entered 
upon its development by way of the waggon and the art 
of navigation. Our own age of steam and electricity is 
rapidly approaching the goal when the distances that the 
earth presents will no longer offer any serious obstacle to 
the traveller, and when all the quarters of the world will 
be joined together under the influence of a common civilisa- 
tion by an uninterrupted bond of thought and feeling. 

Here, again, it is the means that has created the end. 
Everyone knows that when the first timid attempts were 
made with the new means of communication men's ideas 
as to their range of application moved only within the 
narrow limits of earlier experience. But not only has the 
means created an end that man neither anticipated nor even, 
perhaps, desired ; it has done more and more to remove the 
obstacles which older habits of life and the condition of 
international law set in the path of its attainment. In this 
interplay of cause and effect communication has in its turn 
proved to be a means leading to results that have been new, 
unforeseen and, if consciously desired, desired as a general 



255-6] Civilisation and Morality 317 

rule but a very short time before their actual achievement 
We of the present day are still standing in the thick of the 
social and international revolution stirred up by the rapid 
growth of communication, so that we can say nothing of 
its ultimate consequences. There are, however, two results, 
results that offer a partial compensation of the many evils 
accompanying the improvement of machinery, which are too 
plain to be mistaken. The first consists in the extension 
of the trade in agricultural products. This means that 
distress in any given quarter can be more and more easily 
relieved ; and more especially that those who live entirely 
by husbandry, and are, therefore, most dependent upon 
favourable or unfavourable natural conditions, are safeguarded 
from the fatal vicissitudes of their mode of life. The earth 
is large enough to make up for all the distress which it 
brings about in the individual case through the conditions 
of soil and climate to which it is subject; but communication 
alone can by slow degrees raise the potentiality to actual 
fact. The second, and in its ultimate consequences perhaps 
even more important result is the incomparably greater 
range of personal activity that is opened up to the individual. 
The labour market, originally local or at most provincial, 
has gradually become national, and to a certain degree even 
international. Now the less compatible the interest of the 
nations with disturbance of the growth of this peaceful 
intercourse, the stronger is the guarantee against hostile 
entanglements. The idea of international tribunals of 
arbitration, scoffed at a hundred years ago as an Utopian 
dream, has already become fact on more than one occasion 
under the constraining power of commercial interests. And 
lastly, the greater freedom of personal intercourse, together 
with the increased production and transportation of material 
goods, has brought about the development in size and 
prosperity of our modern towns which, bad as the dark 



3i8 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [256-7 

sides of life in a great city may be, has nevertheless proved 
of the greatest service in stimulating inventive ingenuity 
and extending education. While in former ages art and 
science could thrive only under the protection of the court, 
it is hardly an exaggeration to say that they find encourage- 
ment to grow and flourish to-day wherever there is a centre 
of civic life large enough to make possible any considerable 
expenditure for public ends ; and as the public ends them- 
selves take on this wider range, the co-operation of 
individuals for the common good has fuller opportunity 
to display its usefulness, and the magnitude of the general 
interests makes them more powerful to silence the voice 
of a narrow-minded exclusiveness. For the poet's words 
"Man grows with greatness of his purposes" are as true 
here as they are in every other department of the moral 
life. 

No one will deny, of course, that this same commerce 
brings moral evils in its train which may far outweigh the 
benefits that it confers ; nay more, which may come to such 
a growth that the whole advance of civilisation at a given 
epoch is but a doubtful blessing. Apart from the moral 
dangers into which life in a large city leads, by the fatal 
facility it affords for the gratification of personal desires, by 
the temptation it holds out of lucrative occupation without 
steady work, and by the concourse of immoral elements that 
find in the high pressure of city life the most favourable soil 
for their antisocial activities, — apart from all this, the immense 
rapidity with which our modem means of communication 
sets material goods and intellectual products in general 
circulation cannot but exercise a distracting effect upon the 
individual ; so that the moral force which he requires for the 
prosecution of some definite aim in life is perhaps greater 
than at any previous period of the world's history; while at 
the same time his public duties and private calling demand 



257] Civilisation and Morality 319 

that he pay a certain measure of attention to all the count- 
less incidents which hold the general interest of the hour. 
If we add to this the universal increase in intellectual 
production, or at any rate in the amount of it, and the 
infinitely greater use to which we nowadays put the means 
whereby a new addition to the sum of knowledge is 
distributed, first of all to those immediately interested, but 
then, it may be, to the very widest circles, we cannot escape 
the conclusion that life in the modem state, though easier in 
its details, is on the whole much more difficult of living than 
life has ever been before. It imposes greater tasks upon the 
citizen, and makes greater demands upon him even outside 
the range of duties that he has most at heart. A measure of 
strength that might formerly have sufficed to meet average 
requirements may to-day break down under their burden. 
Nevertheless, this shadow-side of civilisation is not dark 
enough to make us wish that its whole work had been left 
undone. Great undertakings are not possible for the 
individual without great dangers ; and civilisation, too, is 
not a blessing in the sense that it showers down the ripe 
fruits of the moral life all in a moment upon everyone who 
comes under its influence ; it is a blessing which simply 
makes it possible for every man to attain more, whether 
for good or for evil, than he could have attained without it 

{e) The Cultivation of the Mind, 

In this connection the cultivation of the mind^ the final 
factor in civilisation, stands upon the same level as the 
development of rules of ownership, of mechanical con- 
trivances, and of commerce and communication. Determined 
by the others, it binds together the results of them all. The 
more general intellectual cultivation is, the more stringently a 
certain measure of education is demanded, — not only by the 



320 The Conditions of Moral EvoltUion [257-8 

individual from himself and the family from its members, 
but also by the state from its -citizens, — the more effectually 
are the obstacles surmounted which the actual inequality of 
men places in the way of practical humanity. The require- 
ment that we shall love all mankind must remain a merely 
theoretical postulate so long as there is a great gulf of 
mental cultivation fixed between man and man. A widely- 
travelled naturalist has declared that he loves the negro, 
when the greatest possible extent of space lies between 
them ; but that his theoretical love changes to an instinctive 
aversion when he stands face to face with the swarthy child 
of nature. It is not so much the difference of physical 
diathesis, however, as the utter dissimilarity of thought and 
feeling, which makes proximity so distasteful. When once a 
common education has called to life common ideas and 
interests we gradually attain the power of abstracting from 
external differences. 

It is not, of course, that sameness of education means 
sameness of knowledge and ability. That is definitely 
excluded by the actual inequality of human endowment; 
besides which it is wholly irreconcilable with that multi- 
fariousness of human activity which, in its turn, is a 
necessary result of the progress of civilisation and education. 
The requirement of equality is restricted in the nature of 
things to the departments of life which are really common 
to all, />., to the universal human interests which spring 
partly from the fact of membership in the same civic 
community, and partly, transcending this, from similarity 
of moral and aesthetic attitude and feeling. Our modem 
educational efforts not seldom go astray in confusing 
coimnunity of education, the only aim that is worth the 
striving for, or whose achievement promises to increase 
human happiness, with equality of knowledge and ability, — 
which even were it attainable would be for the great 



258-9] Civilisation and Morality 321 

majority of mankind a mere burden and superfluity, if not 
a positive misfortune. Hand in hand with these wrongly 
directed educational movements goes that mistaken aspira- 
tion after equality which aims at equalising mankind, not in 
the moral qualities that are independent of calling, position 
in life, and the material good things of fortune, but con- 
trariwise in these external matters themselves. True, this 
aspiration is not either wholly without moral motivisation. 
When it springs from the conviction that a certain security 
in the outward conduct of life is necessary for the realisation 
of the other equality, of moral education, the restriction of 
its demand to outward matters is entirely justifiable. Of all 
suspicious moral principles that of what is called * self-help ' 
is one of the most dubious. Excellent for him who has 
the will and the power to help himself, wholesome for him 
who lacks only the energy requisite for action, it is worthless 
for the man who is too weak to endure the struggle, and 
criminal in the mouth of one who will not help those to 
whom he applies it Since sameness of education can never 
mean sameness of knowledge and ability, it will never either 
do away with the differences in human capacity, or with 
the differences of position and influence which their capacity 
fits men to obtain. Let us suppose it possible by violent 
measures to enact the fiction that every man's work and 
endowments are the precise equivalent of his neighbour's. 
But nature has placed her veto upon equality of endowment ; 
and the idea that all men's work is of equal value is 
negatived by our intellectual, aesthetic and ethical judg- 
ments. Thus there is only one equality left, as possible 
and actual end : equality of right to the acquisition of the 
intellectual goods which civilisation has produced. This 
right, if it is not to remain a mere empty form, carries 
with it the requirement that however different individual 
positions in life may be, no one shall be debarred by the 
I. Y 



322 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [259-60 

struggle with want from participation in this the common 
possession of mankind. The requirement, however, is 
always a moral postulate, and therefore threatened at the 
same time that it is endorsed by civilisation. It stands 
accordingly not as the result of civilisation, but as its 
necessary ethical compUfnent. 



(/) The Ethical Advantages and Disadvantages of 

Civilisation. 

We have already indicated the decision which a con- 
sideration of the facts of the moral life renders upon the 
old controversial issue as to whether civilisation furthers 
or checks morality. The ethical influence of civilisation 
is everywhere ambiguous. As it helps to deepen and 
refine man's moral ideas, so it opens up all sorts of paths 
which may lead him from the good. It creates new crimes, 
— crimes which, like certain kinds of imposition and deceit, 
are only called to life by the conditions of civilisation ; and it 
furnishes the oldest forms of violation of the law, robbery 
and murder, with new weapons, which magnify the moral 
gravity of the offence in proportion as their use demands 
inventive power and systematic calculation. To which it 
must be added, further, that motives which do not fail of 
their moral effect in an earlier stage of social evolution 
become less effective later. The vast complexity of society 
holds out the prospect that the author of a criminal act 
will escape undetected, and so the fear of punishment 
loses its deterrent force. But the worst consequences of all 
follow from the undermining of the religious motives to 
moral conduct Those whose morality was based simply 
on the fear of a future retribution feel no incentive to 
refrain from sin when once belief in retribution has been 
lost. It is true that the loss may be fully compensated. 



26<>-i] Ctznlisaiion and Morality 323 

in certain cases, by new and unselfish motives to morality, 
which mental cultivation produces. But gain and loss are 
not always equally balanced. Whole epochs may suffer — 
the decay of morals in the Roman Empire is an impressive 
lesson — under the stern decree of destiny that man shall 
forget the old motives to morality before others have arisen 
to take their place. 

While civilisation affords the means to a higher ethical 
perfection, therefore, it never fails on the other side to 
furnish stronger impulses to immorality and to lend their 
realisation all the aid in its power. This explains why, 
in a primitive stage of civilisation, the morality of a race 
is more uniform than it is to-day. As primitive man shows 
but little difference in his physical nature, so his deviations 
from the mean in the moral sphere, whether above or 
below, are also inconsiderable. And this leads to a serious 
question. May it not be, if we look simply at the totality 
of good and evil, that the greater value of the good attain- 
able from the heights of civilisation is outweighed by the 
increase in evil ? And if this be true, is not that primitive 
state the better in which mankind, though they do not know 
the supreme beauty of the good, have not either become 
familiar with the most hateful forms of evil? There is 
good reason to ask the question. But there is equal 
reason to declare that it can never be answered : never, 
at least, in terms that shall possess an ethical value. For that 
would necessitate man's having the choice between different 
stages of civilisation, just as he may choose the best of 
various possible actions. But no one can choose the age 
in which he will live. We can admire the heroes of the 
Homeric world or the chivalry of the Middle Age ; we can 
further, in our own minds, rank the morality of one age 
higher than that of another, our own included ; but there is 
no age and no civilisation that we can set up as an examplar 



324 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [261 

of universal validity for all time. For our attempt would 
presuppose that the mental life of the race can turn back- 
ward or come to a standstill. This is what made the 
tendencies of the romantic school so unwholesome and at 
times so ridiculous : they not only admired the Middle Age, 
but tried to reproduce it in modern art and even in modem 
life, — so that Protestants, e.g,y turned Roman Catholic, 
because the Middle Age had been Roman Catholic. Every 
man is of his own time and stands within the civilisation 
of that time, and any other is for him out of the question. 
If this civilisation brings moral dangers unknown to former 
ages, then we can only say that it makes demand of the 
individual and of society alike to face the new conditions, 
and do all that in them lies to assure the victory for the 
good elements over the evil. 

Even from the standpoint of a purely subjective estimation, 
which finds most to praise in the moral qualities of a par- 
ticular stage of civilisation without desiring on that account 
to call it back to life, we must remember that moral facts are 
not to be regarded, like material things, as given with all 
their attributes upon them, to be accepted or rejected as 
they stand. Just as the moral life of the individual has its 
ultimate source in the free will, so the external conditions of 
the moral life are the free choice of him who subjects himself 
to them. If a higher civilisation presents greater dangers, as 
well as supplying more abundant means for the perfecting of 
the moral life, still its forces are not physical forces, which 
must necessarily cancel one another, in whole or part, — but 
antagonistic motives, between which choice has to decide. 
We may not ask, then, what the consequences of civilisation at 
large may be. That question implies that the spheres of 
civilisation and of morality coincide; whereas, as we have 
seen, the two cut across each other. The only l^itimate 
enquiry is, what means civilisation places at the disposal of 



262] Psychological Elements in Morality 325 

the will that has decided to follow the good. And when the 
question is put in this way there can be no doubt on which 
side the advantage lies. 

3. General Results. 

{a) The Psychological Elements in Morality. 

Throughout the forgoing discussion we have employed 
the terms 'good* and *bad/ 'moral' and 'immoral/ in 
the sense which attaches to them in the not very definite 
language of every-day life. It would have been foreign to 
our immediate purpose to raise the question whether these 
terms really attain to sufficient clearness in the general con- 
sciousness, or whether they can be precisely defined at all. 
But now that we have seen how moral ideas change with the 
changing conditions of physical environment and of civilisa- 
tion, the doubt may naturally arise whether after all there is 
any connection and coherence in the moral life, or whether it 
is not merely the collective name for a group of what are, in 
part, wholly heterogenous phenomena. It would seem as if 
good and bad, virtue and vice, change their aspect so com- 
pletely in the eyes of men, that approximate sameness of 
contents in the same ideas can be looked for only within 
limited periods and narrow circles, beyond which there is 
utter difference, possibly even direct contrariety of moral 
standpoint. The age that first listened to the Homeric 
poems saw in Achilles and Ulysses examples of manly 
virtue. Very different is the judgment of the Stoic philo- 
sopher, the sage Brahmin, or the Christian saint, who looks 
on anger and revenge, fraud and deceit, as abominable crimes, 
however praiseworthy the ends which they may appear to 
subserve. In view, then, of this extreme variation of moral 
ideas in the general consciousness, the question presses itself 
upon our consideration whether there really are universally 



326 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [262-3 

valid elements in morality, or whether it may not be true that 
the one common characteristic of the moral life is just the 
bare fact that in all lands and in all ages certain actions are 
approved and certain actions disapproved, while the contents 
of the facts whose value is thus differently appraised shows 
not the least approach to constancy. The question is all the 
more important since the universal elements in moral ideas, 
if they exist at all, must evidently be those from which a 
scientific investigation of moral norms has to set out 

It is natural to suggest that a reason for the changeable- 
ness of moral ideas may be found in the fact of evolution. 
All mental processes are subject to development On this 
view, then, the elements in morality which constitute the 
standard of moral reference at the last and highest stage 
of evolution would necessarily possess, if not an universal^ 
still an exclusive moral validity. But here again the question 
may be raised whether it is possible to say with any degree 
of certainty that the last and highest stage has anywhere 
been attained ; and whether it is not true of this development 
as it is of others, that in germ^ at any rate, the later stages 
are really contained in the earlier. No mental development 
is conceivable without a definite continuity of ideas. Hence, 
just as there are many links that connect the thought of the 
man with the thought of the child, in spite of all the 
differences between them, so there must be similar elements 
in the moral sphere which hold all the various parts together, 
and in that sense may justly lay claim to the possession 
of an universal validity. 

When we look round for elements that are thus common 
to all the developmental stages of the moral life, we come 
first of all upon cevtaAn formal characteristics of moral ideas. 
Thus (i) it is a fact of formal significance that morality 
expresses itself in antitheses, with which judgments of 
approval and disapproval are universally associated. (2) 



263-^] Psychological Elements in Morality 327 

And it is a second formal characteristic of morality that 
certain goods are regarded as morally desirable whose 
enjoyment promises an enduring satisfaction. This thought 
of permanence shows most clearly in the religious ideas 
which, reinforced by the conceptions of reward and punish- 
ment and of immortality, have striven wholly to free the 
satisfaction of the moral nature from the restrictions of time, 
!>., to make it absolutely enduring. 

But these formal determinations are not sufficient to 
differentiate morality from other departments of life. What 
is more, they themselves point to something beyond them. 
Our approval or disapproval is always conditioned by the 
particular contents of the act upon which the judgment 
of value is passed ; and the attribute of permanence which 
distinguishes moral satisfaction from other emotions must 
be due, in the same way, to the peculiar nature of morality. 
Now it is a priori inadmissible to lay conditions upon the 
universally valid contents of morality which have not proved 
themselves to be conditions of human life in general ; i>., 
conditions that belong to a particular, howsoever primitive, 
stage of civilisation. Distant as the past must be that saw 
the rise of family and state and 1^^ system, still their 
absolute primitiveness is far too doubtful a matter for us 
even to correlate them with the origination of moral ideas, 
much more to derive morality from them. On the contrary^ 
we must suppose that all the social forms in which moral 
conceptions are exhibited had their source in morality, or 
at least grew up under moral influences. But in that case 
we have nothing lefl that can serve as the specific contents 
of morality except certain psychological elements, which 
presuppose not any special external conditions, but simply 
the uniformity of human nature. And, as a matter of fact, 
we find such elements in certain moral impulses which, 
while they may develope in very different ways, and therefore 



328 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [264-s 

manifest themselves in great variety of empirical form, are 
nevertheless in essence always and everywhere the same. 
They are the factors whose resultant is seen in the two great 
groups of phenomena that we have learned to know as the 
principal and also as the omnipresent expressions of the 
moral life: religious views and the observances of social 
living, — phenomena that, for all their unity of origin, can 
take on the utmost diversity of form, and act and react upon 
one another in the most manifold ways. 

With these two great groups of general facts are correlated 
two fundamental psychological tnotives^ whose universal 
validity depends upon the constancy with which they pro- 
duce their effect in the human consciousness : the feelings 
of reverence and of affection. They relate originally to 
entirely different objects ; the feelings of reverence to super- 
human beings and powers, the feelings of affection to 
humanity, to one's fellow-man. The first is the primary 
condition of the religious, the second of the social life 
of mankind. But the two root - impulses soon become 
connected in a great variety of ways, each acquiring a 
helpful influence upon the phase of life that depends upon 
the other. That wider humanity, e,g,, which bears the 
fairest blossoms of our social life, has its ultimate root in 
religious soil. The whole development of morality rests 
on the expression of these two fundamental impulses of 
human nature : the vast distances that separate its several 
stages result simply from the interaction of the primal 
motives and the simultaneous influence of intellectual factors. 
And the development of human nature itself not only leads 
back to an universal sameness of psychological elements, 
but has throughout been subject to definite psychologfical 
laws, whose validity is not less universal, however varied a 
guise the individual forms of life may wear. 



265-6] Psychological Laws of Moral Evolution 329 



\J)) The Psychological Laws of Moral Evolution. 

Wherever we can trace the development of moral con- 
ceptions with sufficient fullness we find that it falls into 
three stages. Each of them has its own distinguishing 
marks, mainly determined by the relation in which the 
various parallel part-developments stand to one another at 
the given time. In its first b^nnings the moral life is very 
much the same the world over: the growth of the social 
impulses, overrun as they are by the selfishness of barbarism, 
is greatly confined; and consequently certain external advan- 
tages, that are useful to their possessor and to his associates, 
are held in chief esteem as virtues. This first stage, in which 
there is an almost total lack of moral incentive, is tran- 
scended for the most part under the influence of religious 
ideas and the interactions of religious feelings with the social 
impulses. Morality thus enters upon its second stage, in 
which the differences in religious and social conditions are 
paralleled by a growing differentiation of views of life. We 
may therefore term it the age of the differenticUion of moral 
ideas. The third stage is introduced by yet another change 
in religious conceptions, and characterised by the gradual 
growth of philosophical influence. Religion and philosophy 
continue to further that humanistic tendency in the moral 
life whose preponderance always marks the maturity of the 
moral consciousness ; so that under this influence the 
differences of national standpoint are effaced again. This 
law of the three stages, or of the successive differentiation 
and unification of moral ideas, is as fully attested by the 
change in the meaning of words as it is by the history 
of religious and social civilisation. 

But within the development of morality under the law of 
the three stages we can trace the effects of a second 
I. V a 



330 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [266 

important law, whose misconception has, without any doubt, 
been the principal source of error in many mistaken ethical 
theories. It is the law of the heterogony of ends. We mean 
to express by this name what is a matter of universal 
experience: that manifestations of will, over the whole 
range of man's free voluntary actions, are always of such 
a character that the effects of the actions extend more or 
less widely beyond the original motives of volition, so that 
new motives are originated for future actions, and again, in 
their turn, produce new effects. 

The interconnection of a series of ends, then, depends not 
upon the fact that the end finally achieved was contained, 
as idea, in the original motives to the actions which have 
ultimately led to its achievement ; nor even upon the fact that 
the motives which were operative at the first produce of 
their own power those that are operative at the last Its 
essential warrant is this : that owing to the constant influence 
of accessory factors the result of every act of choice is as a 
whole not congruent with the end ideated in the motive. 
But those elements of the result that lie outside of the 
original motive are eminently fitted to become new motives 
or elements in new motives, from which new ends or 
variations of the original end arise. The changes of motive 
thus conditioned by the result of action may be effected 
gradually or at one blow, and the distance that separates 
the first motive and the end ultimately pursued is determined 
partly by the time that thus elapses between them and partly 
by the extent of the series of ends. 

We must look principally to the law of heterogony of ends 
to explain the increasing number and fullness of ethical 
theories of life, whose production indicates the trend of 
moral evolution. The law also shows us how erroneous a 
conception of this development is embodied in the common 
idea that what we at the present day find or imagine to be 



266-7] Moral Life and Ethical Theory 331 

the motive to particular moral actions has prompted man to 
their performance from the very banning. Moreover> the 
law throws a light not only on what lies behind us, but also 
on the future development of the moral life. While it 
teaches that every stage is the necessary preparation for 
that which follows, it flatly forbids the setting of bounds to 
the course of future events for reasons drawn simply from 
our present outiook over the universe. Reality is always 
fuller and richer than theory. Hence the most that is 
allowed us is to anticipate the general outiine of the course 
that will be taken by the immediate future. Here, then, the 
law warns us with no uncertain voice that we may not 
relegate the ends of morality at large to the narrow circle of 
our personal hopes and wishes. The particular thing must 
be regarded sub specie aetemitatis. At the same time, we 
may not, with the philosopher who coined this phrase, look 
upon the infinity as something given and hence directly 
apprehensible by our idea ; we must rather consider it as a 
becoming, as an infinite problem, parts of which we come to 
know by solving them.* 



4. THE MORAL LIFE AND ETHICAL THEORIES OF 

THE UNIVERSE. 

In the psychological elements and laws of the moral 
life we have the immediate point of departure for an 
investigation of the motives, ends and norms of moral 
conduct But as the primary object of such an investiga- 
tion is to grive account of the ground and end of moral 
requirements, it is clear that a consideration of the ethical 



critics have understood the principle of heterogony of ends to mean 
that there b absolntely no inner relation^p between motives and the ends which 
arise out of them. The attentive and unprejudiced reader of the above discussion 
will hardly need the assurance that this interpretation is erroneous. 



332 The Conditions of Moral Evolution [267-8 

theories of the universe, from their vague beginnings in 
the popular consciousness to their precise formulation by 
scientific ethics, will form a valuable supplement to the 
discussion of the facts of the moral life. 

We may divide the history of the development of ethical 
systems into the three great periods of ancient. Christian 
and modem ethics. Ancient ethics derives its materials 
most directly from the popular consciousness. Not till the 
period approaches its close is ethics definitely separated from 
the national custom out of which it sprang. It then tends 
to become humanistic, in the widest sense, and at the same 
time takes on a religious colouring. The way is thus paved 
for the rise of Christian ethics. This does not grow up, as 
ancient ethics did, on the soil of national custom: it aims 
from the very first to lay down the law for custom. It 
thus places itself in purposed opposition to the imperfection 
of real life, to which it holds up the exemplar of an ideal 
moral universe. Finally, modern ethics enters once more 
into closer relation with the material principles that underlie 
the moral life. In so doing, it may be said in general to 
unite the descriptive standpoint of ancient with the normative 
of Christian ethics. At the same time it shows a widespread 
tendency to diflferentiate the moral and the religious spheres ; 
but in the fulfilment of this task splits up into a large number 
of separate currents, in which we trace the operation of the 
\ material factors that combine to make up the moral life of 

modem times. 

Ancient ethics, especially in its earlier stages, is led by 
its direct connection with practical moral ideas to take 
morality for granted : it consists in the good things of 
real life, as offered by the conditions of existence, personal 
and national. Ancient ethics is therefore preponderantly 
an ethics of virtue. It does not ask, What is the good? 
but, How must man act in order to be good and happy? 



•V ^ 



268-9] Moral Life and Ethical Theory 333 

Before very long, however, the thought arises that in actual 
life the highest good and the most perfect happiness are 
unattainable. And this idea becomes the keynote of 
Christian ethics. For it the end of human endeavour lies 
in the world beyond the grave. That is moral which helps 
man to attain the goods of this other world : that is immoral 
which impedes his efforts to attain them. All pursuit of 
earthly goods is therefore immoral. What must man do 
to achieve eternal blessedness? That is the question before 
which all others fade into insignificance. Christian ethics is 
therefore through and through religious: it is primarily an 
ethics of moral and religious duty. Finally, the prevailing 
schools of modem ethics, following in the footsteps of the . 
ancient philosophies, take up their position once more on / 
the ground of real life. They seek to establish the in- 
dependence of an ethical science, an ethical consideration 
of the universe, either by treating morality and religion 
as entirely separate fields, or by reversing the standpoint i 
of Christian ethics with its derivation of morality from '. 
religious duties, and basing religion on ideal moral require- j 
ments. In thus emphasising the distinction of the two 
fields modem ethics takes as its main theme the question. 
What is moral ? The ideas of virtue and of duty it hopes 
to deduce from the idea of morality. Hence it is pre- 
eminently an ethics of goods; and the question of the 
nature of the moral good, and its relation to other goods, 
is the point of divergence of the prevailing ethical schools. 

The moral theory of the universe elaborated in the 
ancient world, so far as it has come down to us, is contained 
in the ethics of the two classical nations, the Greeks and the 
Romans. It is in Greece that reflection conceming the 
nature of morality had its origin. The Romans did no 
more than leam from the Greeks in the sphere of ethics 
proper, though their keen sense for what was useful to the 



334 Moral Life and Ethical Theory [269 

individual and to the community, and their highly developed 
feeling for justice, admirably fitted them to clear the ground 
for the application of ethics in custom and law. The moral 
and religious views of the Eastern nations did not b^n 
to exercise any profound influence upon European thought 
until ancient civilisation was drawing towards its close. The 
part played by Judaism in the origination of Christian 
doctrines is the most striking instance of this kind in its 
outward effects. But to all these elements which the 
civilisation of the day had brought together was now added 
a still more potent force : the force of a moral personality 
which, as it had itself transcended the limitations of national 
custom, so too imparted to the view of life which it 
embodied the power to remove all the obstacles that 
tradition or alien descent would place in its way. 
Christian ethics, therefore, is not a national but an 
humanistic ethics. Finally, the modern theories of the 
universe have sought to retain this broadly humanistic 
tendency, while they gradually strike off* the chains of 
religion and dogma. But just as modem civilisation has 
ousted uniformity of knowledge and belief to restore again 
the manifoldness of nationality, but yet — in contrast to the 
ancient world — has found its counterpoise in the intercourse 
of nations, so too does modern ethics appear in manifold 
forms, conditioned in part by difference of national stand- 
point, while yet the multeity of schools is powerless to 
break the continuity of the work of civilisation in the 
narrower ethical field. 



INDEX OF NAMES AND SUBJECTS 



^yjthftks, as normative science, 7 ; 
and rd^Mii, 53, $8, 227, 303 ; and 
the dwelling-plaoe, iSo & ; and doth- 
ing, 182 fil; aestfictic modre in work, 
193; and natnre-fedii^ 298C., 301, 
305 ff: 

Agncnltiml life, 195, 231, 233, 297 C; 
love of home, 259 

Ancestor wotdiip, 72, 75, 78 fil, 141 ; 
in China, 82; in Rome, 83, 87, 106; 
and the religioas ideal, 86 ; and hero 
worship, 91 ; in Greece, 106, 240 f. 

Anthropomorp^hism, in religion, 66; 
and the nature myth, 84 ff. 

Antithetic expression of morality, 326. 

Apperception, personi^ing, 76 f[. 

Aristotlb, 12, 25, 26, 15s, 247, 250, 
282, 284, 285 

Arnold, 310 

Art, as play of adults, 212; develop- 
ment of, 213 

Asceticism, 1 14 C 

Bachofbn, 228, 233 

Bad, meaning of word, 29 fil, 32, 37 fil 

Bastian, 79 

Bergaignb, 28, 301 

BiESB, 299 

Blood brotherhood, 143 

Blood relationship, primitive, 233; 

extension of, 237 
Blood revenge, ico, 180; replaced by 

punishment, 180, 270 £ 
Bodily decoration, precedes clothing, 

182 fil ; religious aspect of, 183 
Brahminism, 98, 1131., 124, 325 
BucHHOLZ, 184, 215, 267, 287 
Buddhism, 98 H, 114, 161 

Carus, ioi 
Caste, 198 

Charity, 290 fil ; care of the sick, 291 ; 
missions, 292 



Chinese, 8a, 183, 222 

Christianity, 5i> ^ 90> 99> '<». "4^-. 

119, 124, 143, 237, 289C, 29lfl^i 

^35. 332 ft 
CiCBRO, 26, 39 
Civilisation, idea of, 308 fil ; stages of, 

309 
Class distinctions, 195 ; and difierence 

in amount of property, 196; as 

shown in work, 201, 203 

Clothing, two impulses to seek, 182 ; 
xsthetic aspect of, 182 fil ; decoration 
of, transferred from man to woman, 
186; from person to environment, 
186; due to social equalisation and 
time saving, i86£; and dress, 187 f.; 
ethical aspect of, 189 fi., 192 

Communication, improvement of means 
of, 316 fil ; and international arbi- 
tration, 317; ethical aspect of, 318 f. 

COMTE, 49, 50, 52 

Confucius, 82, 99, 161 

Conscience, 11$ fil, 118, 121 

Conscious tradition, peculiar to man, 

130 fil 

CuRTius, 44, 158, 200, 271 

Custom, genend characteristics of, 
127 fil ; and instinct, 127 fil ; peculiar 
to man, 131 ; definition of, 131 f. ; 
religious origin of, 134 fil, I39f 148, 
151, 160; legal origin of, 135, 151, 
160; the bad custom, 137, 140, 143, 
154 f. ; changes of purpose in, 1390.; 
of the funeral feast, 140; of toasting, 
143; of drink money, 145; theories 
of origin of, 148 fil ; relation of, to 
law and morality, 151 fil ; moral 
sanction of, 154; relation of, to habit 
and usage, 156 fil; social origin of, 
161, 164; persistence of, 139, 164; 
systematisation of, 165 fil ; abuse of, 
175 fil ; primitive, 26$ i. ; of cannibal* 
ism and wife stealing, 137; of in- 
fiuittdde, 149 



336 



Index of Names and Subjects 



DbUSSBN, I20 

Diderot, 213 

DUCANGB, 26 

Duty, origin of idea of, 238 f. 

Dwelling, impulse to seek, 169, 177; 
primitive forms of, 178; religious 
aspect of, I79f. ; ethical aspect of, 

179, 192; legal aspect of, 179; the 
house peace, 179, 287; the temple, 

180, 287; aesthetic aspect of, 180 ff. ; 
the tower, 181 

EcKARDT, 310 

Egyptians, 66, 1 14, 184, 237, 314 
Enduring nature of moral goods, 327 
Enlightenment, period of, 273 
Ethical ideas, separation of from their 
substrate, 32 ff. ; deepening of, 37 ff. ; 
universal validity of, 45 ff. ; in myth, 
61 ff., 90, 303; reconciliation of 
opposite, in myth, 67 ff, 78; in the 
nature myth, 87 ff. 
Ethics, as normative science, 7 ff. ; 
speculative method in, 13; empirical 
method in, 14; and psychology, 

ijt, 35 ^M 325ff.» 329 ff-; and meta- 
physics, 17, 52; anthropological and 
reflective methods in, 19; problem 
of, 19 f. ; meaning of word, 25 ; origin 
of ethical ideas, 29, 31, 33, 45, 63 ; 
inwardising of moral ideas, 37, 41 f., 
Ii5f., 118; universality of moral 
endowment, 46, 127; and religion, 
43, 47, 48 ff., 53, 63, 90, 97ff, III, 
121 ff., I25f., 162, 226, 303, 328; 
and social phenomena, 47, 328 ; and 
natural environment, 47, 294 ff ; and 
the conditions of civilisation, 47, 
308 ff. ; influence of philosophy on, 
93, Ii2ff., 124; and hero worship, 
93, 96 ; and the future life, 105 ; ideal 
of a moral world order, 119; and the 
taking of food in common, I74ff., 
192; and the consecration of the 
house, I79ff., 192; and the norm of 
clothing, 189 ff., 192; and the wage 
principle, 204 ff.; and play, 213; of 
social intercourse, 221 ff. ; and the 
tribal union, 229; of family life, 
237 ff.; of the state, 261, 264, 273, 
277 ff. ; and law, 276 ff. ; of friend- 
ship, 286; of hospitality, 288; of 
charity, 291 ; and the feeling for 
nature, 306 ff. ; and property, 312 f. ; 
and material civilisation, 316, 318 f. ; 
of self-help, 321 ; and mental cultiva- 
tion, 321 1. ; and civilisation, 322 ff. ; 



ancient, an ethics of virtue, 332; 
Christian, an ethics of duty, 333; 
modem, an ethics of goods, 333 ; 
humanistic, 334 
Euhemerism in mythology, 72 f. 

Family, origin of, 228, 231, 244, 251; 
modier-right and fieither-right, 232 ff ; 
moral aspect of, 237 ff. ; religious 
aspect of, 240 ff.; right of burial, 
241; and the feeling of sympathy, 
243; and filial affection, 243 ff., 257; 
and state, 250; and sept, 227 ff., 251, 
258; l^;al division of property of, 
270 

Fashion, 163 

Father -right, 232 ff.; and possession, 
235 ; and polygamy, 236 

Fetichism, 62, 66, 75, 77, 84 

Feuerbach, 60 

Food, impulse to seek, 169, 174; pre- 
paration of by fire, 170, 178; fixed 
meals, 171 ; craving for, subjective 
basis of time measurement, 172; 
religious aspect of common meal, 
172 f.; public banquet, 173; ethical 
aspect of, 174, 192; the festival, 175 

Free will, 5, 132 

Freytag, 213 

Friendship, 283 ff. 

German, Germans, 24, 26, 28, 30, 33 ff , 
38 ff., 42 f., 63, 66, 92, 95, loif., 
122, 137, 141, 142 f., 153, 155, 157 ff., 
171 ff., 187, 200, 222 ff., 225, 235, 
254, 256, 267, 286, 307, 308 f. 

Gbsenius, ioi 

Gods, as human ideals, 62, 6^, 70, 78 ff, 
105 ; as representatives of the moral 
world order, 62, 70 f., too, 106, 
iiof.; as negative ideals, 63; justice 
of, 107 ff; jealousy of, 1 12 

Goethe, 307 

Good, meaning of word, 28 ff , 32, 37 ff. 

Greece, Greeks,. 12, 24 ff., 27,' 30, 33, 
38, 43 f., 52. 55, 58. 63, 65, 66 ff., 
69f., 72ff, 75ff, 83f., 88f., ^\i., 
93ff., loi £, I04f., 106 ff., 113 ff., 

120, 135. I55> 158, 171, 173. 184 ff., 
196, 20I, 211, 215, 225, 235, 239 ff., 
246, 247, 250, 255 ff. 259 f., 264, 
267, 270 f., 281 ff., 283 ff, 286 ff., 
267 f., 301 f., 304, 307, 311 f., 323, 

325, 333 
Grimm, 40, 43, loi, 102, 220, 255, 

267, 310 



Index of Names and Subjects 



ZZ7 



Habit, common to man and animals, 
131 f. ; and custom, 137, 156; and 
usage, 156; fonns of, 163! 

Hamann, 49 

Haxthauskn, 310 

HBGE^ 49, 50, 55 

Henotheism, 68 

Herbart, 53 

Herodotus, 239, 302 

Hero worship, 90 ff. ; legend of 
Heracles, 93 ; heroes as attainable 
moral ideals, 95 

Hesiod, 73, 104 

Heterogony of ends, law of, 330 ff. 

Hindoos, 27 f., 65, 77, 89, 98, 113, 
120, 124, 254, 301 

HoBBES, 127, 228, 229, 248, 249 

Homer, 25, 30, 66 f., 68, 73, 107, 
108, 109, no, 184, 215, 246, 255, 
259, 264, 267, 270, 288, 323, 325 

Hospitality, 286 ff. 

Humanbtic feelings, development of, 
281 ff.; friendship, 283 flf.; hos- 
pitality, 286 ff.; charity, 290 if. 

Humanistic forms of life, 166 f., 281 ff., 

334 
Huntmg life, 194, 233 f., 295 f. 

Idea of moral world order, Ii7ff. 
Ideal, importance of, for religion, 59, 

63, 70; of humanbtic custom, 169 
Ideas of life after death, 100 ff.; 

psychological motives in, 103 £ ; 

ethical significance of, 113, Ii8£ 
Ideas of reward and punishment, their 

religious significance, 61 f., 71, 100, 

103, 105, III; their development in 

the nature religions, 105 ff. ; mfluence 

of philosophy on, ii2ff. ; their 

ethical significance, 71, 100, in, 

117 f. 
Impulses, social, I29f. ; primitive 

human, 165, 169, 177, 182, 193; 

moral, 327 f. 
Individual forms of life, 165 f., 169 ff. 
Individualism, 247 f. 
Inequality of men, social, 205 ; natural, 

321 
Instinct, definition of, 132; individual 

and soda], 132 £ 
Intercourse, forms of, 165 f., 198 ff. 
Intuition, in religious experience, 51 

Tacobi, 49 

JHERING, 24, 34» 137, M«, 1451 147, 

148, 154, 159, 188, 190, 2170., 221, 

288 



Kant, 50, 51, 124, 249 
Klemm, 255 
Klugb, 158 
Krsmer, 252 

Langua^, importance of, to the 
moralist, 23, I39f. ; development of 
meaning of words, 23 ff., 28, 29, 37, 
157; and the concept of morality, 
27 ; impossibility of translation, 28 ; 
negative terms for immorality, 34; 
witness of, to ethical development, 
44, 47; and myth-making, 73, 75; 
and myth, relative differentiation oi^ 
77 f ; sooal origin of, 161 ; and 
d^;rees of relationship, 229 f.; and 
the state, 263 

DE Laveleyb, 310 

Law, in science, 5, 304 f. ; ethics and 
religion, 122, 162; and custom, 133, 
135, 138, 151 ff., 159; and religion, 
138, 270; common, 153 f., 268; 
definition of, 265; statute, 268; in- 
ternational, 269 ; penal, 269 ff. ; 
constitutional, 274; of the three 
moral stages, 329 ; of heterogony of 
ends, 330 ff. 

Le^ System, origin of, 265 ff. ; exten- 
sion of sphere of, 273 ff. ; protection 
of, 274; ethical asoect of, 276 ff.; 
and consciousness of^ justice, 286 

Lbssing, 215 

Lexer, 26 

LiPPERT, 50, 75, 149, 151, 233 

Logic, a normative science, 6ff., ii; 
laws of^ II ; and psychology, 36 

Lubbock, 60, 228, 230, 266 

Luther, 30 

Macrobius, 26 

Man and nature, 294 ff. 

Marria^, forms of, 228, 230 £; and 

religion, 230 ff.; position of wife, 

231 f., 237; as leg^ relation, 284 
McLennan, 228 
Menander, 246 
Mental cultivation, 319 ff.; right and 

wrong ideals of, 320 fH ; ethical 

aspect of, 322 
Methods of ethics, 10 ff. 
Modesty, 182 
Mohammedanism, 99, 252 
MoHL, 248! 
Moral laws as religious commandi, 

121 ff. 



33^ 



Index of Names and Subjects 



Morality, and custom, 24 flf., 127 flf., 
137, 140, 151 flf.; meaning of word, 
26; genml idea of^ 18 ff.; develop- 
ment of special moral ideas, 32 n.; 
and religion, 63; ideal of, 65; and 
hero worship, 93 ; relation of, to law 
and religion, 121 ; philosophical 
theories oi^ 126; nature of primitive, 
1551, 295; derived from non-moral 
elements, 191 f., 206; evolution oi^ 
in savagery and civilisation, 294 flf. ; 
and civilisation, 308 ff. ; psydiological 
elements in, 325 ff. ; and ethical 
theories of the universe, 331 ff. 

Morgan, 228, 230, 233, 251 

Mother -right, 232 ff.; and polyandry, 

234 

Motive and end, 1x7, I28f., 134, 149, 
225, 247, 249, 257, 275, 316 

Mueller, 68, 72, 73 

Myth, and religion, 55 ff., 65; and 
metaphysics, 55; place of, in primi- 
tive thought, 55 f., 63 f.; relation of 
religious and ethical elements in, 
61 ff., 303; immoral elements in, 
65 ff., 89 f.; psychological develop- 
ment of, 71 ff.; the nature myth, 
84 ff.; Greek, Roman and Hindoo 
mytholo^, 89; and history, 91 f.; 
in ethical religions, 98, 119 

Natural conditions of life, 295 ff. 

Nature, feeling for, primitive, 299; 
mythological stage of, 300 ff. ; as awe 
of nature, 301 ; and consideration for 
animals, 302; and sacrifice, 302; 
subjective form of, 303 ff.; and 
science, 304 ; and religion, 304 f. ; 
ethical aspect of, 306 ft.; and love, 

307 
Nomadic life, X94, 296 f. ; and tribal 

union, 236 

Norm, in natural science, 2 ; in 

psychology and history, 2 f. ; as rule 

of volition, 5; in grammar, 6; in 

jurisprudence, 6 ; in aesthetics, 7 ; in 

logic and ethics, 7 ff. ; of custom, 

157; of clothing, 189 ff. 

Old age, reverence attaching to, 80 f. 
Oldenburg, 98 

Ought, idea of, in natural science, 4; 
in logic and ethics, 9 

Permanent property, 205 

Persians, 77, 90, 113 

Personal deportment, 214 ff., 224 



Personality, unity of the moral, 29; 
value of; 32, 33, 80, 88, 94, 96, 
97 ft; 160 ff., 264; moral, in ethical 
religions, 99, 113; part played by, in 
theories of society, 153 

Philosophy, influence of, on ethics, 25, 

39 

PiCTBT, 44, 200, 229 

Plato, Platonism, 12, 52, 55, ii3ff., 
120, 238, 250, 293, 285, 304, 307, 
312 

Play, origin of, 193, 208; ritual games, 
209; games of chance, 209; cere- 
monial games, 209 £ ; music, 210 ; 
work games, 210; athletics, 2x0; 
children's games, 211 ; art as play of 
adults, 212; dramatic art, 212 

Poetry, influence of, on myth, 66, 76 

Polite manners, 2x4 ff. 

Post, 228, 231 

Prbllbr, 70, 83, 87, 91 

Problems of ethics, i8ff. 

Property, r^;ulation of, 310 ff.; in land, 
310; origin of independent, 310 f.; 
private capital, 311; inherit^ and 
acquired, 311 f.; ethical aspect of, 
312 f. ; permanent, 205 

Psychology, as normative science, 2; 
psychological method in ethics, 15 f.; 
and ethics, 35 ff.; and logic, 36; of 
language, 23 fE, 28, 29, 37 ; and 
religion, 53 £, 58, 60; of fetichism 
and spiritism, 62; and myth, 71 ff., 
76 f. ; of children and animals, as 
regards myth-making, 74; of ideas 
of a future state, 103 f., 106; of the 
ideal of a moral world order, 119; 
of habit, usage and custom, not 
to be logically reconstructed, 159; 
motives of reverence and affection, 
228 ; laws of moral evolution, 329 ff. 

Ratzel, 102, 178, 241, 251, 253 
Regulation of property, 310 ff. 
Religion, and ethics, 43, 47, 90, 121 ft, 
125 f., 226; autonomous theoiv of, 
49i 57; metaphysical theory o^ 49, 
58; ethical theory of, 50, 57; origin 
of religious ideas, 55; and myth, 
55 ff.; definition of, 59; universality 
of, 60 ; natural, 62, 65 ; and fetichism, 
62 ; the ethical religions, 97 ff. ; and 
the moral world order, 100 ff.; and 
law, 122, 138, 270; and custom, 
134 ff., 148, 15X ; and play, 209, 
214; and the forms of salutation, 
219 ff., 226; and patriarchal institu- 



Index of Names and Subjects 



339 



tions, 253; and state, 2^2; and 
hospitality, 287; and chanty, 291; 
and civilisation, 322 
RocHHOLZ, 171, 179 

ROHDB, 107 

Rome, Romans, Latin, 24, 26, 28, 30, 
33, 35. 38 ff.. 43^-, 62, 65, 66, 70, 
77» 83. 87» 89. 91, loi, 103, 105 £, 
122, 135, 153 ff., 157, 171. aoof., 
23s. 25s f., 269, 271, 281 £, 286, 
291, 297, 308^., 3", 333 

ROSKOFF, 60 

Salutation, meaning of, 216 i, ; the bow, 
217; fonn of words used in, 219; 
religious aspect of, 219, 226; the 
hand clasp, 220; motives of, 224; 
and its acknowledgment, 225 f. 

SCHADB, 28 

schblling, 55 

schlbibrmachbr, 49 

Schmidt, 28, 31, 38, 68, 70, 215, 239, 
260, 283, 287, 502, 312 

Science, explicative and normative, 
iff.; 'is and ' ought ' in natural, 
4; theoretical and practical, 8; and 
nature feeling, 304 

Self-preservation, impulse of, 165, 193 

Semites, 86, xo6, 121, 161, 220 f., 237, 
251 f., 289, 292, 334 

Slavery, 196, 206, 237, 297 

Social forms of life, 165, 167, 227 ff. 

Social intercourse, forms of, 2x4, 2l6ff; 
their ethical significance, 221 ff. 

Society and monls, 47; society, forms 
of, see Social forms of life. 

SocRATBS, 240, 284, 285, 307 

Sophocles, 115, 242, 246 

Soul, primitive notion of, loi 

Spencer, 50, 72, 74, 75 

Spinoza, 54 

State and labour contract, 204; rela- 
tion of, to tribal union, 247 ff. ; origin 
of, 249 ff., 266; animal, 249; contract 
theory of, 250; patriarchal institu- 



tions, 250, 252 f., 255, 258; despotic, 
253 ; development of forms of^ 250 ff. ; 
tendency to expansion, 2^6; common 
aims of, 256; feeling of community 
in, 257 ff. ; egoism in, 259, 261 ; 
ethical aspect of, 261, 264, 273; 
literature and language, 262 f. ; puni- 
tive power of, 20907; and religion, 
272; and law, 274; motive and end 
in, 275 f. ; and charity, 293 

Stoics, 283, 325 

Sympathy, 242 fT, 263 

Tools, invention of, 313 ff.; domes- 
tication of animals, 297, 313 ff.; 
machinery, 314 f.; and ranee of 
communication, 315 f.; ana the 
moral character, 316 

Tribal union, and fiunily, 228; and the 
feeling of sympathy, 242; and state, 
247 ff. 

Tylor, so, 79, 241 

Usage, definition of, X56ff. ; practical 
sanction of, 157 

Value, in normative sciences, 4 ; shift 
of, in ethics, 45 

Wages, origin of, 198, 203; payment 
in grain and cattle, 199; in money, 
200; forms of, 202 f.; ethical aspect 
of, 204 ff. ; state regulation of, 274 

Waitz, 79, 102, 178, 184, 231, 241, 
251, 253, 267, 281, 310 

Work, origin of, 193; division of 
labour, 194, 201 ; due to complexity 
of conditions and to class distinctions, 
195; wages and exchange, 202; 
ethical aspect of, 204 ff.; state regu- 
lation of, 274 

Xenophanes, 67, 89 

ZlMMER^ 172, 255 

Zoroastrianism, 113 



PLYMOUTH 

WILLIAM BRBNDON AND SON 

PRINTERS 



•»•« 



Stanford University Ulirary 

Stanford, Californis 



In order that others may use this book, 
please return it as soon as possible, but 
not later than the date due. 



